WALTER WILSON.
If e'er thy heart incline to thoughts of Love,
Think not to meet the gentle passion joined
With pomp and greatness: Courts may boast of Beauty,
But Love is seldom found to dwell amongst them.
He seeks the cottage in the tufted grove.
The russet fallows, and the verdant lawns,
The clear, cool brook, and the deep woody glade,
Bright winter fires, and summer evening hues:
These he prefers to gilded roofs and crowns.
There he delights to pair the constant swain
With the sweet, unaffected, virtuous maid:
Here is his empire, here his choice to reign,
Here, where he dwells with Innocence and Truth.
Rowe
.
Travellers
, who have made the tour of
Europe, always dwell with peculiar delight on
the sunny skies of Italy; and a host of
domestic
writers, never, perhaps, in the whole course
of their existence, beyond that seeming
boundary
where their eyes first beheld the horizon
apparently closing around them, join their
voices in the chorus of the sunny skies of
Italy!
Let them lard their poems and stories with
threadbare descriptions of the `rosy twilight,'
and `silvery moonbeams,' and `gorgeous
sunrise'
I
confess, these
copied
delineations have
little interest for me.America, `my own,
my native land'O! the rudest mountain,
and wildest wood of thy varied landscape,
is far dearer to my heart, and more inspiring
to my imagination, than the sublime
antiquities
and unrivalled natural charms of that
clime, where `all, save the spirit of man, is
divine.' It is the
free
expression of that
spirit
,
which, when irradiated by liberty, and
instructed
by knowledge, is all but divine, that
gives to Americans their peculiar
characteristics
.
To exhibit some of those traits,
originated
by our free institutions, in their manifold
and minute effects on the minds, manners, and
habits of the citizens of our republic, is the
design of these Sketches. How
well
the design
is fulfilled, the decision of the public taste,
must decide.
Walter Wilson was the only child of a man
who had once been an eminent merchant in
Boston, but losses and misfortunes suddenly
reduced him to bankruptcy, and he died,
broken-hearted, before Walter had attained his
seventh year. Mrs. Wilson, with her little boy,
then retired to the house of her father, a good
industrious farmer, residing in the county of
Franklin; where she might have dwelt in
quietness
,
had not the elevation from which she
had fallen, and which, in truth, she had not
borne very meekly, continually mortified her
pride. Her impatient repinings were not
heard with much sympathy by her own family,
and she was driven as much by necessity as
inclination, to pour forth her sorrows to her
young son. However, it must be confessed,
she dwelt quite as pathetically on the loss of
her fine house and fine furniture, fine horses
and fine carriages, as on the loss of that
husband
to whom she was indebted for all her
finery. She was a weak womantoo highly
elated in prosperity, too easily depressed by
adversitynot considering that
both
are
situations
of
trial;
that there is but
one
path which
leads to eternal life, and so we gain it, the
consideration is trivial, whether it be beneath
the garish sunbeams of the one, or groping
our tearful way through the dark shadows of
the other. But lessons of true humility, or
useful exertion, were never taught by the
precepts
,
or examples, of Mrs. Wilson; and
Walter, till her death, which occurred when he
was about fifteen, had done little, save repine
at the cruelty of fortune, or form wild schemes
of future success and grandeur, which neither
his temperament, nor habits, seemed in the
least calculated to realize. He was proud,
passionate, and visionary, and though not idle,
a very
reluctant
boy, whenever manual labor
was included in his tasks. These were the
dark shades of his character. Now for the
sunny
side; and that I like to portray far the best.
His feelings were just like his countenance,
open, ingenuous, noble; his heart quick as
the flash of his dark eye, in the cause of the
oppressed; and tender as the smile that played
on his lip, while gazing on the faces of those
he loved. And he possessed that surest pledge
of virtue in the
dependant
, a grateful mind;
joined with a sense of honor so scrupulous,
that he would have died rather than betrayed
a trust reposed in him, or violated a promise
voluntarily given. It was on the right
direction
of these qualities, that his grandfather, a
cautious, shrewd old citizen, who had fought
in the battles of the revolution, and assisted
in the formation of more than one constitution
designed for the government of freemen, built
his hopes of the future success of the destitute
orphan. But how to manage him judiciously
was the question. He had never been
subjected
to much restraint, and his spirit would
spurn at the contumely and wrongs the poor
are often exposed to receive from the rich.
He was naturally romantic, and had not been
inured to steady exertion, and would probably
be discouraged if a life of labor was proposed
as the only means by which greatness might
be achieved. His grandfather had a friend,
an old-fashioned farmer like himself, and
moreover
rich and without sons, who offered to take
the boy. It was an excellent place, if plenty
of food, and plenty of work, good instruction,
and pious examples, are considered of primary
importance in the education of the young.
The grandfather thought them so.Walter was
not so easily satisfied; but, finally, gratitude to
his relative, who had so long supported him,
made him yield to his wishes, and consent to
dwell with Mr. Ezekiel Clark, for the space
of three years. If in that time his objections
to the occupation of agriculture should not be
removed, his grandfather promised to aid him
to prepare himself for something more
consonant
to his wishes. It is impossible, in this
limited sketch, to analyze the motives which
induced
the old gentleman thus to dispose of
Walter, whom he loved as tenderly as he ever
did one of his own sons. No doubt the reader,
if a young lady, thinks his destination very
vulgarwonders why he was not sent to
college
,
or at least, placed behind some counter;
and, all interest in the hero at an end, prepares
to turn to some more amusing article. If she
does, she will lose the description of as fair a
girl as herself, besides one or two love scenes.
It was about seven o'clock in the evening of
the last day of November, 1803, that the
family
of Mr. Ezekiel Clark was summoned to the
sitting room to attend family duties. This was
two hours earlier than the usual season for the
evening devotions, but all knew the reason of
the call, and assembled without delay. There,
in an oldfashioned armed chair, before a fire that
seemed calculated for the meridian of Lapland,
sat Mr. Ezekiel Clark; at his right hand stood
a three legged table, on which lay the big
ha' Bible, well worn, and beside it, a small,
neat edition of the holy scriptures, apparently
new. Mr. Clark was advanced in years, sixty
or upwards, a tall, spare, yet vigorous looking
man, and in his youth, probably handsome;
but now his face was marked with the deep
lines of care and sorrow, while his thick,
over-hanging
eyebrows, gave an austere cast to his
countenance, which was much increased by
his habitual gravity. With her chair nestled
close to his side, and her hand reclining on his
knee, sat his daughter, his only one, and a
fairer girl could not be found in all the country.
I dislike full length descriptions of beauty.
Who does not know that a handsome woman
must have a fair complexion, bright eyes, ruby
lips, and all the
et ctera
of loveliness, requisite
to take captive the affections of lordly man?
These choice gifts had been showered upon
the fair Fanny(that was her name; had she
ever attended a boarding school, it would
probably have been
novelized
into Frances;
but the advantages of a fashionable education
she never had enjoyed, and so I shall call her
as her father always called her
Fanny
;)
with a prodigality that marked her for a
favorite
of nature; yet I cannot be positive of the
color of her hair, whether it was black, brown,
or chestnut.
The qualities of her mind and temper
demand
more particular scrutiny. She was the
youngest of eight children that a beloved wife
had borne to Mr. Clark. The others all died
young; and as these human blossoms, one by
one, were withered, the heart of the mother
sunk beneath her grief. She died of a
lingering
consumption, and the little Fanny, then
but five years old, only remained to console
her father. It might naturally be supposed
she would be much indulgedbut it was not
so. Mr. Clark was a genuine descendant of
the pilgrims, pious even to enthusiasm, and
pursuing what he deemed the path of duty,
with a resolution that savored of sternness.
Strict in family duties, and family government,
even to rigidness, he would have thought it an
infringement of the decalogue, to have indulged
with his child in that playful hilarity which
good people now deem so innocent and
laudable
.
But Fanny loved her father with a
reverence
so deep, so grateful, that all his
commands
were pleasant. She even watched to
anticipate his wishes, and although, had she
followed the impulses of her own happy and
buoyant heart, she would have sung and
danced
from morning till night; yet whenever she
caught her father's voice, hers sunk to soft
murmurs; and when she heard his step, her
own was demure as a quaker's. Yet it was
not that he did not love her sweet tones; they
thrilled every fibre of his heart, and often
charmed him `even to tears'but he did not
dare indulge his tender and delighted feelings,
he so feared he should idolize her; he so
trembled
lest he should lose her. He was like the
miser who can only count his gold in secret,
lest some one beholding his treasure, should
rob him of the precious deposit. He always
prayed for her, but he never caressed her;
even when she drew her chair so close to his,
and looked up in his face with such confiding
fondness, he did not smile upon her. But she
knew he loved her, and to retain and merit his
affection, was her study and pride. O, she
was a sweet girl! as gay as a swallow, and
yet gentle as a dovepersevering, and yet
flexible; just the disposition for a woman, a
wife; a spirit that can accommodate itself to
the wishes and humors of those on whom it is
dependent for happiness, and yet retain
sufficient
firmness to act with decision when
circumstances
shall require its exertion.
I have dwelt so long on the character of
Fanny, (how could it be avoided?) that I must
be brief in the notice of the personage seated
next her. And yet to delineate half her
peculiarities
,
would fill half a volume, and her
sayings
and doings would form a folio. She was
no other than Miss Judith Clark, better known
in the family and neighbourhood by the name
of aunt Judy, the sister of Mr. Ezekiel Clark;
and ever since the decease of his wife, had
been his housekeeper. She was a working,
talking, bustling body, and one who never
omitted an opportunity of giving good advice
to any person, let them be ever so mean or
miserable, who would listen to her harangues.
If she did not always give assistance to those
who needed it, it was because she did not see
it to be her duty. She was the reverse of her
brother in many things, and perhaps the
difference
cannot be better explained than by saying,
that while
she
was boasting of her knowledge
of the law,
he
was silently obeying its
injunctions
.
Yet she was an excellent housekeeper,
and proud of her housekeeping; in short, one
of your notables; a character not so common
now as twenty years since. She was seated
very erect, in a low chair, her knitting work on
her lap, but covered with her pocket
handkerchief
,
which would wholly have concealed it,
had not one unmannerly needle thrust itself
through a small hole she had that very evening
to her great consternation burnt, while
smoking
.
Her visage was thin and sharp, and her
features, and the lines of her countenance,
denoted
no predominant passion, save extreme
carefulness; yet her spectacles were now
raised
upon her forehead, and her hands
reverently
folded upon her lap, as if she had cast aside
all worldly thoughts, while preparing to attend
the reading of the Holy Word. Let us not
doubt the sincerity of her worshipshe
certainly
made a sacrifice of inclination to duty;
the posture she had assumed, was to her active
habits a penance; for never, during waking
hours, were her hands seen folded, except at
the morning and evening devotions. But even
then, she was not wholly freed from anxiety.
Her attention was often diverted from her
religious
meditations, by the pranks of a roguish
looking urchin, who sat in the corner, on her
left. A little curl-headed Jonathan, who had
been bequeathed, by his dying mother, to the
care of aunt Judy, and whom she loved,
three
excepted, the best of any human being. But
he loved play, even better than he did aunt
Judy; and was now, from his low stool, slyly
pulling and teasing two venerable cats, that
lay sleeping on a rug, placed purposely for
them, near the fire.
One other figure completed the group around
the hearth. Nearly opposite aunt Judy, and
beyond the table, on the right hand of Mr.
Clark, sat a young man, apparently sunk in
profound thought. The air of his countenance
was lofty, almost to haughtinessand yet
there was something in the expression of his
very handsome features that attracted, almost
fascinated, every beholder. It was the
expression
of generous feeling, that promised
sympathy; of open sincerity, that invited
confidence
;
and few, who regard the face as an
index
of the mind, would have hesitated to trust
him as a friend, and fewer still would have
wished to have provoked him to become an
enemy. That youth was Walter Wilson. It
was the day of his emancipationhe was
twenty-one
;
and the family were thus early
assembled
,
that they might all unite once more in
worshipping the Most High, before Walter
departed
to a school, in a distant town, which he
had engaged to instruct during the winter.
Mr. Clark read a chapter composedly, but
in a much lower tone than usualperhaps that
was the reason why neither Walter nor Fanny
heard one word of the matter. Aunt Judy
could not attend strictly to the reading, as she
was obliged to keep one eye constantly fixed
on the rogue in the corner, while sundry shakes
of her head denoted her displeasure at his
conduct
.
Then followed the prayer, in which
Mr. Clark deviated so far from his usual form,
as to petition, earnestly, that the path of duty
might be made plain to the one about to go
out from themthat he might be kept from
temptation, and preserved from evil; and that
they might all meet again, if not in this vale of
2
tears, yet in the heaven of joy above. Aunt
Judy, as a response, uttered a sigh so deep,
it nearly resembled a groanWalter stood
with his lips firmly compressed, and every
nerve wrought up to endure, if possible,
without
betraying his feelings; he did not relax
for aunt Judy's groan. But when he heard a
soft, low sigh, that he knew was breathed by
Fanny, his knees trembled so violently, he was
compelled to lean against the mantel-piece for
support. When Mr. Clark had ended his
prayer, he took from the table the small Bible,
and advancing one step towards Walter, said,
`It is now my duty, Walter, to say you are
free
. You have been a faithful and a good
boy; not that I can say you have always done
your duty; but we all have our short-comings,
and you have behaved much better than I
expected
when I took you. I hope and pray you
will continue to do well; and as a guide to your
path, I give you the word of God. Study it,
Walter, and you will, I trust, become wise
unto
salvation. And if, in this world, you meet
with any trials in which I can assist you, call
upon me as your friend, your father.'
His voice sunk as he pronounced the last
word, but not one word was so distinctly heard
by Walter; and as he returned the fervent
pressure of the old man's hand, the tears
swelled
in his eyes. Aunt Judy sobbed audibly,
and would doubtless have cried outright, had
she not felt it her duty, while her brother was
speaking, to reprimand little Jonathan, which
she did in a whisper, by telling him that `if he
did not let them 'ere cats alone, and behave
himself, she would, as soon as ever Walter
was gone, whip him till she took his skin off.'
For the credit of her humanity, however, I will
record, that she had not the least intention
of executing her threat.
A man now entered the room to say he
waited
for Walter. `We must bid you good-by,
Walter,' said aunt Judy, offering him one hand,
while with the other she wiped her eyes`but
where is Fanny? Fanny!' she continued in
a loud tone`where can the girl be gone to,
I wonder? Fanny!'
`Bid Fanny farewell for me,' said Walter,
in a low voice, and then again pressing the
hand of Mr. Clark, he rushed from the house.
`You may put my trunk in the sleigh, and
drive on,' said Walter, to the man who was to
accompany him`I shall walk.'
`Walk! what, all the way to your
grandfather's
?'
inquired the man`why it is a
good five miles, and a plaguy rough road.'
`No matter,' replied Walter, in an accent so
impatient, it sounded angry`I say I shall
walk.'
`And walk you will, I guess, for all of my
stopping for you,' muttered the fellow, as he
drove off at full speed.
Walter slowly followed the jingling vehicle,
till he had reached an abrupt angle in the road,
which, entered upon, soon shut out the view
of Mr. Clark's dwelling. Here the youth
paused
,
turned, and stood long, with folded arms,
gazing on the home he had left. The cold of
winter had already commenced; the ground
was covered with snow, that sparkled beneath
the bright moonlight; it was shining as the
world appeared to Walter, and cold as his
hopes on entering it. The tall elms, that so
gracefully, during summer, threw their green
foliage over the long, low, oldfashioned
building
,
now towered, revealed in all their
gigantic
proportions, their long bare arms, stretched
abroad, as if to defend the dwelling they had
so lately ornamented. All around was
hushed
;
and while Walter stood there so still and
lonely, the only living thing unsheltered, he
felt pressing on his heart that sense of utter
desolateness, which persons of sensibility, who
for the first time find themselves alone in the
world, are doomed to suffer. There are few
sensations more painful.
How his hopes, and plans, and wishes, had
altered, since he first went to reside with Mr.
Clark! Fanny was then just twelve. He
promised to stay three years; they looked like
an eternity to him, he was so anxious to
mingle
among men, and hew himself a path to fame,
and dohe knew not whatbut `wonders, no
doubt.' The three years expired. Fanny
was fifteen. She loved Walter, with all the
innocency and truth of sisterly affection.
Every
leisure hour they planned some amusement
together. During the long winter evenings,
when she had knit her
thirty times round
, they
read the same books together. Fanny, with
tears in her eyes, begged him to stay; could
he go? O, no! not thenin a few months
perhaps
.
Thus two years passedthey passed
quickly to Walter. One year only remained
of his minority; and during that, he never
once expressed a wish to go. And Jacob
could not labor more faithfully, while serving
for his beloved Rachel, than Walter wrought
on the farm of Mr. Clark. Yet the intercourse
between Walter and Fanny, had assumed a
character so distant and reserved, that a
stranger
might have thought them wholly indifferent
to each other. This reserve was the effect of
her delicacy, and his sense of honor and
fidelity
to his master. It was then Walter felt the
full bitterness of his poverty and dependence.
He loved Fanny, deeply, fervently; and yet
he never breathed a syllable, which a brother
might not have spoken to a sister. Still he
feared he had not been sufficiently guarded,
else why had not Mr. Clark expressed a wish
to have him reside longer with him, when he
so much needed help? `He suspects I love
Fanny,' murmured the youth to himself. A
convulsive movement for a moment agitated
his features. Then clenching his hand firmly,
he exclaimed`And I will yet be worthy of
her love!' And plunging down the steep road,
he pursued his way with a speed that seemed
calculated to overtake his companion.
In truth, Walter was not the only person
who wondered why he was suffered to depart.
Aunt Judy owned her astonishment; but as
economy
was as much her hobby as it ever was
Adam Smith's, the only difference being that
his was
political
, hers,
personal
she resolved
all her doubts by reflecting, that probably, her
brother knew of some person he could hire,
who would work cheaper than Walter.
The next morning saw a very sober looking
group assembled around the breakfast table of
Mr. Ezekiel Clark. `I took a bad cold
yesterday
,
and could not sleep much last night,'
said Mr. Clark.
`I had terrible bad dreams, and my sleep did
not do me one bit of good,' said aunt Judy.
Fanny said not a word; but, judging by her
swollen eye and pale cheek, she had rested no
better than the others. A fortnight passed,
and no news from Walteranother fortnight,
and a letter came to Mr. Clark.
`Pray, how does Walter like his school?
how many scholars does he have? when is he
coming home?' eagerly demanded aunt Judy;
huddling question upon question, with true
feminine volubility.
`He says nothing at all about his school,'
replied her brother, gravely, and glancing his
eye on his daughter.
`You needn't look to Fanny,' said aunt Judy,
pettishly, provoked that her questions were all
vain,`as if she wanted to hear anything
about Walter. She hasn't mentioned his name
since he went away, and I don't believe she
cares whether he is dead or alive.'
Fanny was employed making a coat of
crimson
flannel, which aunt Judy had taken
particular
pains to color for little Jonathan.
During
the time her father was reading the letter,
she had busily continued her work; but aunt
Judy afterwards declared, she never, `in all
the days of her life, see such a looking
buttonhole
as one that Fanny made on that crimson
suit.' Her face was pale as marble when her
father first looked upon her; at aunt Judy's
remark, it was colored to her foreheadeven
her neck and hands were as crimson as
Jonathan's
coat.
A smile of tenderness, mingled with a shade
of sorrow, passed over the usually fixed, and
almost stern features of Mr. Clark. He
collected
his writing materials, and sat down to
answer Walter's letter; but what he wrote,
aunt Judy, with all her fidgeting, could not
discover.
The months passed on; but if we credit
aunt Judy, they passed heavily. She always
declared it was the most
melancholy
winter she
ever experienced. `And Fanny,' she said,
`was so downspirited and moping, she
raly
feared the girl was going into a consumption.'
At such remarks, Fanny would try to smile;
but if her father heard them, the look of pity
and endearment he always threw upon her,
would bring tears to her eyes.
It was towards the last of March, and on
the evening of a stormy, blustering day, such
as frequently occur at the vernal equinox, that
Mr. Clark sat down to read his usual portion
of scripture. He had laid his hand on the
sacred
volume, and given the preparatory hem,
when the outer door unclosed, and a light step
was heard traversing the long, narrow entry.
The sitting room door was flung open.
`Walter!'exclaimed Mr. Clark, in the
deep bass tones of his guttural voice, seizing
one of the youth's hands.
`Walter!'screamed aunt Judy, a full
octave
above the highest treble notes she ever
before usedas she caught the other.
`Walter!' murmured Fanny, in a voice
sweeter to his ear than the breathing of an
olian harp, as disengaging himself from the
grasp of her father and aunt, he pressed both
her hands in his, and while she sunk into the
chair from which she had partly risen, just
touched his lips to her forehead.
The action was unnoticed by aunt Judy,
who had stooped to pick up her spectacles,
which had fallen in her hurry to welcome
Walter
;
and which she would not have had broken,
for a kiss from the handsomest young man in
the universe. If Mr. Clark saw the slight
caress, the smile that beamed on his features,
while he pointed Walter to a seat in his usual
place, did not argue displeasure.
`What is the matter with Fanny now?' said
aunt Judy. `I shouldn't think Walter's
coming
home was any occasion for tears.'
`We will proceed in the duties of the
evening
,'
said her brother, solemnly, as he just
glanced on his daughter.
`You may have Fanny,' said Mr. Clark to
Walter the next day`but, as I told you in
my letter, you must not marry till next
November
.
Manage for yourself one year. Go,
hire yourself out, and be steady and
industrious
;
you will gain much useful knowledge;
and next fall come home here, and you shall
be as my own son. Fanny, too, has need of
learning many things, before she will be fitted
to manage a family.'
`Yes, indeed,' responded aunt Judy. `
Fanny
never has cared whether she knew how to
bake, or brew, or any such necessary matters,
if she could only skip and sing. But I hope
now she will be more steady, and mind how I
season my pies; the wedding cake I shan't
let her try to make, for it would be a bad sign,
besides a very great waste, if the wedding cake
should be spoiled.'
`These wild, idle boys sometimes succeed
well,' said a neighbour to the grandfather of
Walter Wilson. `There is your grandson,
he has married the richest and prettiest girl
in the county. Who would have guessed it?'
`It has happened just as I intended,' replied
the sagacious old man, significantly shaking
his head, `when I persuaded the child to live
with Mr. Clark. Walter was one of your
romantic
,
hasty, wayward boys; but he had a
good heart notwithstanding. One of those
tempers, so difficult to manage, and so well
worth the attempt of managing. I placed him
in the right way, and he is now so trained and
bound, that habit and inclination will keep him
right. His own ardor and ambition will soon
carry him forward, and it is the blessing of our
happy institutions, that merit and talents, in
whatever station, if rightly exerted, will
command
respect, and ensure success. I
prophesy
,'
continued the old man, raising himself up
3
with a lofty air, `I prophesy, that if Walter
Wilson lives twenty years, he will be a
distinguished
man!'
There is now a large, elegant brick mansion
beneath the shade of those old elms, that once
threw their arms over a long, low, irregular
building; the grounds, and everything around,
bespeak the owner a gentleman of industry,
wealth, and taste; and the address of that
gentleman is, the Hon. Walter Wilson.
THE
SOLDIER OF THE REVOLUTION.
`Old men forget; yet all shall not be forgot,
But they'll remember with advantages,
The feats they did that day.'
Almost
every man, who is advanced in
years, has, in his past life, some particular
period which is remembered with peculiar
interest
.
The circumstances connected with
that period are treasured in the memory, often
repeated, and but few topics of conversation
can be introduced without furnishing an
opportunity
of referring, at least, if not expatiating
on the important affair. It is deserving of
notice
that what is, in fact, the engrossing
pursuit
of the multitude, namely, the acquisition
of
wealth
, is not, even by the most devoted
worldling, accounted matter of such glorious
triumph as those deeds which shame the
propensity
he is indulging. You rarely hear such
an one boast of the cunning bargain which
laid the foundation of his fortune, or the
plodding
thrift by which he accumulated his
thousands
.
Avarice is a deep rooted passion in the
human
breast, and its gratification ministers to
vanity, yet none are vain of being thought
avaricious. There is a feeling of degradation
in the mind, if known to place its sole affections
on the paltry, perishable things of earth, which
should admonish even the most stupid, of that
more noble destiny which man was formed
capable of enjoying. But feats of personal
strength and activity, and `hair breadth 'scapes'
from danger, are recounted with a satisfaction
commensurate to the labors performed, and the
perils encountered; because there is a pride of
personal desert in such achievements and
escapes
.
But above all, the glory gained in the
tented field, is the theme which those who
have any claim to the title of
soldier
, are the
most ambitious to display. They all appear
to feel somewhat of that yearning for martial
fame which agitated the princely hero of
Agincourt
when he exclaimed
`By Jove, I am not covetous for gold;
Nor care I who doth feed upon my cost;
It yearns me not if men my garments wear;
Such outward things dwell not in my desires;
But if it be a sin to covet honor,
I am the most offending soul alive.'
Yet whoever has heard, or read the
narratives
of the veterans of our revolutionary war,
must have remarked that they dwell not so
much on the detail of the battles and
skirmishes
in which they were engaged, as on the
effect
those actions had in deciding the contest
in favor of liberty and independence. The
causes which roused the Americans to take up
arms, were most favorable to the developement
of the virtuous energies of men, and
consequently
that recklessness of moral character
and abandonment of pious principles, which
too often fatally distinguishes the mass of that
profession, when composed of hired
mercenaries
,
never attached to the soldiers of our
armies. It was doubtless matter of
astonishment
to the governments of Europe, that no
disturbance followed the disbanding of the
American troops; those foreigners did not
know that our
soldiers
, when assuming that
name, never abandoned the one of
citizens
.
In fact the latter was the most gratifying to
those who fought the battles of freedom,and
when the necessity for farther resistance
ceased
,
they gladly relinquished their weapons and
returned to the firesides their valor had
preserved
from insult and spoliation. It was their
boast to have fought for their country, and
to their country they cheerfully resigned the
laurels they had won. This generous
devotedness
of the American soldiery to the principles
of liberty and equal rights, and their prompt
obedience to civil government, have no
parallel
in history. They have never been
adequately
rewarded, but let them be gratefully
remembered. They deserve to have their
deeds the theme of story, and of song; and a
sketch of one of those veterans will not surely
be considered inappropriate in a work like this,
especially by those who consider how much
the ladies of America are indebted to the free
institutions established by the war of the
Revolution
,
for their inestimable privileges of
education
,
and that elevation of character and
sentiment they now possess.
`This walk has quite tired me,' said old
Captain Blake, seating himself in his capacious
armed chair, and placing one foot on the low
stool his grandaughter Maria arranged for
his accommodation. `A little matter
over-comes
me now, I find. Maria, my love, bring
me a tumbler of beer. Well, Mr. Freeman,
you look as if nothing could fatigue you; and
I have seen the time when I thought no more
of walking a dozen miles, than I do now of
creeping as many rods. I remember when I
marched with General Starke to Bennington
that was the first time I went as a soldier. I
was then just twenty, and I carried my gun
and ammunition, and a huge knapsack,
containing
clothing and provisions, for my kind
mother was very much afraid I should suffer
with hunger; and I marched with all that load
about forty miles in one day, and never thought
of complaining.'
`You had then a glorious object in view to
animate your spirit,' said Horace Freeman.
`Yes, and we obtained it,' replied the old
gentleman, briskly, sitting upright in his chair;
`and the country is now enjoying the reward
of our labors and sufferings. Those were
dark days,' he continued, with the air of one
who is endeavouring to recall ideas of scenes
and feelings long past, and almost forgotten.
`Dark days and perilous times for America,
Mr. Freeman;and the events of that period
cannot be too often related to the rising
generation
.'
He paused, and seemed gathering strength
and breath for a long harangue, and the young
people expected the history of his three
campaigns
.
Horace Freeman had heard the whole
just six times over, and Maria at least sixty
but she was never tired of listening to her
grandfather, and Horace, if he might but look
on her, could listen very patiently.
It is probable the old gentleman noticed the
glances interchanged by the lovers, and that
they recalled forcibly to his mind some
passages
in his early lifeat least it might have
been so inferred, as the circumstances he
proceeded
to narrate he had never before been
heard to mention.
Captain Blake resumed`It is easy for you
young men to imagine the deeds of valor you
should have performed, had you lived in the
days that tried men's soulsbut it is not in
the battle that the heart or courage is most
severely tested. Indeed there are but few
men who feel any fear to fight when once the
engagement has begun; 'tis the anticipation
of the combat that makes cowards, and
sometimes
brave men tremble. But the most
painful
moment of a soldier's life, at least of those
who have a dear home and kind friends, is
when they part from them. I said the
expedition
under General Starke was the first I
joined
.
When the news of the Lexington battle
arrived, I was eager to be a soldierbut my
father objected. `No, my son,' he said, `you
are not yet arrived at your full strength, and
the country requires the assistance of men. I
will go.' And he went, and fought at Bunker
Hilland in the retreat across Charlestown
neck he was wounded by a cannon ball from
the British man of war. The ball shattered
his right knee, and amputation was found
necessary
.
It was some time before he could be
brought home, and he never recovered his
former
health. My father was a poor, but a very
respectable man; for in those days the display
of wealth was not necessary to make a man
respected. Good sense, industry, economy
and piety were passports to the best society
among the descendants of the pilgrims. My
father possessed all these requisites; and,
moreover, his reputation for personal courage
and tried patriotism was firmly established,
for who could doubt either, when his harangues,
justifying the proceedings of Congress and
condemning the British ministry, were always
followed by a vivid description of the Bunker
Hill battle, and the pain he endured from his
wound; the whole closed by the solemn
declaration
,
that his greatest anxiety and distress,
during the whole operation on his limb, arose
from the conviction that he was for the future
incapacitated from taking an active part in
defending
the liberty of his country. My father
had one enemy and opponent. This was a
man by the name of Saunders, our nearest
neighbour. They moved into the wilderness
together, and it might have been expected that
mutual hardships would have made them
mutual
friends. But, in the first place, there was
no similarity of mind or temper between them
and in the second place, Saunders married
a rich wife; giving him an advantage in point
of property, which he was very fond of
displaying
.
My father, though various untoward
accidents
kept him poor, was nevertheless proud,
and knew his own abilities were far superior
to those of his neighbour; and so, the more
ostentatiously
Saunders displayed his wealth, the
more contemptuously my father treated his
opinions. There was scarcely a point on
which they agreed; and when the troubles
between
Great Britain and the Colonies
commenced
,
they immediately took different sides;
my father was a flaming whig, and it was
perhaps
as much to avoid being termed a follower
of his, for my father always took the lead in
town meetings,as from principle, that
Saunders
declared himself for the government.
It would be a curious inquiry to trace the
operation of the causes that have contributed
to establish those principles, which men often
boast of having adopted solely from a
conviction
of their truth and usefulness. How much
of personal convenience, of private pique, of
selfishness, envy, anger or ambition, would be
found to mingle in the motives of the patriot
and the politician! But this we will not now
discuss. My father was a firm friend of his
country, and a fervent christian; but he had,
like other good men, his infirmities; and among
them, perhaps none was more conspicuous
than a persevering habit of advancing his own
sentiments on almost every occasion, and a
dogmatical obstinacy in defending them. And
he availed himself to the utmost of the
advantage
which the popularity of his own opinions
gave him over his adversary. Though I
embraced
with enthusiasm my father's political
sentiments, yet one reason made me regret,
very much, the animosity that seemed every
day more bitter, between him and Mr.
Saunders
.
There was a fair girl in the case, and I
was just at the age when the affections of the
heart are most warm and romantic. Mary
Saunders was not an extraordinary beauty: I
have seen fairer girls than she; but I never
saw one whose expression of countenance
was more indicative of purity of mind and
sweetness of temper. But you can judge for
yourself, Mr. Freeman, for Maria here is her
very imageall but the eyes. Mary Saunders
had black eyes; and black is, in my opinion,
much the handsomest color for the eye, and
generally the most expressive. Maria's eyes,
you see, are bluedo, my love, look upbut
their expression is very much like her
grandmother's
eyes.'
Horace Freeman was doubtless very glad
of an opportunity of examining, and that too
by the permission of her guardian, the eyes
of the girl he adored; but her confusion and
blushes admonished him that the indulgence
of his passion was fraught with pain to the
object
of his affection, and he endeavoured to
change the conversation to the subject of the
battle of Bennington.
`You observed, you accompanied General
Starke,' said he to the old man; `were you
present when the tories under Baum were
defeated?'
`Was I?' returned the old gentleman, his
eyes flashing with the keenness of youthful
ardor
`I
guess I was, and I believe I have told
you the whole story; nevertheless I will
detail
it again, some time, as I find you like to
hear such accounts, as indeed all sensible
young men do; but now I was intending more
particularly to tell my own feelings and views
when I first left home. Accounts of battles are
quite common, but we seldom read or hear a
description of that warfare of mind which every
soldier must undergo when he, for the first
time, girds himself and goes forth to fight.
I said I loved Mary Saunders, and she
returned
my affection; but the difficulties, every
day increasing, between our families,
threatened
to prevent our intercourse. Mr.
Saunders
was the first to object, and he intimated
that my father encouraged the match,
notwithstanding
his pretended aversion to tories,
because
he thought it advantageous. This
accusation
kindled my father's anger to a high
degree, for nothing roused his spirit like a
charge of meannessand so he absolutely
prohibited me from seeing or speaking to
Mary
,
or corresponding with her in any manner.
How absurdly our passions are often allowed
to control our reason and judgment, and even
our inclination. At the time when Mary and
I were thus positively forbidden to meet
had our fathers spoken their real sentiments, I
am persuaded they would both of them have
approved our affection for each other. I was
always a favorite with Mr. Saunders, and as
Mary was an only child, and had no
companion
at home, she had passed much of her time
with my sisters, and my parents had seemed
equally fond of her as of their own daughters.
But now all intercourse between the families
was annihilated, and for us to have met, would
have been considered a great crime.
Party spirit was then, and always will be,
wherever indulged, the bane of society and
good neighbourhood. But the peculiar
circumstances
in which the whigs were placed
justified
,
in some measure, the asperity they
cherished
against all denominated tories. There
are some nowadays that write histories of that
war, and pretend to describe the feelings and
spirit that then pervaded America, but this
cannot be done. There was at that time
agitation
in the minds of men which words can
never describe. The uncertainty that hung
over the destiny of our country, the exertions
and sacrifices that all good patriots felt must
be made before success could be hoped for
the possibility of a failure, and a dread of
the consequences that must ensue, all these
thoughts pressed on the soul, filling it with an
indescribable anxiety and gloom. But though
there was, sometimes, in the mind of the
firmest
and most determined patriot, doubt, there
was seldom dismay. He considered the
principles
for which he contended so important,
and the prize so glorious, that even though
assured that he could not have succeeded, he
would not have yielded. `Give me liberty
or give me death!' was not the motto of
Patrick
Henry only,thousands of our citizens
subscribed to the same sentiment. I
remember
when the news of the approach of
Burgoyne's
army, and the retreat of the Americans
from Ticonderoga, reached us. We were at
dinner when a messenger, sent by General St.
Clair, to rouse the inhabitants of
New-Hampshire
to come to the assistance of the
retreating
army, entered our house abruptly,
without
even the ceremony of rapping at the door.
The dress of the man showed him to be a
soldier
,
and his countenance displayed such deep
concern, that my father seemed instantly to
guess his errand. He dropped his knife and
fork, and turning his chair so as to face the
messenger, demanded his news. I was always
something of a physiognomist, and while the
man related the disasters that had befallen our
troops, and described the numbers and
appearance
of the British army, I watched my
father's
features, and never did I see such an
expression as his then displayed. During the
first part of the recital there was an eagerness,
an agitation, a quivering of the lips and
eye-lids
,
that showed the deep, even painful
sympathy
he felt for the embarrassments of the
American generalbut when the royal
commander
was named, his brow instantly
contracted
,
his eye dilated, every muscle of his
face grew rigid as with determined resolve,
and the stern expression of his features
seemed
bidding defiance to the whole British army.
At length, while the man was proceeding to
describe the proud array of the invading foe,
and the number of the Indian allies, my
father
suddenly struck his clenched hand on the
table, with a force and clatter that made all
the children instantly start from their seats,
while he exclaimed`O! if it had only been
God's will that I should have kept my leg, I
would soon be on the ground and show them
red coats the metal of a Yankee.' I caught
his eye as he ceased, and there was an instant
change in his countenance. I presume he
noticed the eagerness of my look, for there
was nothing on earth, except to see Mary, that
I then longed so much to do as to become a
soldier. This my father had never appeared
willing to permit. He could face danger
without
shrinking, but he trembled for me. I
urged
my wishes to go. He appeared for a few
moments irresolutedrew his hand twice
across his forehead, and then calmly said
`My son, you may go. The crisis demands
the sacrifice of all selfish and private feelings
on the part of AmericansYou shall go.'
To know the whole merit of the sacrifice my
father then made, it will be necessary to state
that I was the eldest of eleven children, all
girls, excepting myself and the youngest babe.
My father was not able to do any laborit was
in the month of July, when the farmer has,
necessarily
,
so much business on his hands, and
yet I am persuaded there was not one
self-interested
motive, excepting his fears of the
danger
to which I would be exposed, that caused
his hesitation.
It is impossible, in these days of peace and
plenty, to estimate truly the generous, devoted,
self-denying spirit that was exhibited during
the revolution. The thirst for private gain,
that is now so engrossing, was then a feeble
passion, compared with the ardor to promote
the public good; and the final success of our
arms is mainly to be attributed to the virtue
and patriotism of the people. We had, to be
sure, a commander worthy of our cause and
country, one undoubtedly designed and
prepared
by Heaven for the task he performedbut
then, his powers and those of the Congress
were so limited, he never would have
succeeded
,
but for the zealous and spontaneous
co-operation
of our citizens. But I am wandering
from the subject of my own feelings,' he
continued
,
smiling, `as indeed I am very apt to
do whenever I begin to think, or speak of the
public excitement. But to comprehend
rightly
an old man's story, you must allow him to
tell it in his own way. Often when he appears
to wander the most widely from his purpose, it
is not that he forgets it, but because so many
circumstances, which he thinks important,
connected
with the event he would relate, press
on his mind, that he fears you will not get a
right understanding of his subject, unless he
relates all those circumstances. It is not so
often from loss of memory that the aged are
garrulous, as from remembering too much.
It was settled I should depart next morning,
and all was bustle to prepare me for the
expedition
.
My father would himself inspect and arrange
my military equipments. I had an excellent
rifle, and a sufficient quantity of powder, but no
bulletsbut that deficiency was soon
supplied
.
My mother tendered her pewter basons,
and we manufactured a sufficient quantity of
shot to kill a whole regiment. My mother
also packed among my clothes a huge roll
of linen, for bandages, remarking as she did
so, that she hoped I would not need it, but
I might perhaps have it in my power to bind
up the wounds of some poor creature. At
that time the soldier had often to carry about
him his hospital, as well as magazine. During
all this my parents neither shed a tear nor
uttered
a desponding word; they even
reproved
my sisters for weeping, saying, that tears
should be reserved for the deadthat they
ought to rejoice they had a brother capable
and willing to defend his country and family
from the ruthless savages; and that God would
not suffer the injustice of their oppressors long
to triumph, if every American did his duty.
In the mean time, my own mind was suffering
a severe conflict. I did not fear the battleI
longed to engage in the fight; but there was
something in this preparation for wounds and
death, that could not but be somewhat
appalling
to one who had always lived in the
security
and shelter of home. I reflected on the
possibility
that I might never see that home again.
All the kindness and affection of my parents
and sisters, came fresh to my mind. The
happy
circle we had always formed around the
fireside would be broken, and I knew there
would be mourning for me. But there was
one
who I thought would weep bitter tears. I
had not seen Mary, excepting at church, for
more than six months; but I gathered from
the expression of her countenance, that her
regard
for me was unaltered. She had doubtless
suffered more from the separation than I.
Women
are more constant in their attachments
than men, and they have fewer employments
and resources to vary the current of their
thoughts, and a disappointment of the heart is
to them a constantly corroding sorrow. Mary
had grown very pale and thin, and when I
gazed
on her as she joined in singing the praises
of God, I had often felt as if she must soon be
transferred to a happier world. And I had
sometimes taxed my father with cruelty and
injustice, in separating us, though, at the same
time, I respected the high minded integrity
that dictated the command; but I had never
thought of disobeying him. He had in his
look and manner, that kind of authority which
seems to be delegated from Heaven, and which
will not brook to be disregarded; such as we
may imagine distinguished the patriarchs. Our
pilgrim ancestors possessed this domestic
authority
in an eminent degree; and their
descendants
for several generations inherited it, though
less dignifiedbut it now seems to be nearly
extinct. Whether it was on the whole, more
4
favorable to human improvement in virtue and
happiness, than the present
reasoning
manner
of family government, is a question I have
never
seen decided. I wish some one qualified
for the task would give us their opinion on the
subject. But to return to Mary, from whom
my thoughts then seldom wandered. I could
not endure the idea of leaving home without
seeing her. I went to my fatherI trembled
in every joint, and the sweat started in large
drops on my forehead, but nevertheless I
retained
sufficient firmness to tell him I must
and would see Mary; that I wished for his
consent to visit her, and that perhaps it was
the last request I should ever make him; and
then I added, that if I lived to return, I would
still be as obedient to his commands as I had
hitherto been. How I summoned sufficient
courage to tell him so much, was afterwards to
me a matter of astonishment; it might be that
I felt rather more boldness from knowing I was
soon to be a soldier.
I believe my father's first impulse was to
rebuke
and refuse me, for he assumed one of his
stern looks that always quelled all opposition
but luckily for us both, he looked in my face,
and I suspect he became sensible I was not in
a state to bear rebuke or disappointment. His
first words were, `Do you wish to be friends
with the enemies of your country, with
traitors
?'
I said, Nobut that Mary was not an enemy
of her country.
`But her father is,' he replied, `and children
do adopt, indeed they ought to adopt, the
opinions
of their parents.'
`Not if they think that opinion wrong,' said
I. `And I have told you before that Mary
does not approve her father's sentiments, and
that she ought not to be judged and
condemned
on his account.'
`I know,' he replied, `that you think
favorably
of her. At your age this is not strange,
but remember, that though I do not forbid your
seeing her, if you insist upon it, I warn you of
the consequences. The path of duty is now
plain before you; it is to fight manfully for
liberty and independence. You seem to have
such strength and courage given you, as we
may hope will bear you up; but if you join
hands with those who are wishing to riot in the
blood of their country, you will probably be
forsaken by Him who is the God of battles.'
There was in my father's manner a
solemnity
that awed me, but still his prophetic
warning
had no effect to deter me from my purpose
of seeing Mary. I knew, what my father
would not credit, that she was an enthusiast in
the cause of her country, though the mildness
and modesty of her disposition, and respect for
her parent, restrained her from openly
expressing
her sentiments. Indeed, it is worthy of
notice that during the whole war, the
American
women were almost universally patriots;
and they encountered their full share of
privation
and suffering, and that too with a
cheerfulness
and fortitude that often infused courage
and vigor into the hearts of the almost
desponding
soldiery. And they not only submitted to
separations from their friends without
murmuring
,
but they exerted themselves to provide
for their families at home, by performing much
of the labor and business that usually devolves
on the men. A volume of anecdotes might be
collected of the heroism and devotion to
freedom
,
manifested by the ladies during that
period
.
There were wives, and mothers, and
sisters, who encouraged and assisted to
prepare
for the battle, those they held dearest on
earth. And there were maidens who animated
their betrothed lovers for the fight. I was
confident
Mary was not deficient in this generous
self-denying spirit, and I had no fear she would
exert her power over me by endeavouring to
dissuade me from going into the army. I did
not then hesitate a moment on my own account;
but I had to procure the consent of her father,
as well as mine, for the meeting. I wrote to
Mr. Saunders, and very respectfully requested
permission to visit his daughter, stating my
reasons, and that my father had consented. I
afterwards learned it was that which made Mr.
Saunders object. He would agree to nothing
that my father approved. He wrote me a
very cool and provoking answer, in which he
took care to repeat all the account of
Burgoyne's
success, and warn me against joining
in a sinking cause; and he concluded by
declaring he would not allow one who was
intending to fight against his sovereign to visit
at his house, and that his daughter entirely
agreed with him in opinion. I was never so
disappointed in my life, and I do not remember
that I was ever more angry. The more so
perhaps, because my father seemed to enjoy
my chagrin. I did not believe Mary was thus
indifferent about seeing me; but still a young
man scarce twenty, and a lover beside, is not
usually the most reasonable being under the
sun. I thought of a thousand things, and
imagined
a thousand improbable events. These
were some of my fancies. If the enemy should
succeed, Saunders would doubtless join the
victorious army, at least, he would wish to pay
his compliments to Burgoyne; and he might
take Mary with him; and I was too deeply in
love to imagine any person could see her with
indifference. And then I thought it probable
some English officer would admire her, and
succeed in gaining her handand then I felt
as if I could annihilate the whole British host.
While I was indulging in one of these
paroxysms
of feeling, a boy who lived with Mr.
Saunders appeared at the end of the lane
leading
to our house. I knew him in a moment,
although it was nearly dark, and hastened to
meet him. He brought me a letter from
Mary
.
I know you expect I treasured that
letter
in my mind, and remember it nowand
though it may sound rather silly to hear an old
man like me, saying over his love-letters, I will
repeat it. It had been begun with `Dear
Samuel,'but those words had been scratched
out, though not so entirely but I could trace
them. The next beginning was`Worthy
Friend, I have just seen a letter you sent my
father, and from what he has told me, I fear
you will think I am ungrateful and have
forgotten
you. But this I never shall do. I
think of you almost constantly, and pray that
you may be directed in the path of duty. I
believe you are now pursuing it. I feel that
our country needs aid, and wish I could
render
it. But that is out of my power; but if
prayers and tears could avail to save you from
harm, I would offer them daily. I do not say
this to discourage you, but to show you that I
approve your determination to be a soldier.
May God shield you.Mary Saunders.
`P. S. I hope you will not forget me.'
`Such was the letter, word for word,'
continued
the old man. `I remember it well, for
I carried it three years in a little pocket book,
and read it pretty often, as you doubtless guess.
It was at the time a precious treasure, for it
assured me of Mary's affection, and that she
approved my being a soldier, and perhaps I
departed with a lighter heart than I should
have done had we actually met.
Early the next morning every thing was
prepared, and the family all attended while my
father made a most fervent and impressive
prayer. I observed that he dwelt more
earnestly
on the salvation of his country, and
prayed
more heartily that the men who were going
forth might have strength and resolution given
them to conquer their proud and cruel enemies,
than he did that they might be saved from
danger
and returned in safety. When he
concluded
,
he took my hand; the pride of a soldier
was in his eye as he glanced over my military
equipments, but I observed a moisture there;
and when he spoke, it was in a sharp, quick
tone, as if he feared to trust the expression of
his feelings, and even felt angry with himself
for indulging them. `Sam,' said he, wringing
my hand as he spoke. `Sam, remember your
duty. Your country now requires your
services
;
and next to your duty to God, your
country's
claims are sacred. Go, and fight
manfully
for liberty. Remember it is better to die
free than live a slave. Go, and God bless
you.'
`Samuel,' said my mother, taking my hand
in both of hers, and pressing it tenderly, while
the tears gushed from her eyesI had not
seen her weep before. `Samuel, your father
has told you what is your duty, and I know
you will do it. I shall pray for you, and if you
are hurt, remember the bandages and salve.
I have put some salve into your pack, that is
very excellent for wounds. Heaven keep you
farewell.'
I do not particularly remember what my
sisters said, nor indeed distinctly anything
else that passed, till I found myself on the
brow of a hill that overlooked the farm of my
father, and part of that belonging to Mr.
Saunders
.
I paused there, and looked back on the
scene I had left. The sun had not risen, but
the eastern sky, as if preparing for his coming,
was kindled up with those beautiful hues that
the light of noonday never imparts. I saw the
green woods stretching away on every side till
they blended with the blue of the distant
mountains
.
In those woods I had hunted many a
time. I heard the birds singing their
morning
songs; all spoke of peace except the shrill
cry of the jay, and that sounded in my ear like
a call to battle. Beneath me lay the fields I
had traversed so oftenthe windings of the
little brook, the boundary that divided the
estate
of my father from that of his tory
neighbor
,
were easily to be traced by the mist that
hung over it; and I could distinctly see the
favorite fishing place where I had passed many
happy hours. And then there was the home
in which I was born, and the trees in whose
shade I had so often played with my sisters
and, in the small meadow, a seat beneath an
old elm, where Mary and I had often met.
I saw all these, and the recollections they
awakened, and the thought that, in all
probability
,
I should never see that spot, and those
objects, and my dear family, and Mary, again,
came so painfully on my heart that my
fortitude
was overcome, and I wept and even
sobbed
aloud. I was in the battle at Bennington
I fought at SaratogaI was one of the
twenty
under the command of Lieutenant Knox at
the capture of Stoney PointI have been
wounded, and a prisoner. I have heard
bullets
whistle as they fell like hail, and seen men
dropping around me like leaves in autumn, and
I have been in want of a crust of bread, but I
never felt that fear, that utter despondency,
that misgiving of spirit, which I endured when
taking my leave of home.'
`But you did return, my dear grandfather,'
said Maria, wiping her eyes. `You did see
that home again?'
`Yes,' he replied, `I returned to dwell there,
and I married Mary; but, it was after my
constitution
was broken by fatigue and hardship,
and my arm rendered, as you see, nearly
useless
by a fracture in the elbow. Nor had
Mary
been exempt from sorrow and suffering.
The chagrin her father endured in being, as
he was, confined to his farm, and knowing
himself
the object of suspicion, hatred, and
contempt
of his neighbours, and the
disappointment
he felt at the failure of the British army,
whose triumph he had so confidently predicted,
all these things troubled him, and finally
undermined
his health. He fell into a
consumption
;
but before he died, he renounced his tory
principles, and my father and he became
reconciled
,
and he consented I should marry
Mary
.
And so when I returned from my last
campaign, where I was disabled, by this wound
in my arm, from further service, Mary was
the first to welcome me. But O! how pale
and thin she looked. You young people have
no experience, and can hardly form an idea of
the trials we had endured. But we had the
satisfaction of thinking our country would be
free and independent; and it is so: and yet
few, in these days of peace and prosperity,
seem to remember that their freedom and
privileges
were purchased by the sweat, and toils,
and blood, of the old soldier.'
5
THE
WEDDING AND THE FUNERAL.
`O, thou invisible spirit of
brandy
, if thou hast no name to be
known by, let us call thee
murderer!
'
Shakspeare
.
There
was a great bustle in the village of
B when James Murray, Esq. was married
to Lucy Marsh. Weddings are always,
especially
by the ladies, considered important
occasions; and the marriage of a rich and
distinguished
young man with the most beautiful
and amiable girl the country could boast,
afforded
matter of description for many a tea
party
,
and speculation for many a fireside. `They
tell me the furnishing of the house cost James
all of three thousand dollars,' said Mrs.
Colvin
;
`I wonder what his father, poor man,
would say, were he living, to see such
extravagance
and waste!'
`Waste do you call it?' said Miss Lucretia
Crane, elevating her long neck as she gave her
head a most supercilious toss`Why, it is
nothing more than is necessary, if one intends
living genteelly in the country; they would
hardly call it decent in Boston. The only
thing that gives me any uneasiness, is, that
Lucy will not understand how to arrange her
furniture and order her table in good style.
A great deal depends on being accustomed to
such thingsand though Lucy has had a
tolerably
good education, she is not highly
accomplished
,
and has never had her taste improved
by mingling among fashionable society. And
her parents were so poor she could not learn
much at home.'
`She learned to work,' observed Mr. Colvin,
dryly`and that, allow me to say, Miss Crane,
if not a
high
accomplishment, is an
indispensable
one for every American lady. It is true,
the wife of James Murray appears to be placed
above the necessity of exertion; but sudden
changes of property are more common among
men of his vocation than any other; indeed,
changes in every station frequently occur, and
that parent who does not accustom his children
to reflect on a probability of a reverse, and, to
the best of his ability, qualify them to support
it, is, in my opinion, not only weak but cruel.
Lucy is not, I fear, in spirit, very well
calculated
to bear misfortunesshe is too tender
and confidingbut she has always been an
industrious
girl.'
`It might have been better for her to have
kept to her needle, and married John Russell,
as I am well convinced she was once engaged
to do'replied Miss Lucretia, with that kind
of laugh which betrays both envy of a rival,
and exultation at the prospect of seeing her
mortified.`I have been told'she continued
in a low but eager whisper, `I have been told
that James does not always conduct like the
gentleman he pretends to be.'
`We should be cautious of trusting reports
affecting the character of our neighbours,' said
Mrs. Colvin, forgetting that she had began the
scrutiny by taxing James with extravagance.
`James is a generous, intelligent, and
agreeable
gentleman, and his talents do honor to our
village. What did you ever hear to his
disadvantage
?'
`O they do say he has been known to take
a little drop too muchat particular times
when in wild company. At least my brother
heard he did so when in college,' replied Miss
Crane.
`It cannotmust not be true,' said Mr.
Colvin
,
hastily. `James was piously brought up
he has had excellent advantages, and possesses
good judgment and a quickness of penetration
rarely equalled. He is also ambitious of
obtaining
the confidence of the people, and the
honors of public office. He will never yield to
that most brutalizing vice which degrades men.'
`I have good reason for believing he has
been guilty of it,' said Lucretia, composedly.
`But perhaps there is no reason to fear, as his
lovely wife will doubtless reform him.'
`Such reforms are seldom radical; and never,
I fear, with men of his temperament,' remarked
Mr. Colvin.`But ten years will decide.'
`O, if James does turn out a profligate, how
I shall pity his mother!' said Mrs. Colvin,
sighing
.
`I shall pity his wife,' said Miss Lucretia
Crane, adjusting her ruffles with an air of great
self-complacency.
`I shall pity him,' said Mr. Colvin rising
hastily and traversing the apartment with the
perturbation of one who has heard some evil
reported openly which he had long suspected,
but had been striving to disbelieve.
The real concern of Mr. and Mrs. Colvin,
and the affected sympathy of Miss Crane, were
interrupted by the approach of the bridal
cavalcade
.
In an elegant carriage, drawn by two
noble grays, sat the new-married pair. They
were arrayed in costly apparel, and both
possessed
that beauty of form and face which,
bearing the impress of nature's nobleness, is
not dependent on ornament for its power of
commanding admiration. A long line of
carriages
followed, from which manly faces,
beaming
with exultation, or fair ones blushing at the
thoughts of their own loveliness, looked forth;
the gay laugh was distinctly heard as the
vehicles
rolled rapidly along, and no one, not even
a cynic, could have regarded the scene
without
feeling a sentiment of joy and gratitude
pervading his heart at thus witnessing the
perfection
of social happiness.
`What a comely couple they are!' exclaimed
Mrs. Colvin, as the carriage containing the
bridal pair drew up before a new and elegant
mansion`and what a prospect of domestic
felicity
is theirs. But few begin the world thus
advantageously. They have health and
beauty
,
wealth and reputation, and friends, and
affection
for each other.'
`Could you add one item more to the
catalogue
of advantages, the earthly picture would
be complete,' said Mr. Colvin. `How
unfortunate
that the absence of that one requisite,
may, perhaps, render all the others nugatory.'
`You then probably have reason to credit
the report to which I alluded,' said Miss Crane.
`I did not mean to be so understood,' said
Mr. Colvin, calmly. `All that I intended was,
that
self-control
, in every station and to every
individual, is indispensable, if people would
retain
that equanimity of mind, which, depending
on self-respect, is the essential of contentment
and happiness.'
Miss Crane reddened, for she felt she had
been displaying before one well skilled to read
character, the meanness of envy and anger,
while revealing a report confided to her under
the solemn injunction of secrecy, and which
she would never have pretended to have
credited
,
but for the pique she felt at not being
bidden to the wedding.
Indeed, no one who looked on James
Murray
,
could believe him guilty of aught mean or
vicious. He had that noble ingenuousness of
countenance which we always, in idea,
associate
with great and good qualities; (but we do
not in the world always find our expectations
realized
)
and he had also that air of manly
confidence
which usually distinguishes those who
have always been the favorites of fortune, and
consequently think themselves privileged to
expect her favors. Yet his was not the triumph
which the vanity of superior wealth imparts to
the weak minded. He had talents of a high
order. He had also been liberally educated,
and had he been permitted to study a
profession
,
would probably have become eminent.
But his father, a rich merchant, wished his
son to pursue the same business; it was the
way he had acquired his estate, and he thought
it the way in which James would best preserve
it. But the old gentleman did not act with his
usual sagacity when he sent his son to college to
qualify him the better to become a merchant.
There is a fitness in the manner of educating
to the character and destination of the
educated
,
an adaptation of means to some
contemplated
end, which should never be lost sight of
by those who have the care of youth. James
had good sense, and a fine genius, and had he
considered the studies in which he spent so
much time preparatory to some pursuit which
was to be the business of his future life, he
would doubtless have applied himself more
diligently, and thus been spared many
opportunities
for frolic, and saved from many
temptations
to folly which those who are idle or
unemployed cannot escape. He knew, and all
his fellow students, that he was sent to college
to obtain a diploma more as an ornamental
appendage
to a rich man's son, than for any real
benefit. So he passed his four years in gayety
and pleasure, and came home with his A. B. to
take his station in his father's counting-room.
He was then but nineteen, and many
supposed
his college acquirements and predilections
would soon be obliterated from his mind by the
bustling life in which he had engaged. But it
should be remembered that though the human
heart is like water when we would write
thereon
lessons of virtue, it is like the rock to
retain
the impressions of vice. In what I am
about to relate I would not be understood as
reflecting on the management of any literary
institution, or the manners of any particular
class of students. Opportunities and examples
of vice occur everywhereand the only
effectual
shield to oppose their influence, with
which parents can invest their dear ones, when
sending them forth amid the temptations of
evil, which will meet them in the college and
in the cloister, as well as in the camp and
court, is to imbue their souls with the precepts
of our holy religion, and furnish, for their
minds, at least, active employment. James
was strictly educated in the principles of true
pietyhis parents were, what they professed
to be, Christiansand though they had by
honest industry acquired a large estate, they
did not count their money merely by dollars
but by a better taleby the good deeds it
would enable them to perform. And they were
both remarkable for temperance, and the
simplicity
,
and even plainness, with which their
table was furnished and all their domestic
arrangements
conducted. James had not, as
some children unquestionably do, acquired a
relish for rum before he could lisp its name
his `nurse' never was allowed to keep him
`quiet on sweetened brandy'he had an
aversion
to spirituous liquors, as all, not taught
to love it, have; and so his parents had no
fear he would ever fall a victim to its
pernicious
poison. They exposed him too early,
and unguardedly, to temptation. He went to
college with plenty of cash at command, and
plenty of leisurehe was unsuspicious and
generous, and, as such lively and ardent youths
generally are, fond of amusements and fond
of applause. There were among his
classmates
,
some who had the meanness to wish to
be treated at his expense, and these took
advantage
of his inexperience and generosity
and by flattery, and ridicule, and persuasion,
his squeamish prejudices, as they called them,
were overcome, and he learned to take his
glass as gaily and frequently as any member
of the convivial club to which he belonged,
and often paid, himself, the whole expense of
the entertainment. It would be painful and
almost impossible to paint the scenes in which
he was often engaged, and the effect they had
on his mind; but yet, notwithstanding his
conduct
,
he never lost his sense of the purity and
beauty of virtue, nor his determination to
pursue
its paths, whenever circumstances should
make such a course easy and popularthat is
when he returned home.
But no one `can take fire in his bosom, and
his clothes not be burned.' James did return
home, and his father soon after discovered,
with a concern bordering on horror, the fatal
relish for liquors which his son had aquired.
The daughters of Mr. Murray were married,
and all of them gone from the paternal roof
James was the youngest childthe one who
was to perpetuate his father's namehis heir
his hope, and his idol. There lay the fault
of his parents. They had loved James too
well, and trusted him too confidently, and
expected
more from his discretion than human
frailty can warrant us to hope. Remonstrance
and reasoning, entreaties and reproaches,
were all in succession tried by his parents.
But though James ingenuously acknowledged
his fault and lamented it, and promised
reformation
,
he was found failing in strength of
purpose to keep his resolutions of abstaining
from brandy, till his father began utterly to
despair of his amendment, and was about
resigning
him to infamyfor, with commendable
discretion, his parents had managed for
nearly
a whole year to keep their son's misconduct
a profound secret in their family, lest the loss
of his good name should be the signal for his
losing all self-commandwhen a circumstance
occurred which promised, by awakening the
energy of a new passion, to grant him a chance
for victory over an appetite that had hitherto
wholly engaged his senses. James saw, and
immediately loved Lucy Marsh. Her father
was a very poor man, but beauty is not
necessarily
of the patrician order. It is as often
found in the cottage as the palace, and Lucy,
then just sixteen, was one of the loveliest girls
that ever the light of the sun shone upon. It
were in vain to try to describe her. A
Mahometan
would have likened her to the `dark
eyed Houris,'a christian lover to an `angel,'
and both undoubtedly have thought the
superiority
of loveliness on the side of the fair mortal.
At least, so thought James Murray on the
morning after his return from a ball, where he
had been permitted to touch for the first time
the hand of his charmer; to sit by her side;
and though the confusion of his feelings did not
permit him to say `soft things,' he had
nevertheless
looked `things unutterable.' He was
sitting with his head reclined upon his desk,
and musing upon the `scenes of yesterday,'
so wrapped in contemplation that he did not
hear his father's step, nor notice his approach,
till the old gentleman laid his hand upon his
shoulder. James started on his feet, the blood
rushed to his face, and he looked around with
a half stupid, half frighted stare. A shade of
deep sorrow passed over the pale countenance
of Mr. Murray, and his voice quivered with
emotion as he said`I am expecting my friend
Mr. Alden, of New-York, every moment. He
writes he shall dine with me to-day. I once
hoped to have presented to him my sonbut I
see you will not be in a condition to appear.
He will doubtless inquire for you, and what
excuse shall I make for your absence?'
James strove to reply, but it was some
minutes
before the swelling of his heart would
permit him to speak. At length he seemed to
have taken his resolution, and said with
energy
`I
know your suspicions, sir, but for once
you wrong me. Though I confess I am
intoxicated
,
it is not with wine'and then, with
an eloquence his father had never before heard
him display, he went on and told the whole
history
of his love, and described the beauty of
Lucy, concluding with an earnest asseveration,
`that if he might be permitted to marry her,
he would never taste another drop of liquor
again while he lived.'
Mr. Murray gazed on James with that kind
of eager and overwhelming joy which we may
imagine glowed on the face of the father of
the prodigal when witnessing the return of his
son. But in a few moments the expression of
his features changed, and a deep and troubled
concern overspread them as he said
impressively
`What
you ask, my son, neither my
honor or conscience will now permit me to
approve
.
I place interest out of the question.
The father of Lucy Marsh is a good, honest,
and industrious man; but he has met with
crosses
and losses in the world, while I have been
blessed and prosperous. We came into life
equally destitute, we shall leave it on equal
terms. Six feet of ground is all the richest
man will permanently occupy, and, at death,
the right of the poor to the possession of that
freehold is never disputed. But, James, you
describe Lucy as possessing every virtue of
mind and heart that constitutes the excellence
of the female character; and I have before this
heard her merits praised. Her husband should
be equally worthy. Are you entitled to that
distinction?'
The color deepened on James's cheek, but
it was not all the hue of shame; there was the
kindling of proud and ardent resolve to deserve
the boon he sought; and he urged his
determination
to be all that his father wished, so
earnestly and sincerely, that Mr. Murray could
not help feeling an assurance his son would, at
least, make a strong effort to overcome his evil
propensities. Still the father knew, for he had
been an observing man, how difficult it was to
effect a radical cure of the habit to which
James had yielded;that though love might
furnish arms, and the most effectual ones
perhaps
that could be wielded by a
young
man for
the combat, time only could determine the
victory
.
At length, after much pondering, he
said; `James, I have no doubt your intentions
of reform are sincere, but till I am convinced
of your perseverance in executing them, I
cannot
consent you shall address Lucy, or
endeavour
to gain her affections. She must not be
involved in the ruin which will finally
overwhelm
you if persisting in intemperance.'
`What period of trial will satisfy you?'
asked
James.
`As long for your recovery as for your fall.'
`What! four years!' exclaimed James;
understanding
the allusion of his father to the
time passed in college.
`Even so,' replied the other`and too short
a time to establish entirely my confidence in
your steadfastness. But pass that period in
activity and integrity, and I shall have strong
hope. I will myself speak to Mr. Marsh, and
if he consents to my proposal, I will provide
for the education of his daughter in such a
manner
as shall qualify her to become a member
of my family. But I shall inform her and her
parents unreservedly of your past course, and
present resolution, and she shall not be bound
by any promise to you till the four years are
expired.'
James knew when his father had come to
a determination, and settled a plan of action
on the principles of what he conceived
duty
,
neither arguments or persuasions could move
him from his purposeso James acquiesced.
Mr. Murray, though a good and judicious
man, was not indifferent to worldly
considerations
.
The business by which he had
acquired
his property has a tendency to make
calculation
,
and in some degree, even with the
most liberal, pecuniary speculation, a
favorite
pursuit of the mind. It is not probable he
would so unhesitatingly have approved the
choice of his son, and consented he should
marry one so poor, had he not hoped by that
indulgence to win him back to rectitude and
usefulness. But whatever were his motives,
his promise, once given, was promptly
executed
and sacredly kept.
The parents of Lucy Marsh eagerly
accepted
proposals so advantageous to their
daughter
,
for they doubted not but the folly of
James would soon be corrected. The
proposal
seemed to Lucy so like a scene of romance,
she could not, for some time, be persuaded of
its reality. She had been struck with the
appearance
of James Murray, and though his
station, so different from hers, had forbade her
to hope engaging his serious affections, yet
there had been, ever after the ball, wild
dreams of fancy in her imagination, which her
reason had been unable wholly to dispel.
When convinced she was destined to become
his wife, but one wish, one desire swelled her
heartthat she might become worthy of him
and of the excellent family who were adopting
her as their own.
To one not accustomed to reflect how much
of the excellence and virtue of character is
owing to energy in some favorite and useful
pursuit, the effect which this arrangement had
on James Murray would appear incredible.
He seemed to have shaken off an incubus that
had hitherto pressed down his faculties; or
only displayed them like the phantoms of that
disease, distorted and horrible. He walked
forth among men with a determination to
become
a man. He engaged in business with
activityhe pursued it with energy, and soon
felt that proud consciousness of deserving the
approbation he received, which nothing but
our own rectitude of principle and conduct can
bestow. Without this self-approving voice
within us, the applause of shouting millions is
idle, empty praise. There is so much of
real
excitement in the mode of life in Americaso
much industry and enterprise in businessso
much stirring of the spirit in political
canvassing
,
in which all are interested, that it would
seem no citizen of our republic need resort to
artificial stimulants to remove
`The settlings of a melancholy blood.'
Certain it is that James Murray found the
pursuits in which he engaged, of essential
benefit in breaking off the associations of his
habit, and thus freeing him from its tyranny.
Yet perhaps to that restlessness which his first
abstinence from liquor engendered, may mostly
be attributed the eagerness with which he
immediately
engaged in politics. For this
pursuit
he was, by nature, admirably fitted. His
commanding and handsome person always
attracted
attention, and he had a persuasive,
and whenever he chose to exert it, a powerful
voice, whose tones thrilled the heart. His
education
also had given him advantages which
but few of the men among whom he resided,
possessed, and young as he was, he soon
became
distinguished as the leader of his party,
and so effectually secured their confidence,
that before he was twenty three, he was elected
a member of the state legislature. His own
ambition and the fondest wishes of his parents
seemed realized; and his father, at his death,
which occurred about that time, as he
embraced
and blessed his son, said,`My cup of
earthly joy is fullI depart in peace, and
leave you, James, in the full belief that we
shall meet where a crown of rejoicing awaits
those who have overcome temptation.'
Death is called the king of terrorsbut may
he not often be the angel of consolation?
How much of mortal sorrow is spared or
ended
when he drops his sable curtain, and
closes
the drama of human life! Mr. Murray
died in peaceconfident of the worth of his
beloved son. Had he survived ten yearsbut
I am anticipating. In our country, especially
in the new and thinly settled towns, a man who
proposes marrying a wife, usually signifies his
intention by building a house; and
consequently
,
a new house is esteemed a very important
affair to the new married couple. It seemed
quite unnecessary that James should follow
this fashion, as his father left a good and
convenient
dwelling; but he was ambitious, and so
the new house was determined on. In size
and elegance it was to exceed any building in
the village.
`Americans have no taste for the antique,'
says the European antiquary, `therefore they
are rude and ignorant, and unpolished.' But
is it not the same principle of taste only
modified
by the difference of circumstances, which
leads the American to boast of his new edifice,
and the European to venerate his ancient one?
In both cases the pride of preference is
associated
with the idea of merit. The European
prizes his old castle because it is blazoned
with the feats of his ancestors. The
American
prefers his new dwelling because it is the
work of his own efforts; the one describes the
magnificence that once distinguished his
domain
the
other shows the improvement he has
made on his estate. And if personal merit be
more praiseworthy than imputed excellence,
then is not the advantage on the side of our
countrymen?
But these remarks are quite irrelevant to
the subjectthe new house of James Murray;
6
yet it would undoubtedly have been better for
him to have cultivated a taste for the antique,
and been contented with his father's old
dwelling
.
It was during the progress of the
building
that, forgetting or disregarding the solemn
promise he had pledged his father, he again
began to taste the prohibited brandy. He
took but very little, however, and flattered
himself he had acquired sufficient strength of
mind to restrain and regulate his appetite by
the suggestions of reason. It seemed a
reproach
on his character as a man, to lack
firmness
to face his enemy. It was puerile to be
always trembling, like a whipped schoolboy,
when a glass was offered him; and finally, he
could not refuse without being considered
mean, as his workmen would imply he did not
wish them to drink, if he himself never tasted.
So he reasoned, and for several months no
perceptible bad effects followed his `
temperate
use of ardent spirit,' as he styled it.
About three weeks before he was to be
married
,
a political bet, in which he was engaged,
was decided in his favor. The forfeiture was
to be paid in punch, and James Murray became
intoxicated. While under the delirium of his
temporary insanity, he presented himself
before
his intended bride.
Lucy Marsh was just as lovely as a summer
rose, and just as easily bowed. She had
never
suspected James of having violated his
promise
she
was utterly unprepared for this storm
of afflictionshe did not utter a word to him,
but fainted; and he had to be forced from her
presence, and carried home. The tumult of
his feelings, on recovering from his paroxysm,
can scarcely be imagined. After bitter
self-reproaches
and curses on his folly, and
resolutions
of the most rigid abstinence in future, he
repaired to the dwelling of Lucy to obtain, if
possible, her forgiveness. He knew she was
then released from all obligations to marry him
that his father had advised, indeed enjoined
it on her, as she valued her own happiness,
never to wed his son if he again yielded to
intemperance
.
But James knew Lucy loved
him, and he knew, too, that women are prone
to palliate the failings, and trust the promises
of those they love; that they are, by nature,
unsuspicious, and confiding, and forgiving.
The event showed he judged rightly. Reason
urged to Lucy all the risk she was incurring;
imagination portrayed all the sorrows and
agonies
she was exposed to suffer, if James did
not reform, and hope could hardly be so
credulous
as to believe in his permanent
reformation
,
when he had thus broken the solemn and
voluntary pledge to his own father. But still,
her heartO, she could not stifle the
pleadings
of her heart. And when James came
before her, his tears, and entreaties, and
protestations
prevailed. She forgave him, and
became his wife. She did not insist on his
making
to her any particular promises of sobriety;
and in that she acted wisely. The teasing
interference
of a woman, no man of sense and
spirit will brooknone ought to brook. And
Lucy had too much discretion to expect that
a promise of temperance made before
marriage
,
would bind her husband, if the sacred
vows he made at the altar to cherish her, the
preservation of his own character, and
reverence
for morality and piety, could not restrain
him. She trusted, therefore, to his affection
and his honor, and for more than two years his
conduct fully justified her confidence.
Mrs. Colvin was reclining one cold winter
evening before a bright fire, her work table
before
her, and as she listened to the storm that
beat furiously against the windows, and her eye
wandered around the commodious and well
furnished apartment in which she was seated,
she reflected on the blessings she enjoyed;
and contrasting her situation with millions of
her fellow-beings, in different parts of the
world, all equally with herself susceptible of
pain and pleasure, she breathed a fervent
thanksgiving that she had had her birthright
and habitation assigned her in a land so
favored
as America. Her husband hastily entered.
`You look fatigued and sorrowful,' said Mrs.
Colvin.
`I have just come from the dwelling of
affliction
,'
he replied.
`O, I knew this was a world of suffering!'
exclaimed Mrs. Colvin; `and yet I have
been this whole hour indulging in
congratulations
on my own happy situation, and inferring
because I felt no grief, no privation, all my
neighbours were equally blessed.'
`When,' replied her husband, `men yield to
temptation, to sinsuffering must follow.
Indeed
in our country, more than in any other
on earth, deviations from morality and
integrity
are punished either with the loss of fame,
fortune, or public confidence;and James
Murray has forfeited them all.'
`Is his situation as bad as we have heard?'
inquired Mrs. Colvin.
`Worse, far worse,' returned the other.
`We heard he would probably have sufficient
to pay his creditors, but he is a bankrupt by
several thousands, the mortgage on his estate
is foreclosed, and every article of personal
property has been attached; the sheriff was
removing the furniture when I reached the
house.'
`Is it possible that he can have spent the
large estate his father left him?' inquired Mrs.
Colvin. `It is but a little timea year or
two, since he became so dissipated.'
`There is nothing more easy than for a man
to ruin himself,' returned her husband. `Let
him neglect his business, bet with every one
who will venture a wager, and generally take
the losing side, and keep constantly in a state
of inebriety, and his estate will soon be wasted.
But James Murray was never so rich as many
imagined. Much of his wealth depended, as
most of our country merchants' estates do, on
his credit; and then he built his costly house,
which he ought not to have done. And he has
been intemperate longer than you mentioned;
ever since he lost his election four years ago.
His wife told me he never tasted liquor after
their marriage, till that disappointment. But
his relish for spirit had been before acquired,
and when a man has unfortunately
contracted
that thirst, every extraordinary emotion,
whether of joy or grief, or anger, seems to
awaken it anew. There is not, for such an
one, much hope of permanent reformation.'
`Where is his poor wife? and how does she
bear her trial?' asked Mrs. Colvin.
`I found her in her small parlourher little
children gathered around or in her armslike
a brooding dove sheltering her young ones
from the approach of danger. Her face was
pale as marble, but perfectly calm; yet at the
first expression of my concern she burst into
a passionate weeping. I endeavoured to
console
her, and promised my assistance. She
dried her tears as she said`Do not think, sir,
I am grieving for the loss of our property, or
because
I must leave this dwelling. The display
of wealth is not necessary to my happiness,
indeed I think it has made me more wretched
the splendor by which I was surrounded
seeming to mock my heart's misery. But my
husbandit is for his degradation, his ruin I
weep. O! I could joyfully share poverty with
himI would work to support himI would
willingly be a slave, or lay down my own life,
if he might be persuaded to return to virtue
if he could be reclaimed!'
`What did you say to her?' asked Mrs.
Colvin, weeping.
`I could suggest nothing of earthly comfort,'
returned her husband. `I could only direct
her to that balm for sorrow which is found only
in him who has declared that all things shall
work together for good to them who love God.'
`What will become of her and her dear
little
family?' again reiterated Mrs. Colvin.
`They will not be left to suffer,' said her
husband. `Her merits and her grief touched
every heart. I saw tears in the eyes of many
firm men, when speaking of her situation.
Indeed
,
the principal creditors declared they
would not have urged their claims, and taken
all the property, had they not thought it might
possibly rouse Murray to exertion. To show
kindness to him by allowing him means of
indulging
his depraved appetite, would be
cruelty
to his family. But we have made
arrangements
that will secure for Mrs. Murray what
she needs for present comfort. The family
are to be removed to that house of mine which
stands close by the dwelling of Mr. John
Russell
.
It is small, to be sure, but comfortable,
and we shall furnish it. You, ladies, must
find employment for Mrs. Murray; she told
me she would sew for any one.'
`I do not wish her to work for me,' said Mrs.
Colvin, eagerly; `whatever I can do to assist
her shall be cheerfully rendered.'
`You forget, my dear,' said her husband,
smiling, `that the necessity of receiving alms
is, to the delicate and sensitive mind, the
most galling link in the chain of poverty. But
few of our native born Yankees, and none who
have the spirit of a Yankee, will long submit to
the ignominy of subsisting wholly by charity.
There is a pride of independence among usa
nobility of soul, that spurns at vassalage, in
whatever way the yoke is imposed. Then do
not add to the embarrassments of Mrs. Murray,
by an offer of charity, which she may not feel
at liberty to refuse, but which will mortify her
to accept. Employ her, and pay her just as
liberally as you please, but let there be some
reciprocity between you. You will then
secure
more than her `thank ye'her esteem,
gratitude, and love.'
`But will not James Murray himself be
capable of doing something for his family?'
inquired this amiable woman.
`That is a question which cannot at present
be solved,' said her husband. James is a good
penman and accountant, and can find
employment
if he will keep sober. O, when I looked
on him, extended as he was on the floor, in a
state of utter insensibility to everything
passing
around himthe removal of his property
the agony of his wifeand then when I
thought of his early promisehis excellent
disposition
his
fine talentshis educationall
the advantages with which he began his
career
,
and the eminence he had obtainedand
saw all lost, ruined by his own folly, I could
not but weep over him. How much he has
already
suffered! and how much he must
hereafter
endure! He sees those who once
waited
on his smile, now scornfully pass him by;
he reads contempt or pity in those
countenances
that once brightened at his approach;
he finds himself shunned, neglected, or
ridiculed
,
where his lightest word was once heard
with attention. All this he must bear, and
who will not acknowledge that punishment
follows the transgressor? It ought to
everywhere
;
it invariably does among the
descendants
of the Pilgrims. Rank may, in
governments
less pure and popular than ours, secure
the semblance of respect to the unworthy. A
lord, though drunk, is still a lord, and
parasites
may flatter him, and servants attend him.
But the spontaneous esteem, cofidence, and
applause of our free, independent, and
intelligent
citizens, cannot be obtained by a
degraded
and worthless character.'
The morning exhibited all the calmness, and
beauty, and gladness, that usually pervades
the summer sky, the day after a violent
thunder
shower has cleared the atmosphere of all
impure vapors. The birds then sing their
gayest notes, as if congratulating each
other
that the storm has so happily passed by.
There was a fresher green on the trees and
fieldsa serenity in the deep blue sky,
picturing
,
as we may imagine, the repose of the
spirit, after the storms of earth are ended, and
it rests beneath the shade of the tree of life.
But amid all this beauty, joy, and peace,
there came a memento of man's mortality.
The sound of a funeral knell from the village
spire, fell more mournful than usual on the
ear, contrasted as it was with the rejoicing of
nature.
7
`It is the burial of Mrs. Murray,' said Mr.
Colvin, to a stranger who addressed him with
an inquiry. `Poor Lucy! she will find the
grave a refuge from suffering.'
`Was it she who was once called Lucy
Marsh?' inquired the stranger.
`The same.'
The stranger was much agitated. `I saw
her once,' he remarked, `just before she was
married. She was the most beautiful human
being I ever beheld. I heard that her
husband
had failedthat he was intemperate
and my journey through the village was
induced
by curiosity to learn the situation of that
lovely woman. I confess, I hoped I should
find that her husband was no more.'
`You would probably then feel interested to
learn some particulars of her fate,' said Mr.
Colvin.
The stranger bowed.
`You observed you had heard of the failure
of James Murray,' continued Mr. Colvin.
`His father was my intimate friend, and once
did me a signal service; and I wished to
express
my gratitude by showing kindness to the
son; so I established James and his family in
a house of my own. This building adjoined
one in which lived a man who had once been
an admirer of Lucy Marsh.'
`There were many such, I presume,' said
the stranger.
`Her beauty was doubtless much admired,'
returned Mr. Colvin, `but John Russell, as I
understood, had sanguine expectations of
obtaining
her hand, and had she never seen
James Murray, would probably have been
successful. Poets may celebrate the
omnipotence
of Cupid, but from observation I am
inclined
to believe that, in at least one half of the
matches,
propinquity
has quite as much
influence
as the arrows of the blind god. But
Mrs. Murray loved her husband truly and
undividedly
,
and excepting occasional starts of
passion or petulance when intoxicated, he was,
till his mind became inflamed with jealousy, a
most affectionate husband. This jealousy,
excited
by a trifling circumstance, is a sad
exemplification
of that alienation of reason which
is often caused by intemperance. Men seem
then possessed with the spirit of demons;
rage, envy, hatred, and they delight in
inflicting
misery. I have said the house, in which
this unfortunate family resided, adjoined that
of Mr. John Russell. His was a very
elegant
dwelling, for he had been gaining an
estate
while James Murray was dissipating his
and Mrs. Murray happened one day to
remark
on the prosperity of Mr. Russell and his
handsome house. Her husband instantly
became
exasperated, and pouring a torrent of
abuse both on her and Mr. Russell, declared
he would not reside so near a man whom he
doubted not was the favored paramour of his
wife. From that hour, his conduct to his
family became changed and cruel. I cannot
enter into details, your heart would sicken at
the recital, and it makes mine bleed to think
of the sufferings of that amiable woman.'
The stranger was evidently much agitated,
yet he begged Mr. Colvin to proceed.
`I must be brief,' returned he; `and can
only say that Mrs. Murray was so persecuted,
and rendered so wretched, by the jealousy of
her husband, that she consented to remove
from the house. Her husband provided
another
.
It was a lone building, situated in a wild
place, and half a mile from any neighbour. The
house was in a ruinous state, the roof pervious
to every storm, and there was not a glass
window
in the building. In short, it was a mere
wreck; `the very rats instinctively had quit
it,'yet there, this once angelic and still
interesting
woman, was compelled to reside. The
sorrows of the poor are not understood from
description; to be known they must be felt.
Our charitable people did much for Mrs.
Murray
and her little ones, yet still I have no doubt
they often suffered both from cold and hunger.
And then they were subjected to the capricious
cruelty of a drunken man. O! would young
ladies but once be sensible of that depth of
mortification and wretchedness which a woman
is doomed to feel who has an intemperate
husband
,
they never would for a moment hesitate
to discard a lover who had been guilty of that
degrading crime. They never would wed with
such an one, though he were before as dear as
their own life; they never could marry him
no, never, never, never! You doubtless
wonder
how such a delicate woman could live,
subjected
to such distresses. The capacity of
the human mind and frame to endure, is, in
many cases, indeed astonishing. Mrs. Murray
had the consolations of religion for support,
and then affection for her children
strengthened
her to `bear up under the load of life.' Yet
even the exercise of her piety was often fraught
with the most exquisite agony, for how lost,
when judged by the holy law of God, appeared
the character, and how terrible the condition of
the husband she still fondly loved! Every
day seemed widening the gulf between them,
and rendering more fixed and irreconcilable
the habits and principles which must finally
separate them forever.
He who created us, alone knoweth why some
of his children are appointed to win their
heavenly
crown through so much tribulation. To
the trials of Mrs. Murray were now to be
added
the sickness and death of her two
youngest
children. Her eldest, a daughter, had
never enjoyed good health, and the hardships
and wants to which she was often exposed,
doubtless, injured her, till finally she became
subject to fits of epilepsy, and her case was
pronounced incurable. But still, the mother
had one precious treasure, a fine boy, just
entering
on his seventh year, and the most
perfectly
lovely and engaging child I ever beheld.
In him she `garnered up her heart,' and
reposed
all her earthly hopes; in him she could
love his father's image without self-reproach,
and her affections continually wounded, or
trampled on by her husband, twined around
her child with those close foldings, whose
delighted
throb is so nearly allied to agony.
This feeling, the fever of love, is never
experienced
by those who live tranquilly, and have
not been necessitated to centre that affection
and hope on one object, which should have
been divided among a family. Last Monday
morning I called at their dwelling. I found
Mrs. Murray in better spirits than usual, and
there was a cheerfulness in her manner, I had
not for a long time witnessed. While we were
conversing, a carriage, in which were two
gentlemen, passed. A glove fell from the
chaise, and little James, who was playing
before
the house, sprang with the agility of a
fawn, picked it up, and presented it with a low
bow, to the owner. The exceeding beauty of
the child, contrasted, as it was, with his mean
habiliments, made him a most interesting
object
.
The gentlemen were undoubtedly struck,
as I observed they pointed towards him, while
conversing with much animation. At length
one of them called the boy and presented him
a dollar.
I wish you could have seen the little fellow
when he came bounding into the house to
exhibit
his prize. He was too young to feel any
mortification from being thought an object of
charitythere was nothing but pure joy in his
sensations. His bright eyes fairly lightened
with pleasure,and his rosy face laughed and
dimpled all over, while his breath came so
short and eager, he could hardly find words
to express his feelings, as he exclaimed
`Mother, dear mother, I shall buy something
for youI shall buy everything you want!
Tears and smiles were blended on the faded
and sad, but still sweet countenance of his
mother. I read her thoughtsshe was
anticipating
the day when her boy would be her
friend and protector. At that moment her
husband entered. He had, as I afterwards
learned, been that morning refused credit for
a glass of liquor, and in the contention that
ensued his wrath had been treated with
contempt
,
till he finally became so outrageous he
was driven from the store; the very one he
had formerly owned. I saw there was a
terrific frown on his brow, and that his wife
shuddered; but his little son, elated and
joyous
,
saw or heeded not the gathering storm.
He sprang to his father, and holding up his
money again told what he was intending to
buy for his mother.
`You shall do no such thing,' thundered the
savage parent, snatching the money from the
child's grasp. `Go, bring me yonder bottle
I will see if I cannot have a glass of rum!'
`O! give me my dollar, father,give me
my dollar,'cried the child, clinging to his
father's knee.
With the fury of a madman flashing from his
eyes, that father raised his clenched fist.
Mrs. Murray shrieked, and we both sprang
forward to intercept the blow. It was too
late!
I have no idea James Murray intended to
kill his child, or indeed that he knew, at the
time, what he did;but when he saw the
guiltless victim of his wrath, lying like a
crushed lambsenselesspale as marble
the blood streaming from his mouth and
nostrils
,
it recalled the maniac to his senses.
The chords of his better feeling, which for a
long time had not vibrated, were touched
and the fountain of his affections, which had
seemed withered, scorched, dried up,
suddenly
gushed forth with the stream of tenderness.
With the most careful attention he assisted me
to raise the body of his childhe chafed his
temples and little handshe spoke soothingly
to his wife, in the tone and with the words of
endearment, once so familiar to her ear. We
essayed everything to revive the child, but
in vainthe spirit
of the young sufferer had
passed from earth. When we became
convinced
that life was extinct, the lamentations of
the mother were heart-rending. Her husband
listened one momenthis features were
convulsed
with agony, and I hoped and prayed
he might weepbut that relief was denied
him. Suddenly his countenance assumed a
fixed and horrid expression; it was the
wildness
of utter despair. His eyes glared, he
gnashed his teeth, and clenching both hands,
invoked on his own head the most awful
denunciations
,
and rushed from the house.
Mrs. Murraybut I see you are
distressed
,and
I will not attempt to describe her
feelings. She died the next morning, and I
rejoiced at her release from a world she had
found so filled with thorns. Yesterday, just
as the thunder was bursting in fury, the body
of James Murray was found. He had
drowned
himself! Probably he never paused after
leaving his house, as the expression of his
features was unchangedhis teeth were set
and his hands still clenched. We buried him
in silence, near the spot where his body was
discovered; and yonder, attended by nearly
all the inhabitants of our village, as mourners,
come the remains of his murdered child and
victim wife.'
ANN ELLSWORTH.
`Wooing thee, I found thee of more value
Than stamps in gold, or sums in sealed bags;
And 'tis the very riches of thyself
That now I aim at'
Shakspeare
.
About
one mile from the pretty village of
N, that stretches along the banks of the
fertile Connecticut, there lived, some thirty
years since, a farmer by the name of Williams.
He was a good man, in the Yankee sense of
the term, that is, industrious and thriving, and
accounted honest and piousfor he lived
aboveboard, paid all his contracts punctually,
and belonged to the church. So he was called
a good man, and on many accounts he truly
deserved the epithet; but there was one foil to
his virtueshe was avaricious.
The acquisition of property is, in our
country
,
so very creditable, that probably many
who yield themselves slaves to the love of
money
are not aware of the dominion it exercises
over their hearts and passions. They do not
intend to love the world, or the things thereof,
unduly; but they want to have the comforts of
life, and the means of entertaining their friends,
and somewhat to bestow in charity, and a
portion
for their children, and many other items,
which appear indispensable; and thus they
deem the eagerness with which they go on
increasing
their hoards, but the duty they owe
themselves, families and society.
I have said Williams was a thriving man,
indeed
he was rich for the sphere in which he
moved. He cultivated his excellent farm with
great care, the eye of the traveller was always
arrested by his charming situation, and it was
often remarked that so quiet and pleasant a
residence must be the abode of content and
happiness. How little of either are dependent
on worldly prosperity!
Both Williams and his wife loved the world
so well they had but little love to bestow on
each other; and though they both toiled hard,
and rose up early, and sat up late, and eat `the
bread of carefulness,' it was not from the
sympathy
of affection, but to become rich. They
gained their wishes; but then they found, as all
will find, that whenever worldly desires are
inordinately
indulged, their gratification is sure
to bring disappointment and vexation, if not
misery, to the worldling. They thought, and
people generally said, that all their uneasiness
was caused by the untoward behaviour of their
only son. Obed Williams was one of those
common
characters, and they are much the most
numerous class, which seem to have no
distinguishing
lineament, but take their form and
pressure entirely from surrounding objects and
accidental circumstances. He was in
infancy
rather a sickly child, and so his mother
constantly indulged him in every whimand
in childhood he was, chiefly in consequence
of that indulgence, cross and wilful; and then
his father, who made Solomon's mode of
government
his standard, as constantly whipped
him for every fault, and it is difficult to decide
which mode of treatment had the worst effect
on his disposition. To complete his evil
destiny
,
it was often whispered in his ear, and that
too by his own mother, that he was a rich man's
only child, and would, sometime, inherit a large
estate, and have it in his power to do just as
he pleased. Should it excite wonder that, as
he grew towards manhood, and therefore found
himself exempted from corporal punishment, he
displayed a selfish, sullen, overbearing temper?
His parents, by their injudicious management
had increased, if not kindled it; and they were
punished by his wilfulness and disobedience.
But still Mr. Williams hoped that if his son
married a good wife he would improve, and with
his usual sagacity, when pecuniary profit was in
question, he had selected such an one for Obed.
`Your cousin, Ann Ellsworth, will be here
to-morrow,' said Mr. Williams`and, Obed,
I do hope you will not show any of your
contrary
temper, but be sociable and endeavour to
please her. Ann is a girl worth pleasing, for
she will have a fortune of four thousand dollars;
and her mother, before she died, consented
that Ann should marry you.'
`What, whether I choose it, or no?' said
Obed, looking up with an expression of
features
between a simper and a sneer.
`You will choose it, Obed,' replied his
father
,
in a soothing tone. `Ann was very
handsome
when I saw her last, which is about three
years ago. It was when her mother died, and
I wished to bring the girl right home with me
and have her learn to work; but she was so
anxious to go back to her school, and her
mother
had promised her she should go and
complete
her education. I don't call such an
education
complete
by any means; but I did not
like to contradict sister then, as she had been
very loath to sign her name to the will that
obliges Ann to forfeit her fortune if she
marries
without my consent. I pressed that
matter
,
and gained my point, and let sister have
her own way in the rest.'
`May be Ann will not like me,' said Obed,
with an expression of thought which his face
seldom wore.
`She must like you, or lose her property,
or it will be forfeited to me if she marries
without my consentand I shall not give it to
any one but you. But say nothing to Ann
about it. Girls always like to have their own
way in marrying, and seldom love those their
friends choose, so I have contrived to keep
the matter a secret except from a few who
were witnesses in the matter. You must try
to please your cousin, and as soon as you can
persuade her to marry you I will put you in
possession of all her fortune, and one third of
my own estate.'
`I should think you might give me one half,'
replied Obed, with a dissatisfied and sullen
air, `I don't see why old folks want to keep
everything for themselves.'
Mr. Williams regarded his son with that
look of bitter anguish which the discovery of
ingratitude in a child excites in a parent's
heart. There were no soothing reflections to
allay the sting; something in his own breast
whispered that he deserved chastisement; that
he had been guilty of the sin of covetousness,
while professing the most disinterested
concern
for his orphan niece, and remorse for the
part he had acted in obtaining the will, and
an indefinite dread, that somehow, his own
child was to be the instrument of punishing
his fault, came so home to his mind and
conscience
,
that, covering his face with his hands,
the tears he could not restrain he allowed to
flow.
Obed was not naturally hard-hearted, and
touched with this exhibition of sorrow he
wished
to comfort his father, but not knowing what
to say, he stood twirling his hat till Mr.
Williams
,
with that feeling of impatience which
self reproach awakens in the unhumbled heart,
angrily bade him go about his business.
Obed departed whistling.
`Pray where do you keep your books, cousin
Obed?' said Ann Ellsworth, the morning but
one after her arrival. `I have searched every
part of the house, and excepting the Bible, find
nothing worth reading, and I really want
something
to amuse me.'
`I should never think of looking for a book
to amuse myself.'
`And what do you like?' inquired Ann.
`O, hunting and fishing in the summer,
and skating and playing checkers in the
winter
.'
Ann laughed, but Obed had sufficient
penetration
to discern that what he had said had
not raised him in her esteem; and as he
really
wished to please her, he attempted to
apologize
for his want of taste and literature.
`We have but little time to spend in
reading
,'
said he, `or my parents have none. I,
to be sure, am not hurried, for I will not
drudge on the farm, and I suppose I should
have liked reading as well as you do if I had
only had entertaining books; but father never
would buy anything but land and cattle, and
all he thinks about is getting money. He has
laid up as much as I shall want to spend, and
that's one good thing; so there is no need of
my working; and as I have nothing to read, I
must hunt, and fish, and play checkers.'
Ann had now learned that her cousin was
idle and illiterate, and though she knew
nothing
of the defects of his temper, yet so
completely
did his self-exposure destroy the
favorable
opinion which his good looks,for if a
fine manly form, regular features, and fair
complexion, constitute beauty, he was really
very handsome,had inspired, that she never,
from that hour, thought him agreeable.
`You will find books enough if you go down
to Mrs. Grant's,' said Mrs. Williams, to the
reiterated wishes of her niece for something
to read. `They are always reading, though
they are so poor I don't know how they can
afford to spend their time.'
`Who is Mrs. Grant, and where does she
live?' asked Ann.
`O, she is a poor widow, and with her four
daughters, lives in a little house, down in what
we call the valley, about half a mile off.'
`A poor widow, living in a small house,'
thought Ann, as, glancing her eye around the
handsome apartment in which she was seated,
she pondered the propriety of a visit.
`They are poor enough,' continued Mrs.
Williams, `and have nothing only what they
earn by taking in work and braiding straw.'
`Braiding straw!' thought Ann, as she
surveyed in a mirror her own elegant dress,
and she almost resolved to think no more of
the Grants.
`And yet,' resumed her aunt, `to hear them
talk about their books, you would think they
did nothing but read; and then they are all so
proud of Charles.'
`And who is Charles?' inquired Ann.
`O, he is their brother, the oldest of the
family; and he was a very ill-looking child,
and he don't look much better now. I wish
you could see him beside of Obed. But
Charles was called a good scholar, and
somehow
he has got along in his studies,
wonderfully
,
quite beyond my expectations; for he
has studied law, and is now practising, though
he is only two years older than Obed. But
Obed thinks, I 'spose, that he is rich enough
without studying.'
Ann Ellsworth was a little capricious, for
she had been a petted child; and gay and high
spirited, for she was very fair, and had been
flattered,but she had good sense, and
whenever
she reflected, her decisions were sure to
be influenced by reason and right principles.
She did reflect on what her aunt had
communicated
,
and the conclusion was to seek the
acquaintance of the Miss Grants.
Their dwelling, a low house, containing only
three small rooms, besides a little one in the
garret which had been the study of Charles,
and was now his sisters' library, stood in a
quiet nook about twenty rods from the high
road, at the foot of a green hill; and the front
of the building was almost entirely covered
and concealed by woodbine, and lilaes, and
prime rose bushes, then in full blossom. Ann
loved flowers, and books, and intelligent
conversation
;
at Mrs. Grant's she found them all,
and after a few days' intercourse she could not,
very complacently, reflect on the foolish
prejudice
which had so nearly prevented her from
cultivating the acquaintance of this amiable
family, merely because they were poor, lived
in a small house, and braided straw. There
is, in sincere piety, an elevating principle,
which never fails to dignify its possessor.
Let the poor inhabitant of a cottage feel
himself
an heir of eternal glory, and envy at the
prosperity of his rich neighbour, and repinings
at his own hard fortune, vain regrets and idle
wishes, are all repressed. He bows
submissively
to the dispensations of that Providence
8
which has in this life assigned him a lowly lot;
and looking only to the glorious prize set
before
him, his mind and conversation are,
perhaps
insensibly to himself, imbued with the
purity and moral grandeur of that faith which
is destined to inherit a throne in heaven. The
devotion of Mrs. Grant was thus pure and
elevated. She had none of that morose,
mystical
,
mechanical affectation of piety which is
dependent on settled phrases, and stated
seasons
.
Her worship was not dictated by fear,
but inspired by love. `Our Father which art
in heaven,' always suggested to her heart the
idea of a tender, benevolent and holy parent,
who was constantly watching over her and
hers for good; and when afflictions came they
were but the chastenings of his mercy. It
was impossible that Ann Ellsworth should
become
,
as it were, domesticated beneath the
peaceful roof of Mrs. Grant without observing
the difference that existed between its inmates
and that of her uncle's elegant dwelling. In
the latter, all was hurry and anxiety, labor
and care; exemplifying the truth of the wise
man's remark, that `the abundance of the rich
will not suffer him to sleep.'
And then the acquisition of riches brought
no enjoyment, except merely, the idea of
possessing
them. The elegant and costly
furniture
that decked the parlour of Mrs. Williams,
instead of awakening in her mind elegance of
taste, only suggested ideas of the money it had
cost, and the care and trouble which would be
necessary to preserve it from injury. She
feared
to have her husband or child set their feet on
the carpeted floor, and whenever they did, then
were sharp reproofs on her part, saucy retorts
from her son, and surly grumblings from the
lord of the mansion on the inconvenience to
which such newfangled decorations subjected
him.
But at Mrs. Grant's, all was quietness and
affection; and though they were necessitated
to earn their livelihood, they did not neglect to
cultivate that refinement of feeling, mind, and
manners, which gives a zest to social
intercourse
.
Mrs. Grant possessed great decision
of character. This quality is rare in woman;
whether in consequence of her more delicate
organization, or the dependent situation in
which nature and education have placed her,
is of no consequence to inquire. While she
has judicious friends and kind protectors, she
can very well dispense with that kind of
energetic
decision displayed by men, which seems
to be attained only by deep reflection, when the
mind has been tasked to judge of the fitness of
a proposition with reference to its ultimate
importance
alone, and when that is clear, feels
prepared to encounter every obstacle the world
can raise to its accomplishment. Such
decision
only becomes necessary to woman in
adversity
.
Let no one imagine its
exertion
contributes
to the happiness of a female. It may
be her
duty
, it should never be her desire.
There is no human mind exempt from
weaknesses
.
Mrs. Grant had hers, and the most
prominent one was the fondness with which
she doted on her children, especially her son.
Her neighbours declared she was never heard
to converse five minutes without mentioning
Charles. She certainly contrived very soon
to introduce his name to Ann Ellsworth; and
tell of his genius, and discretion, and kind heart;
always adding, that under Heaven, he was all
her dependence. `The girls,' she would say,
`are good, and industrious, and obedient; but
what can girls do? Charles takes thought for
us all. He assists me, and advises them, and
provides for himself; and it is all owing to him,
that his sisters are so well educated. He gave
them all their books, and taught them when he
was here, and writes to them now he is away,
and never seems weary of the task. He gave
me, too, my large Bible, because my eyes had
grown weak, and I never open it without
thanking
Heaven for having blessed me with such a
son. I want, Miss Ellsworth, you should see
him. He is not handsome, to be sure,
nothing
so handsome as Obed Williams, but when
you are once acquainted with him, you will not
notice his plainness. I do wish he would come
home while you are here.'
Ann cordially joined in the wish; the letters
he sent his sisters were often shown her, and
combined, with what she otherwise heard, to
give her a high opinion of his talents and
character. Her situation in her uncle's family
had grown almost intolerable. She was so
wearied with their eternally reiterated
complaints
of bad health, and bad weather, bad
crops, and bad markets, which coustituted the
chief topics of their discourse, when together;
when separated, they were usually
complaining
of each other. Obed thought his parents
cross and stingythey called him idle and
extravagant
,and
poor Ann had to hear it all.
One beautiful forenoon, in the month of
August
,
Ann called at Mrs. Grant's, as usual, to
pass an hour, but found them all engaged in
preparation, as if for some expected guest.
The floor of their little parlour was newly
sanded, the fire-place filled with fresh green
boughs, and the few flowers their garden at
that late season afforded, were gathered and
placed in glass tumblers, disposed on the
mantel-piece
.
`We have just received a letter from
Charles,' said Mrs. Grant, her face radiant
with smiles, `and we expect him every
moment
.
I can truly say I am glad, and I hope
I am grateful. We did not expect him this
month,and he is coming now. But do, my
dear Miss Ellsworth, sit down; the girls will
hardly be at leisure to walk with you at
present
,but
if you will stay till Charles comes,
I presume he will be happy to take a ramble,
and you can all go together.'
Ann excused herself from staying, by
pleading
engagements at home; and as she slowly
and solitarily pursued the path to her uncle's,
she reflected much on the insufficiency of
wealth to confer happiness on a family, whose
members are neither united by the confidence
of affection towards each other, nor by
gratitude
and love to the Giver of every good.
Charles Grant arrived, and in due time was
introduced to Ann; and the fair reader
undoubtedly
expects to hear of their mutual and
immediate prepossession in each other's favor.
Charles Grant, however, was not a man with
whom a woman would be very likely to fall in
love with at first sight. He was plain, almost
to ugliness, small and thin, with harsh
features
,
and sallow complexion, and gray eyes,
and the only redeeming point in his
appearance
,
was a finely formed forehead, around
which his dark hair gracefully clustered. But
he was so intelligent and agreeable, and
affectionate
to his mother and sisters, and so
gentlemanly, Ann could not help esteeming
his character, and delighting in his society.
Three weeks he allowed for his visit, and said,
during that time, he should trace all the haunts
of his childhood; and he usually persuaded
his sisters and Ann to accompany him in his
rambles and excursions. Obed Williams,
also
,
dressed in his `very best,' always was
there, for jealousy of the superior abilities of
Charles, and fears that he would gain the
favor of Ann, had operated to make Obed fancy
himself violently in love with his cousin; and
he studiously endeavoured to display
advantageously
before her, what he considered of vast
importance, his fine person. He had better
have staid at home. Ann did often see
Charles and Obed beside each other, but it
was when the one was all animation,his
plain features glowing with intelligence, and
his gray eye sparkling with the wit and
vivacity
that flowed so enchantingly from his lips
while the other stood in stupid or wondering
silence,his handsome features dull and
unvarying
as a barber's block.
It was then that the heart of Ann confessed
the truth of the poet's assertion, that
`
Mind, mind
alone, (bear witness earth and heaven,)
The living fountain in itself contains
Of beauteous and sublime'
and though she did not look and love, she
listened
with such undisguised pleasure, for her
mind was all artlessness, that before the `three
little weeks' were expired, Charles had dared
to whisper his admiration, and had not been
forbidden
to hope. Obed, at the discovery of his
cousin's partiality for his rival, was filled with
rage and envy. He declared Charles was
wholly influenced by pecuniary motives, and
that Ann, like all young ladies, who fancy
themselves
educated, despised the laboring class,
and thought a professional man only worthy her
smiles. This is an observation often urged by
farmers. The fault is all their own. No class
of men in our own country, are so independent
as the agriculturists, and none would be more
respected, did they only cultivate their minds as
assiduously as their acres. They plead want of
leisure;let them improve what they have
the stormy daysthe long winter evenings
opportunities are not wantingbooks are
within
their reachthe road to honor and high
station is open before them, and yet they sit
down, not contentedly to be sure, for the soul
of an American cannot rest contented in
ignorance
and obscurity, while light, and
knowledge
,
and energy, and enterprise are with the
spirit of liberty, abroad in the world; but they
sit down in envious repinings, at the fate which
has assigned them the task of tilling the earth,
when they should be exerting themselves to
obtain that knowledge which will confer honor
and dignity on their employment.
Ann Ellsworth did not despise Obed because
he was a farmer, but because he was idle and
illiterate. Neither was the choice of Charles
Grant influenced by pecuniary motives; yet
had Ann, with her tastes and education, been
poor, he would hardly have dared to whisper
his love, till he had acquired the means of
supporting her in the style which she would
probably have expected from a husband in his
station. But all such objections were now
obviated by the fortune she would inherit; and
while he felt, that had he possessed a
princedom
,
Ann would still be the object of his
affection
,
in preference to any woman he had
ever seen, he did not hesitate to avow his
partiality
because the world might say he was
mercenary.
Mr. Williams listened to the application of
Charles, for consent to marry his niece, with
an air in which anger and exultation were
strangely blended. `You are doubtless
thinking
that Ann has a fortune at her command,'
said he, with a sneer.
`I have not asked your consent for her
fortune
,
but for her,' dryly observed Charles.
`My consent is indeed of some consequence
in this matter,' returned Mr. Williams, with
affected solemnity: `But I have my duty to
perform
.
Read that paper, Mr. Grant.'
It was the `last will and testament' of Mrs.
Ellsworth; and Charles there learned that the
consent of Mr. Williams to the marriage of
Ann was necessary, otherwise her fortune was
forfeited to her uncle.
`And read this '
ere
paper, too, Mr. Grant,'
continued Mr. Williams.
It was a paper expressing the wishes of Mrs.
Ellsworth that her daughter should marry Obed
Williams.
`You see how I am situated,' resumed
the crafty old man. `My sister, knowing her
daughter was gay and giddy, and that her
fortune
would attract the young sparks, who are
watching to obtain a rich wife, insisted that I
should take the girl and her property as my
own, and when she was old enough to marry,
give her to my son. My conscience will not
permit me to violate the trust.'
`Is the young lady apprized of this?'
inquired
Charles.
`O, noI hoped she would become
attached
to Obed, and I think she will now, if no
other person attempts to engage her affections.
I have told you all, sir, because I believe you
are a reasonable young man, and will not
think it worth while to deprive the girl of her
fortune, just for a little foolish fancy. You
see, under all circumstances, I cannot give
you my consent.'
9
`Have you any objection to my character
or situation?'
`O, nobut I am determined she shall
marry
Obed, and I do not think it my duty to give
you my consent.'
`And what if Miss Ellsworth should marry
me without it?'
`Then her property shall be my son's. It
was the dying request of my sister. The
estate
was left her by my father, and she said it
should never go out of the family. My duty,
in such a case, is plain, sir.'
`You may look over the will as much as
you please,' resumed Mr. Williams,
sarcastically
.
`You'll find no flaws, by which you
can get the property, after you marry Ann, I
promise you. That 'ere will was drawn by as
cunning a lawyer as you are, sir.'
Charles did examine it, coolly and minutely,
till satisfied there were no flaws; he laid it
down, saying, `It is not merely on account of
the property that I display this interest. I
consider my happiness and that of Miss
Ellsworth
involved. And though I will not believe
she can ever prefer your son, notwithstanding
he is heir to your estate, and has the
reversion
of hers in his grasp; yet I own the
possibility
that she may think our mutual poverty
should, for the present, prevent her from
giving
me the right to protect her, troubles me.'
`Do you then intend to marry her without
my consent?'
`If I can obtain hers, I shall not hesitate on
account of the forfeiture.'
`You can do as you please, but I
raly
thought
you had more sense,' said Williams, tauntingly.
`And as little feeling and honor asbut good
morning, sir;' and slightly bowing, Charles
departed
in search of his beloved. The
conversation
of the lovers cannot be given at length, but
the conclusion was that Ann, either convinced
by the arguments or melted by the entreaties of
Charles, consented to wed him immediately.
`I would not urge you thus hastily to unite
your fate with mine,' said Charles, `while I am
poor, and incapable of supporting you as I
could wish, had you any relative, except this
avaricious uncle, with whom to reside. It is
evident that he covets your estate. We will
let him enjoy it undisturbed. You would not
surely preserve it by marrying Obed?'
`I cannot believe my dear mother, were she
living, would consent I should marry him,' said
Ann, weeping`O why did she sign that
cruel
paper?'
`Probably when her mind was weakened by
sickness,' replied Charles. `I am convinced
your uncle used artifice to obtain it. But we
will leave him to Heaven and his own
conscience
,
and think no more of the matter. If
we cannot be rich, my love, we will be happy.'
Ann was a gay girl, and fond of society, but
she had good sense. She knew she had
married
a poor man, and though she was a little
romantic, she did not allow herself to expect to
find in a cottage the luxuries of a palace, or
that her husband, from only the income of his
profession, could furnish for her the elegances
the rich are at liberty to enjoy. She did not,
therefore, anticipate the delight of residing in
a fine house, and the parade of a wedding
party
,
and morning calls, and evening
entertainments
but
was contented to occupy a plain
apartment, plainly furnished, and pass the
bridal
year busily employed with her needle, or
her books. It is true, she did, at times, during
the long days, feel a little mopedbut when
the evening came, and freed Charles from his
office, how joyfully she greeted his step, and
exerted herself to soothe all his cares; and how
delightedly she listened to his instructions and
advice, while in unreserved confidence she told
him all she had read, and all she had thought.
Milton's heroine preferred to listen to the
truths of philosophy from her husband's lip,
rather than the angel's.
Charles, meanwhile, applied himself with
all the energy inspired by love and ambition,
to the prosecution of his business, and thought
every toil and perplexity repaid by the sweet
smiles that always awaited him by his own
fire-side
.
Thirty years have passed away since
they were married. Thirty years make little
alteration in the appearance of nature. It is
on man and his works that the characters of
time are impressed. And probably in no part
of the world are changes so apparent as in our
beloved country. The spirit of restlessness as
well as improvement, pervades our citizens.
This would naturally be the case with men,
when an extensive country is open before them,
and all are at liberty to remove withersoever
they please. The spirit of emigration is
productive
of many good effects, and some
melancholy
ones. There is a feeling of sadness in
the parent's heart while reflecting that the
household band, so fondly reared together, will
probably, in a few years, be so far, and so
widely severed. Let no man, while planning
his lofty dwelling, flatter himself he is building
for his own posteritythe son of his enemy
may inhabit there.
The parents of Obed Williams fondly
imagined
the estate they had so eagerly toiled to gain
and improve, would be highly valued by their
sonbut they had the grief and mortification
of seeing the part assigned him, on his
marriage
,
soon disposed of; and the chagrin and
sorrow they endured in consequence of his
undutiful
and prodigal conduct, it was thought
hastened their death. Obed, then, for a few
years, revelled in luxury; but finally,
increasing
debts began to harass him, and as the small
estimation in which he knew he had been held,
notwithstanding he was heir to the best estate
in the country, had always provoked him, he
disposed of his property, at a reduced price,
and departed for Ohio,where he flattered
himself he should be considered a great man.
But the people in the western states have long
since learned to distinguish between the
ignorant
adventurer who has nothing but his own
egotism to recommend him, and the man of
enterprise
and intelligence seeking a wider sphere
for the exertion of his talentsand Obed
Williams
gained nothing by the removal.
There is one event happeneth to all, and the
changes of time are alike on the evil and the
good. Thirty years have blanched the dark
locks of Charles, and planted wrinkles on the
fair face of Ann. The vivacity of youth and
the glow of beauty must decay, even the
ardor
of imagination is chilled, and the light of
the understanding darkened by the cold pall
of years. There is but one earthly flower that
blooms unfading in our earthly pathit is the
true love of virtuous hearts. The lapse of
thirty years has wrought no change on the
affection of Charles and Ann. She listens as
delightedly to his conversation as when his
eloquence first won her smile; and that smile
is just as dear to him as when he first called
her his bride. But their situation is changed.
Thirty years of industry and economy have
given them an independent fortune, and what
is far better than gold, a name and a praise
for every excellence that dignifies human
nature
.
Satisfied with their portion of the world,
they wished to retire from its bustle, and
Charles Grant has lately purchased the farm
formerly owned by Mr. Williams. It was
endeared
to him by many recollections. Its
shades had been the haunts of his boyhoodit
was there he won the heart of his beloved wife,
and above all, it was near the dwelling of his
aged mother. So he purchased, and is
improving
the farm, and the passing traveller is
not now mistaken when he deems the beautiful
residence the abode of content and happiness.
THE
VILLAGE SCHOOLMISTRESS.
`Life, like every other blessing,
Derives its value from its use alone;
Nor for itself, but for a nobler end
The Eternal gave itand that end is virtue.
S. Johnson
.
The
peculiar characteristics of females,
being
less distinctly marked, are much more
difficult
to be delineated than those of the other
sex. There are various pursuits by which
men may hope to obtain happiness and
distinction
for
women there is but one path
her success in life depends entirely on her
domestic
establishment. Let the education of
women differ ever so much in
detail
, its
end
is the same, to qualify them to become wives
and mothers; and in every station the object
of female ambition is to marry well. This
similarity of purpose produces a similarity
of thought, feeling, action, and consequently
character
, which no uniformity of training
could otherwise bestow. And then, the
business
of married women, though varying in
ceremonials
, according to the circumstances or
rank of the respective husbands, is essentially
alike.
`To study household good,
And good works in her husband to promote;'
and to cherish and watch over her offspring,
are, in our country, the employments for life
of each individual. (I have not taken into this
amount those modish ladies who appear to
think themselves born only to be amused,
because
such a class is scarcely recognised in
our republican landhere happily, in public
estimation, the useful yet takes precedence of
the fashionable.) While such only are the
offices
and duties which women are expected to
perform, it would be absurd to think they
would exhibit that variety of talent, or those
prominent and peculiar qualities of mind, that
distinguish men of different professions and
dissimilar occupations. What a contrast, in
the principles and pursuits of men, since the
time that Peter the Hermit first raised the
standard of the cross, and saw nations enrol
themselves beneath the sacred symbol, and this
age of free inquiry, of rational improvement,
of useful invention! What sympathy would
there be between the opinions and feelings of
a crusader of the reign of Cur de Lion, and
an enlightened philosopher of our own nation?
the one, in his mailed armour traversing the
burning plains of Syria, considering the rescue
of Jerusalem from the grasp of the infidels, as
the greatest and most meritorious action
mortal
man could perform; the other,
contemplating
,
with a calm delight that scenes of
carnage
never afforded, the proposed route of a
rail road or canal, which, completed, would
give to peaceful industry, the means of raising
cities on the site of the wilderness?
Yet woman is still the samestill seeking
her earthly happiness only by subduing the
heart of lordly manstill endeavouring to
heighten and set off her personal attractions
by dress and accomplishments, that she may
thus secure the constant devotion of some
gallant
knight.
This distinction in the pursuits of the two
sexes could never have been so firmly
established
,
and so long and uniformly upheld, in
every country and among every people, by
mere human authority and custom. In
designating
woman as `a helpmate' for man, the
Creator marked her destiny: and to fit her for
the task, mercifully infused into her soul deep
attachment for home, enduring tenderness for
her offspring, and to the `
one
she loves,' that
constancy in affection, which rarely decays
till her heart is cold in death. She cannot
break these bonds if she would. It is idle to
talk of the `Rights of Woman,' if they are
made to consist but in placing her in a station
manifestly contrary to the intentions of
Providence
.
It is worse than weak, it is wicked to
say she is degraded by fulfilling those duties
nature assigned her; because the
mind
is not
circumscribed by
time
, or confined to earth;
and in the promises of eternal glory, woman
participates equally with her `lord.' Indeed
were not all boasting excluded she might
claim the advantagethe Saviour of the world
was peculiarly her seed, and the honor of
having
the One who brought life and immortality
to our fallen race
named
of her, establishes at
once her claim to a full participation of mind,
of soul, of that portion of our being which is
destined for immortality. It is then absurd
for woman to complain that her sphere on
earth is less honorable than that of man,
because
it is different; or imagine that the
privilege
of commanding armies or convincing
senates would add to her importance,
usefulness
and happinessbecause it must be
evident
to all who consider the subject, that such
was not the part assigned her by Him who
directeth
all things in wisdom. The great
effort
therefore of female education, should be
to qualify woman to discharge her duties, not
to exalt her till she despises them; to make it
her ambition to merit and display the
character
of the most amiable and intelligent of her
sex, rather than aspire to emulate the capacity
and conduct of men. In our country, where,
under the mild light of Christianity, free
institutions
guarantee freedom of thought, of
expression
,
of action, the full and free
developement
of mind may rationally be expected; and
here, if in any country on earth, women may
hope to take their true, their most dignified
station, as the helpers, the companions, of
educated
and independent men. And while our
citizens are endeavouring so to improve their
inestimable privileges, that the men of future
ages may be better and happier for their
labors
,
have women no share in the important
task? Their influence on the manners is
readily and willingly conceded by every one;
might not their influence on the
mind
be made
quite as irresistible, and far more beneficial,
and that, too, without violating in the least,
the
propriety
, which, to make their examples
valuable, should ever mark their conduct?
The business of
instruction
is one of vast
interest
,
because fraught with such important
consequences
to Americans. It is necessary that
all
our people should be instructed, as
universal
education is the main pillar that must
eventually support the temple of our liberty.
It is therefore a duty sacredly binding on our
legislators to provide for the instruction,
during
childhood and youth, of every member of
our republic. But while there are so many
pursuits, more lucrative and agreeable to
active
and ambitious young men, there will be a
lack of
good
instructersof those who are
willing
to make it their business. Let, then, the
employment of
school-keeping
be principally
appropriated to females. They are both by
temper and habit, admirably qualified for the
taskthey have patience, fondness for
children
,
and are accustomed to seclusion and
inured
to self-government. Is it objected that
they do not possess sufficient soundness of
learningthat their acquirements are
superficial
,
showy, frivolous? The fault is in their
education, not in the female mind. Only
afford
them opportunities of improvement and
motives
for exertion; let them be assured, that
`to sing, to dance,
To dress, and troll the tongue, and roll the eye,'
is not all that is required to make young ladies
agreeable or likely to be sought by the
gentlemen
that
they may converse sensibly without
the charge of pedantry, and be intelligent
without the appellation of a
blue
; in short, that
they are expected to be rational, and required
to be useful, and they will not disappoint
public
expectation.
But I may not dwell on the subject; my
preface
is already too long. Readers soon tire of
prefaces, and skip them, and so the labor of
writing them is lost. Writers should never
flatter themselves everything from their pens
will be seized with avidity. Yet still it is,
perhaps
,
best they should not know how slightly
many passages, they imagine most excellent,
are passed over; how carelessly opinions and
sentiments, they consider of vital importance
to the interests and improvement of society, are
read. They would not persevere could the
mortifying truth be fully unfolded, namely,
that the chief importance of an author is in
his own estimation. Yet my preface will have
all the importance I wish, if it has any
tendency
to awaken the attention of parents, and those
who have the superintendence of female
education
,
to examine whether there be not some
end
and
aim
besides a mere drawing-room
display
,
to which the exertion of female talent
may, with propriety, be directed. Yet to make
such a plan effectual, it must be made
fashionable
the
business of instruction must be
divested
of its associations of pretension and
pedantry, and dulness and drilling. It must
be esteemed amiable, and comporting with
feminine gracefulness and delicacy as well as
dignity; and moreover, it must be sufficiently
lucrative to insure an honorable independence.
Whenever such a `consummation,' which I, for
one, most `devoutly wish,' shall occur, the
character
of the schoolmistress will become
interesting
and important; the office of instructress
will not be sought merely as the resource of
necessity and misfortune; but
ladies
will
engage
in it, more sedulous to display their
acquirements
and graces by the progress of their
pupils, than an exhibition of
themselves
. And
then the story of Elizabeth Brooks will be
read with interest, and her example considered
worthy of imitation. Elizabeth Brooks was a
native of Walpole, N. H. Writers of fiction
usually introduce the epithets `retired' or `
romantic'
before the name of the place where
they locate the residence of their heroine.
Such of my readers as have had the
opportunity
of visiting Walpole and its environswho
have gazed on the `Falls,' while standing
beneath
the overhanging mountain, till fancy
almost
saw the mighty mass trembling as if about
to precipitate itself into the gulf beneath; while
the agitation and whirl of the waters, as they
rush, and boil, and foam, among the broken
rocks, may, by no great effort of the
imagination
,
be ascribed to their fear of the
impending
crush, and their hurry to escape from the
threatened ruinand then glanced on the
opposite
shore, where, amidst plenty and beauty,
rural content seems to have fixed her seat,
will not need be told that Walpole and its
environs
are romantic. `Retired' is a more
relative
termto an inhabitant of Boston, the place
would be retired. When Elizabeth was born,
her father was an affluent merchant in the city
of Hartfordwhen she was seventeen, he kept
a small boarding house in Walpole, lord of
nothing
on earth, save the affection of his wife and
child. Sickness, as well as misfortune, had
assailed him; he was dying of consumption,
and before she was eighteen, she was fatherless.
In youth we seldom yield to despondency. Life
has then so many bright visions, some must
gild the path appointed us. It is not strange
such fancies should soothe Elizabeth, for the
star of love brightened her horizon. She was
very young, only fifteen, when her
acquaintance
with William Forbes commenced. He
was then preparing for college, and sought her
society because she, more than any one,
seemed
to appreciate his studies. Yet it was more
the complacency of her disposition, than liking
for his person, that first induced Elizabeth to
admit his visits. He was a scholar rather than
a lover, and she had much oftener to listen to
scraps of Latin and Greek quotations, than
compliments or soft words. But then he
furnished
her with books, of which she was
immoderately
fond, and he discussed with her the
merits of her favorite heroes, and the beauties
of her favorite poets; and translated learned
mottoes, and explained obscure allusions, till
finally, from finding his presence necessary,
she began to regret his absence; his idea was
often and oftener recurring; she thought of
him, and loved to think of himwas she not
then in love? Hers was not certainly
romantic
lovesuch as is enkindled by a bright eye,
graceful form, fascinating manners, &c. It
was the calm, confiding esteem and affection,
that will last unimpaired through all the
changes
of human life. Wedded love must be thus
rational, thus founded on esteem, or it will
never endure. The raptures of fancy will
decay
,
if not with the first moon, with the first
year.
It is usually thought those who are beloved,
must be lovelybut the comeliness of
Elizabeth
was almost entirely owing to a fair
complexion
,
and a kind, benignant expression of
countenance, that assured the beholder of the
gentleness of her heart. She was one of those
girls whom the aged always praisea sure
sign of excellenceand if some of the young
ladies thought her rather too fortunate in
attaching
a scholar and a rich man's son, yet no
envy or illnature towards her was openly
expressed
.
She was twenty-two, when William,
after receiving his diploma, departed for the
State of New-York, where he intended to study
law, select a place of residence, and then
return
and claim his bride. The time of
separation
appeared long to them both. William
openly murmured, and tears told all that
Elizabeth
could not speak.
`Let me find you unchanged at my return,'
said William, pressing her hand.
`Time changes us all,' replied Elizabeth.
`But your heart, my love, let that still be
mine, and I care not for other alterations.'
He was then probably sincere.
`Do you think the report of your nephew's
intended marriage with a lady in New-York as
really true?' said Miss Ashton to the Rev. J.
Bonnett, the uncle of William Forbes. `Has
he entirely forsaken Elizabeth?'
`I fear so, indeed,' replied the worthy
clergyman, with a shake of the head, and a
deep, long breath, between a sigh and groan.
`Elizabeth is one of the best girls in the world,
but their courtship has been too long. I
dislike
such long courtshipsI seldom knew one
end happily. There is usually jealousy and
quarrellingand if they do finally marry, it
often appears on the part of the man, more a
sense of honor than affection, which leads him
to fulfil his engagement.'
`Would there not be equal danger of
repentance
and repining, were the nuptial knot
actually
tied?' inquired Miss Ashton.
`No, there would notor certainly not with
persons of sense and reflection. They would
then feel their interests the same, and they
would feel that confidence in each other, which
love only never imparted. Even the changes
that time works on the fairest countenance, are
scarcely perceptible to the husband who daily
sees his wife exerting herself to make him and
his children happy. But the lover, after an
absence
of several years, beholds the alterations
in his intended with deep regret, if not with
mortification. And the more ardent and
devoted
he has been, the more perceptible is the
change. His imagination has been investing
his beloved with an increase of charms, while
time has been stealing `a tooth, or auburn lock,'
perhaps, and the bridegroom feels as if
defrauded
of the loveliness for which he had
bartered
his heart.'
`But you forget, sir,' said Miss Ashton,
eagerly, `that the gentlemen now allow us
some merit on the score of
mind
, and Miss
Brooks'
`Is wonderfully improved, I grant ye,'
interrupted
Mr. Bennett`and she is far more
deserving than when William first engaged her
hand; because she has evinced the goodness
of her heart and temper by good works, by
usefulness
that
sure, and indeed to us, only test
of superior virtue, and the best criterion of
superior
abilities. But yet, Miss Ashton, we must
not expect, though the opinions of men and the
condition of women have wonderfully, and
happily
changed, during the last half century, yet
we must not expect that the fancy for female
beauty, which is fostered, if not in a great
measure
inspired, by our literature, (recollect
every
heroine, from Helen downwards, is painted
beautiful,) can be sufficiently
etherealized
, as
my Sophia would say, to prefer, without at least
an effort of reasoning, the graces of
mind
to the
graces of
person
. I know from my own
feelings
,
as well as from observation, that men are
extremely apt to pay homage to beauty. It is
true, young men of sense and education soon
grow weary of a fool, though ever so pretty,
10
but not always till after marriage;when it is
too late. Such will probably be the fate of
William Forbesbut his folly and injustice
deserve
punishment.'
`And so Miss Brooks must all her life be
confined to the drudgery of school keeping,'
said Miss Ashton, compassionately. `I do
think keeping school must be the dullest thing
on earth To be mewed up, day after day,
conning A. B. C.O, how I should detest
it! But it may be congenial employment to
the mind of an old maid.'
`I am intending my daughter Sophia to
commence the business soon,' observed Mr.
Bennett.
`What, that joyous girl, who is all song,
smiles and sportiveness? Why, to confine
her buoyant spirit in the prison of a school
room, would be as incongruous as for nature
to place nightingales in Lapland, or call forth
butterflies in January. She never will endure
it.'
`She is eager to attempt it,' replied Mr.
Bennett,`and anticipates much pleasure in
the employment of school keeping.'
`Pleasure in school keeping!'reiterated
the laughing Miss Ashton. `Whoever thought
of associating pleasure with school keeping!
I know indeed ladies sometimes engage in it,
but I always supposed it was from necessity,
for the pecuniary compensation merely,but
that cannot be your daughter's motive.'
`Neither is it now the motive of Elizabeth
Brooks. When she commenced instructing,
the necessities of her mother required great
exertion. But Mrs. Brooks is no more.
Elizabeth
has rich relations in Connecticut, who
would gladly support her, and indeed, who
urge her to reside with them. She does not
instruct from necessity.'
`It is very strange she should instruct from
choice,' observed the young lady.
`And why so strange?' returned Mr.
Bennett
.
`Do you, my dear Miss Ashton, never
connect pleasure with usefulness? I should
have said duty, but the word has been so often
and so foolishly, if not irreverently misapplied
I seldom use it. In my estimation, and I have
drawn my deductions, not from studies in the
closet, but observations in the world,
usefulness
and pleasure are much oftener allied than
idleness and pleasure. By idleness I do not
mean doing nothing,but being engaged in
frivolous pursuits only. There is a
complacency
of mind that makes the heart glad and
the spirit buoyanta feeling of gratification
which is happy without effort, and gay even
in solitude, that people who seek only their
own amusement never enjoy.'
`I am not sufficiently acquainted with Miss
Brooks to allow me to judge of her feelings,'
returned the lively Miss Ashton`but the
loss of a lover is usually esteemed quite a
serious
thing with us ladies. If she sustain her
disappointment with fortitude, I shall think
school keeping of some importance, and advise
every young lady to acquaint herself with the
business, so that an affair of the heart may not
make her quite helpless and hopeless. But
your charming Sophia has nothing to fear
from fickle lovers.'
`She should fear then for herself,' returned
Mr. Bennett, seriously. `She should fear to
indulge that supineness which is
passive
vice,
if I may be allowed the termbecause to be
actively useful, as far as our ability permits,
is the law of our being, the debt we owe for
the enjoyment of life, and whoever neglects to
fulfil the one and pay the other is guilty. The
world may say such people live very
fashionably
,
and very innocentlybut they do not
enjoy the approbation of conscience, and they
cannot expect from Him whose favor is
felicity
,
the commendation `well done good and
faithful servant!' Yet I beg you will not think
I have compelled my daughter to engage as
an instructress. I have long since adopted
the opinion that to have good works
meritorious
,
they must be performed by a free agent.
I endeavour to point out to my children the
path of usefulnessI advise them to pursue
it; but I allow them to decide for themselves.
Sophia, however, for her decision of character
and activity of mind, is far more indebted to
the counsels and example of Miss Brooks than
to me. And I am proud and glad to
acknowledge
this, because it is paying a deserved
tribute
to merit, and moreover assists to establish
my favorite theorynamely, that the
elevation
of female character must be achieved by
female talent and influence. We men may
frame systems of improvement, but it is the
exertions of the ladies that must prepare the
mind to receive them.'
Here they were interrupted by the entrance
of Sophia Bennett, who came tripping in to tell
her father she had received the promised
communication
from Miss Brooks. `And I was
never more delighted in my life,' continued the
laughing girl. `Do, my dear father, read it
I am sure there is amusement in the
description
of school keeping, however, dull the
business
may be in actual performance.'
`Miss Brooks was requested by my
daughter
to draw up some rules for her direction
during
her first essay as an instructress,' said Mr.
Bennett, turning to Miss Ashton. `Miss Brooks
answered that she would willingly oblige her,
but that precise rules, applicable to the
exigencies
of different schools, would be beyond her
abilitybut that she would copy some notes,
taken during her first six months' experience in
teaching, which might give my daughter some
little idea of what would be expected from her
in her new vocation.'
`O, do pray allow me to hear the notes,' said
Miss Ashton.
`With pleasure,' returned Mr. Bennett.
`Here Sophia, you must read, I will explain,
and Miss Ashton may criticise; so there will
be business for us all.'
`I would ask to be excused from my task,'
said Miss Ashton, `only as I find you place so
high an estimate on industry, you will I suppose
easier pardon severity of remark than
idleness
.'
`But you must recollect the writer is a female,'
replied the good man`and from the lips of her
own sex, should receive courtesy if not
indulgence
.
There is one consequence which I
sometimes fear may follow the cultivation of
literature, especially of authorship among
women
,
which would tend greatly to injure their
usefulness and happiness. It would be very
unfortunate, should those whose thoughts and
words ought to be kind, conciliating and
charitable, be, by their attainments incited to
a spirit of jealousy, envy and rivalry towards
each other. Indeed that lady of intelligence
who does not encourage female talent, must be
blind to her own interest. It is not in
possessing
a genius superior to her sex, that makes the
true, the best glory of a woman, it is in using
her influence to elevate the female character.
We men do not want paragons or prodigies for
wivesbut rational, refined, intelligent
partners
the
former may engage our wonder, the
latter only will attract our love. And now, my
daughter, as I have prosed to the extent good
breeding will allow, although I have not half
exhausted the subject, we will listen to the
letter
of Miss Brooks.'
Sophia's smile thanked her kind parent for
the interest he took in her plans and pleasures,
and she began.
`On examining my notes, my dear Miss
Bennett
,
I found they would be unintelligible to
you without some explanations; so by their aid
I have taxed my memory to give you a regular
history of my feelings, and the progress of my
mind during six of the most important months
I ever passed. I may well call them so, as
their effect has ever since operated on my
character and happiness; and probably will,
during life. It was on the first Monday in May,
18-, that I commenced my school, in a small
district in the town of. I engaged in
it from necessity, and reluctantly enough to
make me quite nervous. I used to be
nervous
in those days, or at least indulge my
sensibility
,
(the refined title for
selfishness
,) till it
made me very unreasonable, and very
wretched
;
for I had been indulged till the gratification
of my own wishes and whims, appeared to me
the most important thing on earth. But wealth
had fled, my dear father was no more, my
mother
was unable to provide for her own wants,
and thus I was thrown upon my own resources.
I had never been acquainted with myself,
and notwithstanding I had a proud idea of my
own learning and accomplishments, yet no
sooner did I undertake to exercise, specifically,
my talents, than I shrunk from the task, and felt
dismay and discouragement. Those who have
been taught to estimate their acquirements
chiefly by the credit they acquire on days of
examination at school, and afternoons of
display
before partial friends at home, have little
idea of any practically useful purpose to which
those accomplishments may be applied. But
for me, there was no discharge. I must either
use exertion, or live in dependence on my
mother's relatives. I was influenced in my
choice by reasons that doubtless to a
philosopher
,
would appear of very trifling import,
if not excessively silly; yet they decided my
destiny. I will tell you the whole frankly, nor
do I now, in my days of reflection, and
comparative
wisdom, feel disposed to tax myself
with egregious folly, because that in youth I
was guided by the impulses of my heart. The
passions, when virtuous in their objects of
pursuit
,
are as sure a guide to excellence and
happiness, as cool reasonindeed surer, and
far more efficient; because of the enthusiasm
they kindle, and the generosity they inspire.
It is a mistake to think that passion, or feeling,
is of itself censurable. When the soul is
most innocent, that is in youth, the passions
are most ardent. Why then, you will
probably
inquire, is the suppression of passion
always
so earnestly urged on the young? I
think, my dear Sophia, there is a mistake in
the terms used by those writers who most
earnestly
inculcate the necessity of self control.
It is not the suppression of our feelings, but
their right
direction
that is needed to make us
perfect. The great Moralist, who `spake as
never man spake,' did not censure passion, or
its expressionhe only sought to direct it to
worthy objects, and incite it to great sacrifices.
He purified and exalted but he encouraged
love. We are not only to love our neighbour
as ourselves, but we must love our enemiesa
refinement, and generosity, and warmth of
sentiment
which can only be compatible with a
pure mind and ardent heart. These remarks
are not intended to palliate any weakness of
my ownbecause I do not think the affection
I then cherished for W., was a weakness. Yet
what was, at that time, the innocency of
passion, would, if now indulged, be weak
or criminal. But my reasonswellNew
Hampshire was the residence of the friends of
WilliamI should there, oftener than in
Connecticut
,
hear of him and from him; and then
William had once said he thought the office of
instructress, an excellent one for young
ladies
;
it imparted a knowledge of the human
heart, he observed, which, in no other way
could they so well or so safely gain; and it
also gave dignity to the manners, and a
decision
to the mind that were calculated to make
a woman more respected and more useful.
Another, and perhaps the most efficient reason
was thisI had a cousin where I was invited
to reside who had expressed more partiality
for me than his relationship would seem to
dictate
I
feared a residence in his father's
family
would give uneasiness to William Forbes.
I might, I see, have spared this detail of
circumstances
,
and said at once, that partiality
for the man I then expected to marry, was the
true reason which induced me to make those
exertions which have been crowned with
success
,
and I hope not deficient in that
usefulness
which merits success. I have not
mentioned
my mother, because she would, with
apparent cheerfulness, have yielded to the
solicitations of her friends and lived in
dependence
on them; yet I know she was
afterwards
far happier, in reflecting she owed her
11
support and comforts to my filial love and
successful
industry.
My schoolhouse had been recently built,
and was scarcely finished, and moreover was
situated in a place which any young lady,
romantic
or rational, might be pardoned for
calling
horrid. In selecting this site, taste, if
such a principle was cultivated among the
villagers
,
had never been consulted. The only
requisite was, to fix precisely on the centre of
the district; and after measuring in every
direction
,
the centre had been discovered
exactly
in the centre of a frog-pond. As near that
pond as safety would permit, stood the
schoolhouse
,
encircled with dwarf pines and spruce
bushes; and the prospect on every side,
bounded
by woods or mountains, or ledges of rock.
Not a human habitation was in sight, and yet,
when I entered the school room, I found
nearly
fifty children collected. Where the little
urchins could possibly live, or how they all
found their way to that wild looking place, was
then to me matter of astonishment. I have
since learned, how highly the privileges of a
free school are prized; and what exertions are
made by parents, to insure their little ones the
advantages of education. The first thing, of
course, was, to be introduced to my pupils, or
in other words, to learn their names. And
here commenced a ludicrous difficulty. The
names of these little rustics were so high
sounding and romantic, and generally so
inappropriate
to the appearance of the children,
and their repetition awakened such
associations
,
and indeed such ludicrous comparisons
in my own mind, that it was several days
before
I could hear, or speak them without
laughing. I had all the presidents and great
men of America, to say nothing of foreign
heroes, before me, represented, in name
at least, by sunburnt, barefooted, curly-pated
boys; and all the heroines of romance and
song, in chubby cheeked, freckled, romping
girlsand a happy circumstance did I esteem
it, if only one four-syllable name was attached
to one individual. Ever since that time, I
have been an admirer of short, and as they
are usually called, simple, oldfashioned names.
But I was, on the whole, pleased with my
school. There was something very gratifying
in the sincere and affectionate homage these
happy and innocent little creatures rendered
to me. They had been taught to respect their
teacher, and think learning one of the finest
things they could possess; and I found them
tractable, and ambitious to excel. But the
unrestrained freedom of play when out of
school, and the variety and cheerfulness of
nature abroad, make confinement to the school
room, especially in the country, a far more
irksome restraint during summer, than any
other season of the year. I studied so to
engross
and interest their minds, that they might
have no leisure for repining at the restrictions
I was compelled to impose, and I introduced
in consequence, some new arrangements; but
I found these innovations where watched with
a jealous eye by the parents. Yet no
murmurs
of discontent reached me, excepting from
two familiesone sent no scholar, and the
other none excepting an idiot. I have usually
found those who have least interest in a school
the least likely to be satisfied with its
management
.
I boarded
round
, as they termed it, that
is, I boarded with every family in proportion to
the number of scholars they sentand it was
amusing to see the pride of the parents and the
manner in which they managed to elicit from
me praises of their children. I believe I
satisfied
them, certainly I was myself satisfied; for
nothing they could do to make me comfortable
and happy, was omitted. The best room, the
best bed, the best place at table, the best fare
the house afforded were considered the right
of the instructress of their childrenand the
gratitude this treatment excited in my heart,
poor and dependent as I felt myself, raised in
me an ambition to deserve it, that doubtless
contributed much to make me industrious, and
to give me those habits of faithfulness in my
employment, which have been rewarded by
success
and happiness. Yes, happiness, my dear
Sophia;never allow your mind to cherish
that idea that happiness is necessarily
dependent
on a particular event, or confined to any
particular station. It is true I did not then
expect, and probably should have been very
wretched to have expected, school keeping
would be my future business. I was young,
I had a loverI read romancescould I be
otherwise than a little romantic? I was very
much so, and I confess, there where hours,
nay days, when I felt discontented with my
employment and situation. I looked on the
woods and rocks, and above all on the
frog-pond
with disgust; and anticipated the time
when I should be at liberty to be happy. It
seemed so unsentimental for me to be wasting
my spirits and wearying myself to death, just
to please a set of people whom, but for a
pecuniary
reward, I should never have known
had existed. But these feelings seldom lasted
long. My own heart told me I was acting
rightly. The still small voice, whose whisper
of approbation brings more `true joy' to the
bosom than the greetings of the million,
confirmed
me, encouraged me to persevere. And
I was rewarded by the confidence and
affection
of both parents and children. What a
pleasure is derived from knowing one's self
beloved! When I saw those little girls and
boys regarding me as their oracle, almost their
tutelary angel, you can scarcely imagine how
they interested me. Their chubby, sunburnt,
freckled faces, looked positively beautiful; and
I dearly loved the roguish, romping, but good
natured and happy creatures. I enjoyed
exquisite
gratification in communicating
knowledge
to their artless minds, and watching their
progress. The process greatly improved my
own understanding. While repeating and
explaining
to them, I learned myself to reflect
and reason; and while advising and urging on
them the necessity of improvement, I became
more susceptible of the value of time, and
more anxious to improve. We parted with
mutual regreteven tearsand though my
lot has ever since been to dwell in pleasanter
places, and among more polished people, yet
I never think of those children, I never meet
them without gladness, they never see me
without testifying joy. Would these mutual
feelings always arise had we not enjoyed
happiness
,
such as the consciousness of acting
rightly and deserving it only imparts, while
together?'
`What do you think of the life of a
schoolmistress
?'
said Mr. Bennett.
`I am anxious to commence it,' said Sophia.
`I think it exquisite in description,' said Miss
Ashton, `especially for those ladies who have
talents that they wish to employ and improve.
But this you know sir, must not be expected
from every young lady. Some there are of
my acquaintance, who possess genius and
imagination
,
play and sing divinely, dance
charmingly
and dress elegantly, but the reasoning of
Socrates would never convince them they could
live contentedly, indeed live at all, in the
vicinity
of a frog-pond!'
`Ay, there's the rub,' said Mr. Bennett. `
Accidental
circumstances connected with an
employment
,
give us an aversion to it, before we
have by experience ascertained how easy it is
to surmount such difficulties, and how trifling
they appear when once the mind is intent on
what it considers important. It is this which
makes it so necessary to obtain the sanction of
fashion for whatever we wish to make popular,
because then the
attainment
only is regarded
not the labor or privations by which it is won.
Do you not think, Miss Ashton, those young
ladies you mention, while acquiring their
knowledge of music, submitted to restraints as
irksome as school keeping would impose?'
`Undoubtedlybut that was to acquire an
indispensable accomplishment.'
`Yes, according to the standard of fashion
but I anticipate the time, when our ladies will
not be prized solely for possessing
accomplishments
,
but for improving themwhen the
waste and wild places of our country, will all
be cultivated and beautified, by the industry
and taste of the men, and the minds of our
people
refined, and intelligent, and liberal, by the
united exertions of the pure, and pious, and
enlightened of both sexes. In short, when it
will become fashionable for young ladies to be
usefully, rather than romantically active; and
then the sight of a frog-pond would no more
deter them from engaging in a school, than
would the joltings, privations, and fatigue they
must endure, prevent them now from taking a
trip to the White Hills, or a tour to Niagara.'
Ten years after Mr. Bennett had thus
philosophized
to these gay girls, they again met at
his house. They were both happily married,
both had children; and Elizabeth Brooks, still
following the vocation she had chosen, was the
instructress they both preferred. She was
almost
adored by her pupils, and respected and
beloved like a relative by their parents; and
the placidity of her countenance, and
cheerfulness
,
even vivacity of her manners, was a proof
that her mind was contented, and her life
pleasant
as well as useful. She also was on a visit
to the clergyman.
`I have lately received a letter from my
nephew, William Forbes,' remarked Mr.
Bennett
.
`He is, I find, a widower.'
The married ladies glanced at Elizabeth,
but her countenance was unchanged.
`He says he shall be here in the course of a
few months, if he can learn whether a certain
lady who first engaged his affections is at
liberty
,
and would receive him favorably,'
continued
the clergyman.
The married ladies both smiled, and a slight
color was perceptible on the mild, chastened
features of Elizabeth.
`He says,' continued the clergyman, `he
has fortune, fame, friends, all that is necessary
to make him happy, except the consciousness
of rectitude, which, since violating his
engagement
with Elizabeth, he has never enjoyed,
and a partner to share his confidence and
prosperity
.
He acknowledges his fault, but thinks
he has already been sufficiently punished.
The lady he married was beautiful, and he was
dazzled by her charms, till he forgot, or rather
relinquished his first love; but his wife never
made him happy. He does not accuse her of
imperfections, only remarks that they were
unequally
matched; that there never was, that
there could not be, between them that
communion
of mind, to which he had always been
accustomed in his intercourse with Miss
Brooks. He was not himself aware, how
much of his happiness depended on this
communion
,
till he had forfeited it. He entreats
me to intercede for him.'
`What answer did Elizabeth give?'
The subject was under discussion all the
afternoon
.
The married ladies advised her to
accept the offer of her penitent loverthey
probably expected an invitation to the wedding.
The good clergyman told her to consult her
own heart, and those excellent principles that
had so nobly and effectually supported her
under every vicissitude. But he hinted how
much pleasure it would give him to see her
married to a worthy man; indeed, he said he
should like to pronounce the nuptial
benediction
himself.
`What answer did Elizabeth give?'
I intend, hereafter, to sketch the character
of William Forbes, and then the propriety of
the answer which Elizabeth did give, will be
apparent. Till then, every lady and
gentleman
,
who does me the honor to read these
`Sketches,' is at liberty to form and express
their own opinion on the subject.
THE
BELLE AND THE BLEU.
The world is too much with us.
Wordsworth
.
Mark yonder pomp of costly fashion,
Round the wealthy bride;
But when compared with real passion
Poor is all that pride
What are their showy treasures?
What are their noisy pleasures?
The gay gaudy glare of vanity and art.
The polished jewel's blaze
May draw the wond'ring gaze,
But never, never can come near the worthy heart.
Burns
.
J. W.
Thompson
, Esq. was a very rich man,
and a very melancholy manone of those
characters, who, seemingly blessed with all that
earth can give, are yet always repining and
finding
fault with the wind, the weather, the season;
or else complaining of ill luck, or ill health
and always feeling an ill temperbut the world
felt no sympathy for his sorrows. He had
passed through life calculating how he might
turn every incident that befell him to some
pecuniary profit, and his acquaintances were
now, in their turn, calculating how much he had
gained, and how soon he would leave his wealth
to his two daughters. Had he been a poor
man and worked at day-labor to support his
children, how much more his death would have
been lamented! For he diedthe rich die as
certainly, though not always as peacefully as
the indigent. His neighbours would have said,
`what will become of the poor girls now their
kind father is gone, who worked so hard ever
since his wife died, to provide for his darlings!
He is dead, and well may they weepthey
will never find such another tender friend.'
But when the rich J. W. Thompson, Esq.
died, they said no such thing.
`I do not think, Simon, the death of Squire
Thompson any great loss to the world,' said
Mr. Jacob Towner, to his hired man, as he
paused from his labor of mowing, and rested
his scythe on the ground, while the funeral
procession passed. `But yet I fear the world
is a great loss to him. When a man's heart
is wholly set upon the mammon of
unrighteousness
,
he must feel very poor when forced away
from his idol. But still, Simon, we will not
judge him,' continued he, raising his hand and
waving it with an oratorical motion as nearly
in imitation of his good clergyman as he
possibly
could; `we must not judge him, Simon.
Nevertheless I was thinking how foolish it is
for us to be so anxious for riches, when God
just as willingly receives a beggar as a prince,
and never shows any favor to a man because
he has left a great estate behind him. Ah!
Simon, what are all the things of this world but
vanity? Hark! is not that the sound of
thunder
?
We must make haste, or we shall
certainly
have our hay wet again, and then it will
be entirely spoiled. Go, run, and yoke up the
team as quick as possible, I will rake the hay.
How sorry I shall feel to have so much lost.'
`Do you think the young ladies will have
fifty
thousand dollars apiece?' inquired Mrs.
Patten of an elderly gentleman, who was
reported
to be a particular friend of the deceased
Squire Thompson, and intimately acquainted
with his affairs.
`Indeed, madam,' replied he, with a half
smile that seemed checked by the necessity he
felt of drawing a deep sigh while the coffin was
lowered into the ground`Indeed, Madam, I
can hardly sayor I ought not to say; there
are fortune hunters in our country as well as in
other countries; and it is rather dangerous for
young ladies to be reported rich. But this I
can say, that the young ladies will have enough.
Squire Thompson, though a very fretful man,
was careful in business, and his affairs are all
arranged. How much better it would be if
men, when they know they must die, would all
take care to have their papers put in order!'
`Then he did not expect to live,' observed
Mrs. Patten; `Pray was he reconciled to
death?'
`I can't say, Madam, as I never heard him
speak particularly on the subject. But then he
was quite passed the enjoyments of this life,
had no appetite nor relish for anything; and
indeed
he appeared so miserable that I could not
say I was sorry to see him die.'
`Did you observe the crape on the Miss
Thompsons' dresses?' inquired Miss Horton of
her companion, as they walked home from the
funeral. `How deep it was, and what rich
looking
bonnets they wore! I think
black
is a very
becoming dress when the materials are rich;
but poor, gray, dirty looking crape, is
abominable
.'
`They have a large fortune left them, and
can dress just as rich as they please,'
observed
the other.
`And will probably marry just whom they
choose,' returned Miss Horton. `I have heard
already of three young gentlemen who are
resolving
to address them.'
`I wish they knew it,' said the other; `I wish
they knew how much speculation there is about
their wealth. I fear they will be deceived.'
`They cannot imagine all the attention paid
them is for their beauty,' answered Miss
Horton
.
`Lucretia Thompson is absolutely ugly,
and Eliza, though a little more passable, is a
palefaced, baby-looking thing.'
`But then, Miss Horton, only think of
having
fifty thousand dollars at command! What
need of personal charms, or mental
accomplishments
,
with fifty thousand dollars?'
`And this is life'Squire Thompson was,
with reason, disliked by his neighbours; he
was known to be unhappyhe was
unlamented
at his death; and yet, because he left a
large estate, hundreds of people flocked to his
funeral, his two daughters were surrounded
by friends offering every service, and, even in
their mourning dresses, they were the objects
of envy to their own sex, and of matrimonial
speculation among the young gentlemen.
`And this is life.' Strange that gold should
have such sway over the minds of men, when
they must see that its possession does not
confer
happiness heremuch less prepare us for
that change which so soon and certainly
arrives
to the rich as well as the poor.
The daughters of the deceased, though
differing
in disposition, were not, either of them,
by nature endowed with anything more than
that common kind of capacity which fitted them
for an ordinary station; but nevertheless, as
heiresses, they were destined to figure in the
beau-monde
, and the ingenuity of their
dependents
and flatterers was soon taxed to discover
in their minds the seeds of genius or fancy,
talents
or taste being essentially requisite for
those ladies who cannot lay claim to beauty.
Lucretia Thompson (I name her first,
notwithstanding
she was the younger born,
because
she assumed those superior airs which
she considered necessary to exhibit superior
talents, and always would take precedence of
her sister,) was a tall, dark-complexioned,
bold-looking
girl, with large features, and she would
have had quite a sour expression of
countenance
,
had not the consciousness that she had
very handsome teeth caused her to wear an
almost constant simper, which did not appear
in perfect keeping with her quick eye and the
frown that frequently passed over her brow
when anything occurred that crossed her
humor
.
Eliza, though possessing a far better
complexion
than her sister, could hardly be
termed
handsomer, for her hair was a dull yellow,
and so coarse, stiff and wiry, that all attempts
to reduce the refractory locks to an imitation of
those sweet curls that always shade so
gracefully
the fair brow of a heroine of romance,
proved of little use in the toilet of the heiress
of fifty thousand dollars. Then Eliza had a
low, narrow forehead, turned up nose, and a
very short face, giving her countenance an air
of conceit and
unintellectualness
(the word, if
not in the Dictionary, ought to be) that
redeemed
her from all suspicion of being born a
bleu
.
Yet nature usually bestows on every form some
grace, and to Eliza she had given a very lovely
neckwhite as a lily, and with that graceful
curve that poets denominate `swanlike.' If
the fine teeth of Lucretia induced her to talk
and laugh unceasinglythe beautiful bosom of
Eliza led her to study dress and attitude; and
thus one was soon termed a
sentimental
the other
a
literary
lady.
In one short year after the death of Squire
Thompson, he seemed forgotten, or only
remembered
as a man who had toiled to lay up a
hoard of wealth which would be a fine
acquisition
to the young gentlemen who could obtain
the orphan heiresses. These ladies drew
around them a crowd of company, because they
really gave elegant entertainments; and as
the gentlemen who frequented the house paid
them great attention, they were reported to
have many admirers. Eliza Thompson's
elegant
dresses and romantic air were
universally
admired, while Lucretia's sublimely silly
speeches were certainly listened to with
apparent
interest, by educated and intelligent men;
and when she attempted to be witty, she always
excited a burst of laughter, merely by laughing
herself. Ought it to excite wonder, that these
young ladies fancied they possessed every
requisite
accomplishment for females, when they
saw the gentlemen thus obsequious to attend
their smiles, while the ladies copied all their
fashions and strove to imitate their manners?
Such are the dangers to which the
unprotected
rich are exposed;such the omnipotence
of gold.
The apartments in the dwelling of the Miss
Thompsons were all lighted up, and
arrangements
had apparently been made for a large
party. The two sisters, splendidly arrayed,
were seated on a sofa at the upper end of their
drawing room, engaged in a low but animated
conversation; and a person stationed at such a
distance as to preclude hearing their words,
would doubtless have thought them discussing
the manner in which they intended to receive
their guests, or dwelling on the pleasure
anticipated
from the expected company. But
ladies, even when arrayed in silks and decked
with pearls, are not always happy; nor when
about to receive with smiles a smiling throng,
do they always expect gratification.
`I am sure, Lucretia, he pays more
attention
to Helen than her relationship to us would
naturally induce,' said Miss Eliza Thompson,
unclasping her bracelet in affected agitation.
`Now pray, sister, show less sensibility,'
replied Lucretia. `I have told you it was only
in consequence of the conversation I held with
Mr. Howard respecting the Iliadthe name
of Helen in that charming poem naturally
introduced
our cousin's name, and he made
inquiries
respecting her which I could not very
well evade, and so I told him the circumstances
of her parents' death, and that she was now
wholly dependent on usand I assure you he
complimented us very highly for our
generosity
in affording her protection. From what
I said I presume he thought he could not more
effectually recommend himself to us than by
noticing the poor girl.'
`I wonder, Lucretia, you mentioned the
manner of uncle Bond's death to Mr. Howard,'
said Eliza, attempting to sigh. `You know
his tenderness of heart, and how such histories
affect him, almost as much as they do me. I
declare, I never think of uncle Bond without
shuddering, and I have been half inclined to
send Helen away, because her presence so
frequently brings her father to my mind.'
`Is that all the reason you wish her
absence
?'
`O, noI think she engrosses the pity, and
so gains the notice of all our acquaintance.
And she looks sorrowful all the timejust as
if she was n't happy here, and didn't feel at all
obliged to us; and then I see several of the
young ladies copy her style of dressing her
hair, as if they thought it more becoming than
mine.'
12
`You should feel above such things,' said
Miss Lucretia, tossing her head with a
scornful
air. `I am sure I have more reason to
dislike Helen than you have, but I will not let
my mind be moved by insignificant trifles. It
was only last Thursday when Mr. Beckman
was here, and we were agreeably engaged in
discussing the beauties of Marmion. Mr.
Beckman was trying to recall a stanza in one
of the songs; I could not tell him, for indeed I
only skimmed the book, just to be able to
converse
about it; and don't you think he asked
Helen if she recollected it; and she had the
effrontery to repeat every word, and then he
directed all his conversation to her, and she
seemed to understand all he said, though much
of it was about characters and sentiments that
I never heard of before? I should have been
provoked with Helen, only I thought myself
above it.'
`It will be just so this evening,' said Eliza.
`You will find Helen will gain the attention of
Howard and Beckman, and those are the only
gentlemen we shall have that I care a straw
for. I wish she was away.'
Helen Bond, the innocent cause of all this
disturbance in the minds of these young ladies,
was the only child of a deceased clergyman.
He was drowned by the upsetting of a boat, in
consequence of the intoxication of one of the
boatmen, as he was returning from a voyage
taken for the benefit of his health, and which
had apparently re-established it. He was
drowned in sight of his own home, of his wife
and child, who had hurried to the beach to
welcome
his landing. He went down with their
shrieks of agony ringing in his ears; but his
was the most enviable lot. Who can tell the
bitterness of that sorrow with which the new
made widow and her fatherless daughter hung
over the lifeless remains of him, who, under
heaven, had been their stay and comforteron
whom had been all their dependence for
happiness
and support! In such cases `'tis the
survivor dies'
Mrs. Bond, however, survived her husband
only a few months, and then poor Helen had
no resource but to seek her livelihood among
strangers, or accept the offer of a residence
with her cousins, the Miss Thompsons.
Helen
Bond had been as well instructed as the
present imperfect system of female education
will admit. But with all her `solid' learning
and accomplishments, she still suffered from
that radical defect in the fashionable education
of young women, namely, that she had not been
taught the application of her learning to any
useful purpose. It is this defect which
renders
the educated, when deprived of friends
and resources, less capable of providing for
themselves than are the ignorant who have not
been made delicate and sensitive by refinement
of intellect and manners.
One feminine accomplishment, however,
Helen possessed and improved advantageously
she excelled in fine needlework, and it was
the knowledge of her expertness and industry in
sewing, that induced her cousins to wish her
residence with them. They had need of her
assistance, for they were very indolent, and
they availed themselves to the utmost of her
taste and skill in the designing and finishing
their elaborate dresses. But still they
affected
to consider Helen as entirely beholden to
their generosity for a home, and she daily felt
all the bitterness of dependance, superadded
to the necessity of earning her own bread.
She wished to break the thrall, but it required
an effort of mind, which a timid and delicate
young lady of eighteen, who had never been
familiarized to the idea that she could, should
necessity and duty dictate, support herself,
would hardly be supposed sufficiently
energetic
,
to make. But when she discovered the
envy and jealousy her cousins entertained
towards
her, and perhaps felt a little conscious
when surveying herself in the glass, that she
was a dangerous rival to them, especially in
their designs on the heart of
one
young
gentleman
whom they wished to attract, she
determined
to leave their roof, though she went to
service to earn her livelihood. Her resolution
was accelerated by the occurrences of the
evening
on which the Miss Thompsons gave their
brilliant assembly. The marked attention
paid Helen by Horatio Howard exasperated
the sisters, and the ironical compliments they
lavished on her the next day, she considered
so cruel and humiliating, that her spirit,
subdued
as it had been by sorrow and suffering,
rose at once to the aid of her reason, till she
no longer hesitated to follow its dictates. She
applied to a friend of her late father, told him,
in part, her trials, and besought him to find
some business in which she might with
propriety
engage. With the most delicate kindness
he offered her a home in his own family; but
though her rejection of his generous offer was,
for some time, impeded by her tears of
gratitude
,
it was nevertheless decided.
`I cannot,' said she, `consent to live any
longer in the ease of opulence, when at the
best I can only enjoy it by the benevolence
of friends. If I were deprived of health, or
incapable of exertion, the case would be
otherwise
;
I would then humbly accept your
generous
offer of a maintenance; but I am
determined
never to attempt to mingle again in
splendid circles, while I am dependant on
charity for a support. There is, sir, to my
feelings, an impropriety almost an indelicacy,
in the situation of living thus without any
apparent
aim or present usefulness; yet I own I
might not have been sensible of this, had not
the unkind observations of my cousins taught
me to reflect. I have learned from them that
the young lady who does so live, is always
supposed
by the world to be anxiously watching
for an opportunity of establishing herself by
marrying, and that it is generally thought by
the gentlemen she will accept the first good
offer. They must then think her vain and
selfish, if not artful. O! I cannot endure such
surmises and observations'continued she,
bursting into a flood of tears`and if you
wish to make me contented and happy, pray
tell me something I can do for myself.'
Her father's friend in a short time procured
for her a situation as Instructress in an
Academy
at some distance from the metropolis;
and her letters soon breathed such a spirit of
satisfaction, that he would have felt amply
recompensed
for his trouble, in the idea that he
had contributed to her happiness, without the
acknowledgements she so frequently and
feelingly
made.
`I would not,' she wrote, `after passing a
day of activity in my school, exchange the
approbation
of my own heart, while it whispers
I have been usefully, rationally and innocently
employed, for the opportunity of attending
every party my fashionable cousins will give
through the season.'
`And how did her rich and fashionable
cousins enjoy themselves? Did they succeed
in securing their favorite beaux, when the
field was left them without a rival?' every
young lady is ready to inquire.
They did not, either of them, secure
Horatio
Howard. Yet he was very ambitious, as
young lawyers, who feel a consciousness of
their own abilities, are apt to be; and he knew
enough of the world to be sensible that the
eclat and advantage of commencing business
with a capital of $50,000 would be a mighty
convenient thing. And he began his visits to
the Miss Thompsons with something very
much like a resolution of making love to one
of them. Lucretia was the first object of his
scrutiny
it could be called nothing elsebut
with her he was soon disgusted.
To a man of real refinement, good sense,
taste and intelligence, the character of a
would-be-literary
lady is, I believe, most intolerable.
The
affectation
of those whims and
eccentricities
,
said to distinguish genius, is of all
affectations
,
most preposterous, and always indicative
of a silly mind, or weak judgmentin a man it
is ridiculous, in a woman disgusting. Yet this
affection was all the claim Lucretia had to
genius. She pretended to be absent-minded,
ignorant of common affairs, and above all, to
despise the dull routine of domestic duties her
sex enjoined upon her. Then she talked loud
and as learnedly as Mrs. Malaprop, and
delighted
in criticism and controversy,
argument
being, as she considered, her peculiar
forte
.
This propensity was much strengthened by
the manner in which she was treated by the
gentlementhe civility due a lady, especially
a rich lady, prompted them to allow the
assertions
of Lucretia all the credit of facts, and so
she usually gained the argument. But they
indemnified themselves for these concessions,
as they always do, by representing the object
of their complaisance too insignificant for
serious
opposition. Yet they dreaded the society
of Lucretia, and while ridiculing her pedantry,
generally hated her person. At least so did
Horatio Howard. But still he felt loath to
relinquish
the $50,000, and so turned his
attention
on the
belle
, and Miss Eliza Thompson
was, for some time, flattered with the idea that
she should win him. But if he was disgusted
with the affectation of literature in the
bleu
, he
was sickened by the affectation of sentiment
and sensibility in the
belle
; and he could not
but acknowledge that though learning might
make a woman excessively disagreeable, yet
she might be excessively disagreeable without
it. But yet he was constant in his visits, while
Helen Bond resided with her cousins, and
listened
without much apparent weariness to the
`long talks' of Lucretia and the common place
nothings of Eliza; and the world had decided
that he would certainly marry one of the sisters.
Perhaps he rather thought such would be the
conclusion of the matter. However he called
on the young ladies a few days after the
departure
of Helen Bond, and they both
remarked
he was in very bad humor, seemed impatient,
almost irritable, while they were exerting
themselves
to entertain him; the one criticising the
sermon she had heard the last sabbathand
the other ridiculing the odious bonnets she had
seen at churchtill finally, Howard started
abruptly from his seat, said something of
business
to be attended to, and wished them both
good morning. He was seen walking hastily
towards his office, his hat set very
perpendicular
on his head, and his lips firmly compressed;
and to judge from his conduct, afterwards, he
was then breathing a vow never to risk his
domestic
happiness by a marriage in which gold
was the only object of pursuit. From that time
he devoted himself entirely to the business of
his profession; invitations were rejected and
parties neglected, till finally, though he
obtained
high reputation at the bar, he entirely lost
credit with the ladies, and his name was omitted
on their list of beaux, being called a
confirmed
bachelor.
But there is no danger that young ladies
with $50,000 will not find husbands, though
like Lucretia, they make a resolution never to
wed a man that has not been liberally
educated
.
A thoroughly selfish mind, even when
polished by a liberal education, will retain its
selfishness. Such a mind had John Beckman,
and though he disliked Lucretia Thompson he
married her. There was probably more
affection
on her part, yet she declared that it
was only because Mr. Beckman knew so well
how to appreciate her talents that she was
induced
to accept him. But his estimation of
her talents, after the `vow was said,' she found
altered materially; he no longer consulted her
opinion, before expressing his own, nor yielded
her every contested point, nor expressed any
wishes that his taste might be always in
accordance
with hers. Indeed their opinions or
taste, were seldom in accordance after the first
three months of their wedded life had passed.
In vain she tried arguments, reproaches and
railings, to convince him she was ill-treated.
He would not be convinced.
`Mr. Beckman,' said she, her eyes flashing
fire, and her whole countenance glowing with
rage, `had I known you for such an obstinate
mule, one that will not listen to an argument,
I never would have married you.'
13
`Madam,' he replied, with the most perfect
coolness, `I am not disappointed in youI
always
knew you for a fool.'
Eliza Thompson married a husband more
congenial in disposition to herself; a pert,
conceited
fop, all fashion and affectation. Her
money supported them in style just ten years,
and they lived by expedients three more of
showy poverty, and then all the glitter of life,
and consequently to them, all its joys were
over. They now inhabit a miserable garret,
up three pair of stairs, dependant mostly on the
charity of their relations. The bounty of Mrs.
Beckman is, however, grudgingly bestowed on
her sister, and always accompanied by a
chapter
of reproaches, under the title of advice.
The answer of Eliza is generally to the purport,
that she has a kind husband, and therefore is
as happy without fortune as Lucretia is with.
Mr. Jacob Towner is careful to add a little
to his stores every year, but yet constantly
harangues his family on the vanity of setting
the affections on the things of this world,
observing
that rich men's children are frequently
paupers, and illustrating his position by citing
the case of Eliza Thompson; always ending
his remarks with the hope that some of her
$50,000 found its way back into the pockets
of those poor men from whom it was wrung
by her father. Mrs. Patten, likewise, often
quotes the name of Eliza Thompson, when
she would warn her daughters against
extravagance
in dress, or idleness, which she thinks
was the whole cause of the misfortunes of the
heiress; and Miss Horton congratulates
herself
she was never induced to marry, saying,
`that the fate of the rich Miss Thompsons was
a warning to her; if those ladies could only
obtain
for husbands the one a sullen miser, and the
other a silly spendthrift, she is sure the single
state must be the one of blessedness.'
Helen Bondwhat young lady does not wish
to learn the fate of that afflicted, but high-souled
girl? Horatio Howardwhat young
gentleman
,
especially if he prefer that `clear honor'
which is `purchased by the merit of the
wearer
,'
to the trappings of wealth, obtained by the
perjury of the heart, does not feel curious to
know the issue of the fortunes of Horatio
Howard
?
Talents and merit, if supported by
industry
and prudence, have, in our free country,
nothing to fear. Horatio Howard gained the
station of eminence he so justly deserved; and
to the friend who not long since visited him, he
said, as they were returning from a walk in the
gardens around his beautiful summer residence
`Yes, I have been, as you remark, highly
prospered, but the best gift Heaven ever
bestowed
on me was, mywife. It may sound
foolish for me to speak her eulogiumto a
stranger, I certainly should not thus unlock the
secret casket of my soul; but you, sir, was
acquainted with Helen Bond, and with my
partiality
for her. But dearly as I loved her then,
she is now far dearer, because I now know
her worth and can repose my whole heart in
confidence upon her discretion as well as her
affection. There is for me no place like
home
.'
THE POOR SCHOLAR.
`Wherever there has existed wise institutions for the
security
of liberty the progress of knowledge has immediately
become
visible. There is then a bright inducement in every
career which an ardent mind springs forward to attain.'
Madame de Stael
.
Not
intellectually
poor, but few however
would be guilty of such a mistake. Most men,
and indeed women too, consider poverty
merely
as the lack of worldly goods, chattels and
possessions;
poor
therefore would never, by
such, be applied to
mind
.
But I like to define my meaning so clearly
that there shall not be the possibility of mistake;
and accordingly I feel bound to declare that
George Torrey had, from infancy, exhibited an
uncommon aptitude for learning, and that kind
of inquisitiveness concerning the nature and
design of everything he saw, that marks the
reasoning child. These qualities always argue
a tendency of mind that requires only right
cultivation to insure eminence, or at least,
scholarship, to their possessor. `Knowledge
may be acquired by study, but genius is the
gift of God,' is, I believe, a quotation; and had
the writer of the apothegm known George
Torrey
,
he might have mentioned him as an
illustration
of his proverb, since it seemed
impossible
his inclination for study should have been
fostered either by example or precept. I shall
relate the childish history of my hero minutely,
that those who feel interested in the subject
may have an opportunity of tracing the
operations
of his young mind, and then they can
better decide on the propriety of styling him,
as he often was, the `scholar of nature.' The
father of George died before he was born, and
his mother, when he was eighteen months old;
and then the boy would have been on the
pauper
list, but for the benevolence of an aunt, an
old maid, but who was nevertheless such a
good, kind hearted creature, that it was always
a matter of astonishment to the gossips why
aunt Jemima was never married.
When aunt Jemima thus voluntarily
burdened
herself with the charge of an infant, she was
rising of forty years of age, very poor,
obtaining
her livelihood solely by spinning. She
was, however, as expert in the business of the
distaff, as ever were the ladies of Rome; but
as she never attempted to dignify her
employment
by any classical allusions, it is probable
she had never heard the name of `Lucretia.'
Yet she had pride, and it would be no
disparagement
to the Roman ladies to say aunt
Jemima's
was Roman pride; certainly it was
laudable
ambition, for it stimulated her to honest
exertions for her own support and the
maintenance
of her little nephew, without appealing to
the cold charity of her prosperous neighbours,
or the colder charity of the law. She kept
George with her till he was eight, and then a
farmer offering to take him and learn him the
`mystery of agriculture,' she deemed it her
duty to place the boy with Mr. White. But
the separation cost her many tears, and she
often declared that `if she had not thought it
best for the child to go, she would have
worked
her hands off before she would have parted
with the dear little creature.'
George had never been at school a single
day while with his aunt; she thought she could
not provide books for him, and moreover, she
lived two miles from the school-house, and was
afraid to trust her darling to go so far alone.
But when she read in her Bible, which was
regularly every morning, little George was
permitted
to stand close by her chair, and
encouraged
to find and tell the large letters. When
he had thus learned them, his curiosity seemed
increased; and his aunt willingly answered his
inquiries, because she really loved him, and
dearly loved to talk, and so he learned the small
letters, and then it was not long before he could
read a verse intelligibly. By the time he was
four years of age he had read through the `
Gospel
according to St. John.'
Though aunt Jemima thus fostered the
`young idea,' she was herself as destitute of
those acquirements that confer on a woman the
character of a
bas blue
, as any of our
fastidiously
fashionable young beaux could desire. The
most sensitive of the tribe of dandies might
have conversed with aunt Jemima without the
least dread of being shocked by a Latin
quotation
,
or
bored
by a learned phrase, or a
reference
to books of which he never before heard
the titles; neither would he have run any
hazard
of being urged to write in an `album,' or
tell his opinion of the `last new novel,' or
admire
the last `charming poem.' Aunt
Jemima
knew no more of novels or albums, than
she did of Greek or Arabic; indeed it is not
probable she had ever read a whole volume of
any kind, (the Bible excepted) during her life.
Her library, besides the `Scriptures,' consisted
of but two books, both of which she inherited
from her grandmother. One was a sermon,
preached somewhere in Connecticut, at the
funeral of an Indian who was hanged for
murder
.
This sermon, aunt Jemima said, `though
she never had had time to read it all, she thought
very edifying.' Indeed she prized it so highly
that she did not like to trust it in the grasp of a
careless child; but the other book, labelled
`Wonderful accidents and entertaining Stories,'
she permitted George to use as he pleased.
The volume had once contained some
interesting
articles, but time, smoke, and the hands of
`unwashed artificers' had made its pages
nearly
as dingy and illegible as a Herculaneum
manuscript. The story of `Alnaschar the
Persian Glassman,' being in the middle of the
book, was however tolerably entire, but it was
much abridged, ending with the breaking of the
glass. The plate representing the overturn of
the basket pleased little George, and he soon
learned to read the fable; he read and re-read
it till he could repeat every word, and then he
reasoned with aunt Jemima on the subject till
he made her quite pettish at answering his
inquiries
about so silly a story; and then he
considered
the matter himself in silence, till he
learned to understand the meaning and the
moral more judiciously than would many a
grown man. Perhaps that story determined
the bias of his mind, for he was, even in early
youth, noted for the directness with which he
sought and comprehended the effect of any
romantic project, always seeming to distrust
everything illusory, and to feel that
exertions
,
not idle wishes or visions, were necessary to
success.
There was also another circumstance that
contributed to fix an impression on the mind
of George that perseverance would be
rewarded
,
and that he might, if he took proper
methods
,
hope to obtain some consequence in the
world. Though aunt Jemima paid little
attention
to the story of `Alnaschar,' yet she was
proud of the proficiency her favorite made in
reading the Scriptures. Whenever the
clergyman
of the parish called to see her, which
duty he usually performed regularly every
year, she always dilated on the progress her
nephew made in learning, telling how many
chapters he would read in the Bible of a
Sunday
,
&c. (she never mentioned the story book)
usually concluding with the observation, `that
for her part it seemed to her that the boy was
born to be a minister.'
To please her the good man once requested
to hear the child read, and was himself very
much surprised at his performance, because he
read so understandingly. He called the boy
to him, and laying his hand on the curly hair
of the poor, destitute orphan, gravely said,
`My little fellow you have no father on earth,
but your Father who is in heaven still watches
over you. He will take care of you if you are
good, and you must look to him, and love him,
and serve him. You can learn, I see, and you
may, if you try, be a scholar, and perhaps a
great man. You must always depend on God,
but remember and do all you can for yourself.'
That lesson was never effaced from the
memory of George Torrey. He had never
before received notice or encouragement from
any mortal except his old aunt, and the
soothing
expressions of the minister fell on his ear
like a sacred promise from some exalted
being
.
The farmer to whom George was bound was
a man of some property, and reputed honest
and industrious; but he had no education.
Indeed
both he and his wife, (would there were
none other such couples to be found in our
country,) were profoundly ignorant of
everything
pertaining to literature, excepting that
they could read, and write their names; and
had not the boy enjoyed the advantage of
attending
the district school, he would in no wise
have been mentally benefited by his change
of abode. But it was stipulated in his `
Indenture
,'
that he should be `sent to school two
months every winter till he could read, write,
and cipher through the rule of Three.' Such
is the vigilance with which our laws watch
over the interests of the poor and destitute;
none here are deprived of the benefit of
instruction
,
none need be ignorant.
The first winter that George Torrey
attended
school, his proficiency astonished his
instructer
,
and made Mr. White declare `he
did'nt believe the lad would ever be good for
anything at farming.' But a judicious person
who had been acquainted with the operations
of his young mind, and the peculiar train of
ideas he had imbibed, might have calculated
the result. Though aunt Jemima did not
expect
it, yet she was highly delighted, and took
much credit to herself for the manner in which
she had instructed the child.
Ten years passed, and George Torrey was
in stature a man; in understanding and
learning
,
he was far superior to the men among
whom he resided; but his modesty and the
retiring diffidence that usually accompanies
genius when self-taught, prevented him from
assuming those airs of superiority that
frequently
bring envy and ill-will to the possessor
of extraordinary abilities. The business in
which he was engaged could not be supposed
congenial to his feelings, yet he labored
faithfully
for Mr. White; and that man, destitute
as he was of taste and literature, paid great
respect to the talents of his indented boy,
employing
him to keep his accounts, consulting
him in all his bargains, and frequently allowing
him leisure for reading which seemed
incompatible
with his own interest, and which would
not have been expected from a person of his
habits. But in a country where there is no
privileged class, genius and industry may attain
the highest honors; and thus a value is
stamped
upon talents, which carries a conviction of
their worth to the minds of those who make no
pretension of possessing them.
The winter succeeding the eighteenth
birthday
of George was an important one to him, as
it was then he first formed a fixed resolve to
obtain an education. At that time, the
clergyman
,
who had listened to the Bible lesson of
George, heard his attainments spoken of as
extraordinary for his opportunities; and on
inquiry
being satisfied of the truth of popular
report, he proposed the youth as a teacher, in
his, the clergyman's district, for the winter
school. The worthy parson felt glad to assist
George, and he felt a little proud too, that the
prediction he had uttered concerning him,
seemed likely to be fulfilled.
Mr. White was persuaded to allow George
to go, yet he said he `needed him at home, but
as the young fellow seemed so set upon the
business, he could not disappoint him.
Learning
he knew was a fine thing, though he never
could get it, for he never loved his book; but
George loved to study better than he did to eat
he had known him leave his dinner many a
time to read a newspaper, or anything that
had letters on itand so,' he continued, `it is
for his good I consent to let him go.'
Mr. White thought of his own interest,
notwithstanding
these professions; George had
offered, if he might be allowed to keep the
school, to give every cent of his wages to his
legal
masterand it would be more than he
could earn by labor. The youth expected only
more leisure, and books, and better society
that was all he then coveted, to make him
blessed
.
He boarded with the clergyman, Mr.
Dorr, who was not long in discovering his
talents
and thirst for learning. Mr. Dorr, was
one of those really benevolent men, who
delight
in doing good, and diffusing happiness;
yet he was not a visionary. His sound
judgment
and acquaintance with the world, served
to correct that enthusiasm, which the warmth
of feeling, necessary to make a philanthropist,
often raises to an effervescence of zeal which
destroys, or renders ridiculous, the cause or
object it is attempting to serve.
Mr. Dorr weighed deliberately the present
prospects, and what might be the future
expectations
of the poor scholar. He conversed
with George freely, and faithfully, on the
subject
;
represented to him the struggles he must
make, the privations he must endure, the
mortifications
to which he would be exposed, if he
left the vale of humble life, where he was born,
and had been raised, and aspired to rank with
the rich, and mingle with the gifted.
`I can do it all, I can bear it all,' eagerly
replied George Torrey, `if I may but escape
poverty of mindthis sense of my own
ignorance
that oppresses me, whenever I approach
or attempt to converse with an intelligent
person
;
I have,' continued he, rising and walking
the room with quickness, `I have frequently
laid down the book I was reading, and wept
to think I should never be qualified to write
one.'
`Onward, then, must be your motto,' said
Mr. Dorr. `Onward; the path will sometimes
be rugged, but a prize cannot be won without
labor. Industry is, in our land, the grand
lever
that exalts to eminence. I will cheerfully
give you all the aid I can. If you succeed,
your own pleasure and the praises of the world
will be enhanced by reflecting on the obstacles
you have surmounted; should you fail, you
can comfort yourself, that your object was
praiseworthy. It is motives, not triumphs,
that make the merit of our character.'
George Torrey immediately commenced the
study of the Latin; and when his school was
finished, had read six books in Virgil.
`You must now return to your labor, to the
plough,' said Mr. Dorr, to George, as he
extended
his hand to him. `I am not able to
assist
you in purchasing your time, neither do I
think it best to attempt it. Young men are
prone to be restless and impatient of restraint,
and genius is peculiarly restive under fetters;
but lessons of self-denial are rarely injurious to
a mind like yours. The dull require the spur,
the ardent need the rein. I advise you to
serve out your time as the law directsbut
there will be intervals when you may, without
wronging your master by eyeservice, pursue
your studies. Improve such moments, and
come to me, as freely as a son to a father, for
instruction whenever you wish.'
There is nothing on earth so valued by the
young, ingenuous mind as kindness, as those
expressions that seem dictated by a sympathy
for our feelings and situation. The eyes of
George were full of tears, and his heart
throbbed
with emotions of gratitude, as he turned
from the door of the man whom he considered
his friend. He felt for him a love, a
veneration
,
which no pecuniary gift could have
excited
;
and the first effort he ever made to
scribble
poetry, was to celebrate the virtues of his
benefactor, which he did in a long ode.
Mr. White made George a present of five
dollars out of the money he had earned, and the
youth was quite thankful, because he was
enabled
to purchase some books he sadly needed;
but he never bestowed on Mr. White so much
as a distich in praise of the deed.
The success of George is doubtless
anticipated
;
and to detail all the particulars, the
carefulness with which he improved every
moment
,
the shifts he made to obtain books, the
distances he would walk to his recitations, and
the joy he felt when the law pronounced him
free
, and Mr. Dorr pronounced him fitted for
college, would make my story too long. Any
young man, let his station be ever so lowly,
who feels the same ardor in the pursuit of
knowledge that kindled the mind of my hero,
may satisfy himself, if he will only make the
experiment, that success is possible. When a
name and a praise may here be obtained by
talents and industry, who that feels the `God
within him' will be contented in ignorance
and obscurity?
But though George Torrey was fitted to
enter
college, he had not the means of
supporting
himself there a single day. All that his
master was bound to give him, when he was
twenty-one, was two suits of clothes and a
Bible
.
Mr. Dorr again volunteered to assist him.
`I will,' said the good man, `advance you a
sum sufficient to defray the expense of your
first term, and wait these ten years, if
necessary
,
for payment. But that is all the
pecuniary
aid I can promise youyou must
thenceforth
provide for yourself. I am acquainted
with the President, and one of the tutors is
my intimate friend. I will write to them, and
make such representations as will, I think,
induce
them to deal favorably by you, and grant
you periods of absence, which you must
employ
in keeping school. If you are
industrious
no,
that is not enough, you must be
laborious
, you can pursue your studies and
retain
your station in your class, though absent
six months in the year. Depend on yourself.
Never solicit charity if you can possibly avoid
it though when kindly offered, I would not
advise
you to reject it. But the spirit of our
government, of our people, is independence;
and the mind of an American, that will cringe
and fawn to obtain patronage, or indeed that
will eagerly accept pecuniary aid, I always
mark as grovelling, as deficient in that delicacy
of pride, that nice sense of honor which always
accompanies true genius. Never, my young
friend, forfeit your own self-respect; for your
heart will not be satisfied with the applause of
the world, unless you feel it is deserved.'
Fortified by such advice, and furnished with
a little cash, George departed; and perhaps
when it is considered that his most ardent
wishes
seemed likely to be fulfilled, it may be
imagined
he went joyfully. But it was not so.
When a person has been accustomed to a large
society and frequent changes of his
acquaintance
,
his feelings become, in a manner,
generalized
,
and he contemplates, without much
emotion, a separation from his old friends or an
introduction to new. But the warm-hearted
youth who has, whether from diffidence or
necessity
,
confined his thoughts and affections to
one set of objects, feels, on quitting them, as
though the world were a desert; as if all,
beyond
the little paradise of his love, were a
wilderness
;
and he should meet, instead of the
flowers, which, humble as they were, had still
blessed his path, beasts of prey at every step.
Much of this melancholy dread of the world
mingled with the triumph of being enabled to
pursue his studies, in the heart of George
Torrey
,
when he bade farewell to the man whom
he esteemed above every other person on earth,
and loved the bestaunt Jemima excepted.
None of his ambitious hopes had effaced from
his memory the kindness and affection of her
whom he considered his mother, and those
hours that young men usually devote to the
society of young ladies, or clubs of their own
sex, he had passed in the lonely and lowly
apartment of his poor old aunt, telling her his
progress and his plans, or perhaps reciting
some of his lessons which, though said in
whatever
language they might be, were still `Greek
to her,' she yet liked to hear, `because,' she
observed, `he could say his lesson so fast.' And
she was constantly boasting to every person
she could make listen to her, of the marvellous
acquirements of her nephew, declaring she
`did not believe there would be a scholar in
college
who could read faster.'
Neither was her admiration of learning an
inactive principle; all the assistance she could
render her own boy, as she called George, was
eagerly done. This however only amounted
to the giving him a few articles of clothing,
(her own manufacturing of course, and in her
opinion much the better for that,) and a vast
deal of good advice; in particular, she charged
him not to waste any time in vain company, for
she knew the evil of it, having been, when very
young, too fond of dancing;and then he must
always rise early, she found it the best for her
own health; and above all, not sit up too late
at night, it was very bad for the eyes. `I find,'
continued she, with a half sigh, `I have set up
too late myself; not studying to be sure, but
working for you, George, and my eyes begin
to fail a little already.'
She was past sixty; but when did a
single
woman ever willingly think herself old?
Though the sensitiveness which is sometimes
betrayed on this delicate subject is certainly a
14
weakness, yet if we examine the principle which
causes that susceptibility, we shall, at least,
acknowledge it an amiable weakness. There
have been,the sentiment is fast losing
advocates
,but
there have been opinions
industriously
propagated, that those ladies who lived
to a certain age without worshipping in the
temple of Hymen, were not always as women
should be`soft, mild, pitiful and flexible.'
In short, old maids have been considered
unlovely
and unloving, and what true woman but
recoils with instinctive horror from such a
conclusion
?
and deems the denial of her age
venial
when she would otherwise be subjected to
the imputation of being fastidious, malicious,
envious, ill-natured? It is an intuitive sense
of the worth and beauty of goodness, and an
abhorrence of the qualities which unfeeling
satire
or stupid misapprehension have stamped
upon the
name
of
old maid
, that make the term
one of reproach and dread.
These remarks, considering the relation in
which aunt Jemima stood to the poor scholar,
can hardly be called a digression. Had he
known his character was to have been
sketched
,
he would have insisted his kind relative
should have occupied at least half the space
allotted for his portrait. He loved her
sincerely
,
and always, during his life, vindicated the
neglected, yet useful order of
spinsters
, from
the unmerited calumnies with which they are
too often assailed.
A few weeks after George had departed,
Mr. Dorr received from his friend, the tutor,
a letter, which will better delineate the
appearance
of the youth and the impression he made
on the minds of his new associates, than any
description I could myself give. I have
therefore
obtained leave to transcribe what related
to him. It is somewhat long, but will not, I
hope, be found uninteresting.
`Your young friend is quite an original; and
were there not one here to `divide the crown'
with him, we should consider him a prodigy.
As it is, he excites much interest with us
tutors
,
and some envy, I fear, among the students.
But our opinions appear to have little effect
upon
him; he goes forward, without asking
admiration
or heeding ridicule, seemingly
determined
to master every science, and feeling the
acquisition of knowledge a sufficient reward
for all his pains. This I think to be the effect
of the solitary manner in which he has hitherto
pursued his studies. His mind has thus
acquired
an aim, and the habit of depending on itself,
on its own resources and reflections for those
sensations of pleasure, that it is usually thought
can never be enjoyed except in
communication
and participation, that is, in social
intercourse
.
His reserve, which the young wits in
the class are, I find, quite disposed to ridicule,
is, in my opinion, as much the effect of his
mental
independence, as of that diffidence which
you say he always exhibited. His fine talents
are disciplined, not discouraged by adversity,
and his judgment so cool and regulated, that
did not an occasional flash of spirit betray that
warmth of temperament which circumstances
have made it necessary for him to suppress, I
should think him born a Quaker. But he is
now an excellent specimen of the Puritan
character, in which shrewdness and simplicity,
ambition and humility, patience and activity,
fervor in spirit and prudence in action, were so
blended or so admirably balanced, that the
minds thus actuated possessed a decision which
rendered them invincible. It is this regulation
of the passions which constitutes that
self-control
so necessary to freemen, to those who
govern themselves; yet it is only a strong
mind that is ever endowed, in an eminent
degree
,
with this decision; and it is only a
cultivated
mind that makes it appear amiable.
`But it sits amiably on George Torrey,
because
he has so much modesty that you would
not, without close investigation, imagine him
such a determined character; and thus his
extraordinary
progress is attributed more to his
superior industry (which excites, you know,
but little envy) than to his superior genius.
`It is gladdening to see how talents will
surmount difficulties, but it rejoices me more to
behold their triumph over temptations. The
youth whom I mentioned as likely to prove a
formidable rival to George in the classical race,
is a fine example of this triumph. He is from
Virginia; his father, as I understand, is a very
rich man, one of the proud aristocracy of that
proud State. Robert Simonds has, therefore,
been from infancy accustomed to every
indulgence
and elegance that wealth can purchase,
and all that adulation that follows prosperity
and high rank. But this flattery has not
enervated
his mind; it has only modified his
manners
.
He has all that boldness of imagination,
that brilliancy of genius, that is elicited by
culture
and commendation. I do not think he has
more confidence in his own powers, more of
what we will call pride, than George Torrey
has; and yet his display of himself is so very
different, that a stranger would call one
haughty
,
the other humble. The original constitution
of the minds of these young men was doubtless
very similar; had the children been changed
in their cradles, as fairy stories have whilom
related possible, they would probably with their
names have completely changed characters.
There is, however, always a sympathy between
such spirits, unless jealousy of each other's
attainments
should keep them aloof,but this
jealousy Robert is too noble to indulge towards
one, who, like George Torrey, (I have related
to Robert the whole history of his rival,) is
struggling for an education as the means of
support; and on the other hand, the principles
of George are too well regulated to permit him
to harbor jealousy or envy against any person.
So these youths are already warm friends, and
I encourage the intimacy, because I think they
will reap a mutual advantage from the
intercourse
.
I admire to see them sitting side by
side, at their recitations, or walking arm in arm
to their recreations,there has been such a
contrast in their brief histories, and yet there is
such a similarity in their feelings, that it affords
much food for my philosophy, to trace the
causes
which have thus brought the mind of one
nursed in the lap of luxury, and that of a poor
parish child on a perfect level. These causes
must be sought in our free institutions, in that
perfect equality of birth which our laws declare
to be fixed in the nature of things, and
therefore
unchangeable. While our constitution
remains inviolate in this article, neither the
corruptions of luxury, nor the debasements of
poverty, will ever degrade the minds of our
countrymen to an extent that shall have much
perceptible effect on public morals, or render
precarious the preservation of our freedom;
because
there will be a redeeming influence in
the talents and virtue, that our impartial
institutions
will call forth from both extremes of our
populationthe rich and the poor. Equality
of birth, and the necessity of universal
education
,
are principles never before recognised or
acted upon by any government; till these are
relinquished, our republic is safe. They may
tell of the corruption of statesmen and the
violence
of party, but the majority will, after all,
go right; and though vice and ignorance may
sometimes be exalted, yet open admiration and
unhesitating suffrage will not be given except
to intelligence and virtue. These thoughts
have been forced upon me while reflecting upon
the favorable influence which the principle of
equality has had on my two favorite pupils.
`It has stimulated them both to exertion, and
will probably be the means of making them
ornaments
to their country. It taught Robert
Simonds
that his father's rank and wealth could
never be his passport to high consideration,
he must himself deserve the fame he coveted.
It encouraged the destitute orphan, while
toiling
for his bread, to cultivate those talents he
felt he possessed, by showing that the prize
was within his reach. It has thus directed
and impelled two minds of uncommon powers
to the attainment of knowledge and the love of
excellence, that appear likely to qualify them for
extensive usefulness; and thus, if we do not
subscribe to the opinion that ignorance is bliss,
we must believe the sum of human happiness
is proportionably increased.
`I am told that there are some, even in our
republican land, who attach great importance
to a pedigree, and imagine a kind of refinement
of blood is imparted to the individual whose
ancestors have, for two, or three generations,
laid by their working dresses. I should like to
have such title-loving people look upon my
specimen of nobility and of peasantry. They
would feel proud of both. Robert Simonds
commands attention, and George Torrey
engages
it. No person can behold either with
indifference. They positively are the finest
looking young men I ever saw. I often
examine
their features to decide which of the two is
the handsomest, but I never yet could. Still
there is no resemblance between them, except
that their height is the same. The figure of
George, though perfectly proportioned, shows
the strength of bones and sinews that have
been `strung by toil.' Robert is more slender
in form, and the richness and nicety of his
apparel
,
combine to give him an air of
effeminacy
,
especially if you regard his hand, which a
lady might envy; it is so small, taper-fingered
and delicate. George, on the contrary, is
always
plainly arrayed, and his hand, you know,
is enlarged by exercise, and hardened by the
plough. But the moment you look in his face,
you forget that labor has any effect but to
beautify. His active employment has
strengthened
his constitution, and imparted such a fine,
healthy glow to his complexion, that it really
makes one feel younger and happier to gaze
upon him; even his midnight vigils cannot
destroy
his bloom. But Robert will do to enact
the `pale student,' except when his spirit is
kindled, and then the blood rushes to his face
till his cheeks are died like scarlet.
Whenever
I see Robert alone, I always think
black
is much the most beautiful color for the eye,
that such have the most expressionthe most
soul. But the moment George enters, his bright
blue eyes, flashing with the consciousness of
ideas, or animated with eagerness to gain
them, I alter my opinion,or at least, I think
the color
of the eye is of no consequence. In
short I am, as you have doubtless discovered,
enthusiastic in my admiration and my
expectations
from both these young men.'
It is not my purpose to describe minutely
the progress of George Torrey, and the
exertions
he used while obtaining his education.
The four years passed,he had struggled
with many discouragements, and spent many
melancholy hours, but, aided by the counsels
of his old friend Mr. Dorr, and, whenever he
would accept it, by more tangible tokens of
regard from his young friend Robert Simonds,
and always exerting his own abilities to the
utmost
to help himself, George had succeeded.
The `poor scholar,' had won the highest
honors
of the college. The `Valedictory' was the
part assigned him in the exercises of the day;
he would willingly have relinquished it in favor
of his friend; indeed, he declared that of
right Robert Simonds should have had it; but
that generous young man replied;`I do not
pretend, George, to disclaim all ambition to
have that appointment; it would have gratified
my vanity, but it is not essential to my
interest
.
If I have, as you kindly intimate, the
learning that would entitle me to it, all I need
is obtained; but to you, my friend, it may be
of more benefit.
Honor
may be
profit
,'
continued
he smiling, `and though your independence
of spirit has given me trouble enough, yet I
admire it, and hope that the time is not far
distant
when you will bask in the smiles of
fortune
.'
`Yes, but then I must lose those of my
friend,' replied George. `O, this is a sad
world I think, since the saddest of all poets so
often expresses my feelings,
`Our very wishes, give us not our wish!'
That is now precisely applicable to my mind;
I have often thought, that could I reach the
station in my class, which I may at this moment
call mine, I should be perfectly blessed. But
15
after this pageant of vain glory, this
commencement
is over, then will come the real sorrow,
the parting with you.'
`Why need we part?' asked Robert. `Why
will you not conclude to accompany me to the
South; my fatherah, I see the haughty curl
on your lip, giving its veto against dependence.
You must earn your own livelihood. You may
do that in Virginia as conveniently as here.
Nothing will be easier than to find employment
as an instructer. I will write and recommend
you to some of the first families; after they are
acquainted with you, no recommendation will
be necessary. My parents will make the
companion
of their son as welcome as a relative.
We have warm hearts for our friends, George,
and some lovely girls too, that will, I hope,
make your heart warm.
Were you with these, my friend, you'd soon forget
The pale, unripened beauties of the North.'
`I always understood that bloom and
brilliancy
of complexion, were on the side of our
northern beauties,' said George.
`But you will find, according to the quotation
I have just made, and indeed from the whole
speech of the old Numidian Chief, that such a
conclusion must be erroneous. You are an
excellent critic on facts, and if you think
Addison
committed a blunder in placing his
glowing
dames beneath a vertical sun, you ought
to expose him. This you may have an
opportunity
of doing if you will only go with me.
Virginia is sufficiently far to the southward to
commence your observations. Will you go?'
`In the course of a year, perhaps;if you
still desire it,' replied George.
Robert did continue to desire it, and in less
than a twelvemonth, George Torrey found
himself
domesticated in the family of Judge
Simonds
,
one of the most distinguished men of
Virginia. George had anticipated much
pleasure
as well as improvement from the
conversation
of the old Judge, whom his son had
represented
as very eloquent, and intelligent, and
communicative. His mother too, in the opinion
of Robert, was the very best woman in the
world. He had said but little of his sistervery
little,never had shown George any of her
letters
,
nor endeavoured to excite his curiosity
about her. George knew, to be sure, that
Robter
had a sister Delia, and he thought she had a
very pretty name for a pastoral poem, and that
was all he had thought of her till he was
introduced
to her. But he soon had many other
thoughts. If there is a young man who has
loved
,
tenderly and truly, and loved too, one who he
fancied would think herself above his sphere
loved in doubt and almost in despair, he will
very easily divine the meditations of my hero.
He will know why George trembled to meet
Delia, and sighed to leave her; why his pulse
quickened at her name, and why his heart and
his brain throbbed when any other man
approached
her. Why he watched for her smile
as though it were a law to guide him; and why
every word she spoke he considered important,
and worth treasuring.
And if there be a beautiful young lady, who
has seen she was beloved by a man of worth,
of mind, intelligence and refinement,one
whom she was satisfied would ever be to her
that kind, constant, judicious friend, which
woman
so much needs to guide and support her
through `this world's rough wilderness;' if she
has felt gratitude for her lover's preference of
her, and esteem for his character, increasing
with every interview; if she has blushed to
name him, trembled lest her partiality should be
suspected,watched for his coming, and yet
faltered while attempting to welcome him, she
may be sure her sensations have been very
similar
to those felt by Delia Simonds, after a few
months acquaintance with George Torrey.
Why cannot reason and education free the
mind from the dominion of prejudice?
Robert
Simonds knew the worth and talents of
George Torrey, and he loved him like a
brother
.
To have him marry Delia, had long been
his favorite wish. He saw their mutual
affection
,
therefore, with joy, and his favorable
representations
had induced Judge Simonds to
treat the young New-Englander with a
partiality
that was, at least, flattering.
George had been permitted to hope, and but
one circumstance prevented Robert from
acknowledging
,
with pride, the favored of his
sister
.
Some of the young Southern gentlemen
had doubted the courage of the Yankee,
doubted
whether he would have the spirit to resent
an insult like a gentleman, to accept a
challenge
if sent him, and these doubts had reached
the ears of Robert. He did not mention them
to George; he knew his principles on the
subject
,
and he perfectly agreed with him that to
fight a duel, when not to fight was considered
a disgrace, was no test of courage, but rather
a proof of moral cowardice. But reasoning
and feeling are very different things. Robert
did feel sensitive on this point; he did wish to
have the fame of George established, have
him deemed a man of honor,(That honor
which may be claimed by the veriest villain on
earth, if he only is a good shot and has killed
his adversary.)
There was in the neighbourhood a gentleman,
so styled, who had offered himself to Delia
Simonds
,
and been rejected. This circumstance
created no surprise with those who were
acquainted
with the parties, for Arnold Dixon was
very ugly in person, and disagreeable in
manners
,
such a being as no lady could love, and
Miss Simonds would never marry for riches.
But riches, especially if joined with a certain
assurance, will often keep a man in a station
to which neither his mind or morals entitle him.
Arnold Dixon was thus by sufferance
allowed
to mingle in good society; yet he knew he
was disliked, indeed, detested by the ladies,
and he grew cross, and envious of every
gentleman
younger, or handsomer than himself.
George Torrey especially he hated, and it was
from him that the insinuations against the
character of the Yankee mostly originated.
Robert Simonds despised Dixon, and
intended
to have no communication with him;
but they happened to meet one day at a dinner
party, and Dixon, when warmed with wine,
threw out reflections against the northern
people
,
mingled with such innuendoes against
George Torrey, that Robert's blood was up in
a moment, and he repelled the charges with
such terms of scorn, as provoked his
adversary
to fresh accusations, till finally the
company
interposed, and insisted that the affair
should be postponed to a more fitting time and
place.
Burning with indignation against Dixon, and
yet angry with himself for suffering the low
malice of such a man to disturb him, Robert
Simonds retired from the party. He knew
that, according to the code of honor, some
expressions
Dixon had used, must be considered
too offensive to be borne by an honorable man;
that a challenge was expected to ensue; and
since the affair must proceed, he thought he
would turn it to the best account possible.
He argued that if George Torrey would
consent
to be his second, it would in a great
measure
establish his reputation, because he would
be found to act with decision and spirit, as he
always did in the prosecution of any plan he
thought sanctioned by principle. In short, he
knew George was possessed of that daring,
determined
courage, that would, at the call of
his country, or in defence of freedom, have
prompted him to solicit the post of danger, to
stand in the `imminent, deadly breach,' or lead
the forlorn hope. But he knew, also, that
George regarded duelling and its laws with
abhorrence and contempt; that he thought it
degrading to a civilized man, and horrible for a
Christian, to engage or be concerned in an
affair ofmurder.
`And yet,' said Robert to himself, `he cannot,
under all the circumstances, refuse to be my
second in this affair, and that will satisfy the
world of his courage. O, if his firmness of
mind was only known, his courage would
never
be doubted.'
`You intend to challenge Dixon?' said
George Torrey, after he had listened to his
friend's story.
`I doI must. You smile, and I know
your opinion, and I know it is right,but we
must, while we live in the world, be guided by
the customs of society. Who can endure the
dread laugh of derision, that among us
follows
the man, who is pointed at as a coward?
I cannot, I will not, let the consequences be
what they may, I shall challenge Dixon. I
know he is a mean villain,I despise him;
and yet I shall give him a chance to acquire
honor to himself by killing me. I shall do
this in obedience to custom,to a custom that
I condemn, and wish was annihilated,But I
shall follow it notwithstanding. Will you,
George, be my second?'
The discussion that followed cannot be
given
at length, but the conclusion was, that
George Torrey, finding he could not reason
his friend out of the belief that there existed
no necessity for the duel, determined to take
the quarrel and the danger on himself.
`If,' said George, `this affair cannot be
overlooked without incurring disgrace, I will
send the challenge. The matter properly
belongs
to me. It was my section of the
country
that was vilified; it was me he intended to
insult. You generously defended me at the
table when I was absent; but that is no reason
why you should fight for me when I am
present
.
I repeat it,if there must be a challenge
I will send it, and you may act as my second.'
This arrangement was finally adopted.
Robert
felt some compunctious visitings of
conscience
while the challenge was penning; but
he was so anxious to have his friend, his
future
brother, considered a man of honor, that
he felt glad the affair was to be so decided.
He knew George was an excellent marksman,
and cool in spirit, and had the perfect
command
of his muscles. Dixon too, was expert
at shooting, but he was often intoxicated either
with passion or liquor, andwho can answer
for the thoughts of his heart when under the
dominion of violent prejudice? thousands have
been as culpable as was Robert Simonds, when
he eagerly anticipated seeing Arnold Dixon
weltering in his blood, slain by the hand of
George Torrey.
What did George Torrey anticipate? He
did not dare reflect on all the consequences
that might be the result of this rash affair. He
thought it his duty to send the challenge and
meet the foe, rather than permit Robert to
fight. But he hoped the matter would be
accommodated
;
that Dixon would decline, as he
might, without the imputation of cowardice, by
alleging that he had not intended to insult the
party who challenged. And then George
flattered
himself a little discussion would satisfy
all parties.
But George was disappointed; for Dixon
not only accepted his invitation to `meet him,
&c. on the ensuing morning,' but he exultingly
added, that he wished to have the affair
decided
immediately; that he had a friend with
him, and they would be on the spot in half an
hour, where `all preliminaries, &c. might be
easily settled.'
`He is drunk,' said Robert, his eyes
flashing
with joy; `your victory is secure.'
`My escape may be more probable,' replied
George. `I will meet him, and stand his shot
as your code of honor directs; but I will not
return his fire. I risk my own life to satisfy
what I consider a wicked prejudice; but I will
not risk having the blood of a human being
upon my conscience.'
The two friends proceeded, arm in arm,
towards
the place of appointment. They
walked
in silence, both wrapped in different, but
painful reflections. They had nearly reached
the spot, when George, pressing the arm of
his friend, said in a low, but distinct tone
`Robert, if I fall, say to Delia'
`You will not fall, you shall not,'
interrupted
the other, impetuously. `George, I fear I
have done wrong in this businessI have been
too sensitive, too hasty. If you are injured,
I shall never forgive myself. But you shall
stand only one shot; if, when Dixon finds you
are determined not to return his fire, he does
not then feel satisfied, I will fight him, and I
will return his fire. Do not give me any
farewell
messages, I cannot hear such melancholy
things.'
They reached the spot; an accommodation
was proposed to Dixon, if he would disclaim
the intention of insulting George; but this he
would not do, and he ended with some
sneering
remarks about the Yankees that made
Robert's blood boil, but which, had it not been
for the feelings of his friend, George would no
more have heeded than the idle wind.
The ground was measured, and they took
their stations.
`You can kill him George,' whispered
Robert
Simonds.
`I shall not attempt it,' replied George. `I
am not seeking revenge.'
`But you ought to endeavour to preserve
your own life.'
`Then I ought not to have come here. But
this is idle now. Give the word.'
The word was givenDixon firedand
George Torrey fell. Robert sprung to him,
raised hima stream of blood gushed from his
right side. `It is all over,' said George
faintly
,
as he recovered a little from the first shock.
`I am dying. I must leave the world just as it
begins to smile upon me. I must leave Delia
and you. O! I have lately dreamed of great
thingsI have thought that, blessed with
Delia's
love and your friendship, I should use such
exertionsI should be so indefatigable, that
success would be mine. But it is all overI
must die before I have done anythingI must
die and be forgottenDie as the fool dieth.'
`O! George, George,' said Robert, with
tears flowing fast down his cheeks`What
shall I do? How shall I comfort Delia? Why
did I allow you to send the challenge?'
George attempted to reply, but the effort
overcame him, and they thought him dying.
But he revived again, and was conveyed to
the house of Judge Simonds. He lingered
twelve hours, and during most of the time, was
able to converse.
George Torrey was laid in the family vault
of Judge Simonds, and before the year had
expired
,
Delia slept beside her lover. Robert
Simonds, agitated with grief for the loss of his
friend, and indignation against Dixon, could
hardly be said to be in possession of his reason,
when, three days after the burial of George,
he challenged his murderer to meet him.
Dixon
was so elated with his success over poor
George, that he exultingly accepted the
challenge
of Robert. They met; and at the first
discharge, Dixon was shot through the heart.
Robert Simonds still lives, but he is a
melancholy
,
misanthropic being. Alone in the
world, and continually brooding over the
memory
of those dear friends he accuses himself
of destroying.
THE SPRINGS.
`She had marked
The silent youth, and with a beauty's eye
Knew well she was beloved; and though her light
And bounding spirit still was wild and gay,
And sporting in the revel, yet her hours
Of solitude were visited by him
Who looked with such deep passion.'
Percival
.
It
was in July, 1818, that Emily Woodworth
made her
debut
at Saratoga. She came
accompanied
by her guardian, Mr. Chapman, and
his wife. Mrs. Chapman was a dyspeptic,
nervous
and very particular lady. In her youth
she had been a celebrated beauty, and still felt
all that thirst for personal admiration which
had once been so lavishly bestowed upon her
charms. But alas! for the woman who has
passed her tenth lustre and yet has no claim to
the attentions of society, save what personal
beauty imparts. Such women have always a
horror of being thought at all acquainted with
Timethat unfashionable old gentleman is
entirely
excluded from their conversation, and any
allusion to him, they deem, in their presence,
impertinent. It was always with a look which
seemed intended to petrify the speaker, that
Mrs. Chapman heard her increasing
infirmities
attributed to increasing years; she wished
to be thought young, and yet she had neither
health nor inclination for the gayeties of youth;
and so she eagerly condemned all pleasures in
which she could not participate, as vain,
frivolous
or unfashionable. In short she was
always
of the opinion that those amusements,
which were inconvenient or unsuitable for her,
were either very vulgar or very sinful.
Mr. Chapman was an industrious mechanic,
a carpenter by trade; but he had an inventive
genius, and a persevering temper; and had
generally succeeded in his plans and projects,
till finally he had become not only the
architect
,
but proprietor of several mills and one
large cotton manufactory; and partly by labor,
partly by lucky speculation, had accumulated
a large fortune. He was a thorough Yankee,
shrewd, sensible and somewhat sarcastic; at
least his ready repartees, and the knowledge of
characters and circumstances they frequently
implied, made his wit often feared by those who
felt conscious of follies or faults they did not
wish exposed. Yet he was a good natured
man, as the uniform forbearance, and even pity
with which he listened to the peevishness and
complaints of his wife, and his constant
kindness
in his own family, and the cordial civility
with which he treated his friends, except when
an occasion for a good joke occurred,
sufficiently
testified.
Emily Woodworthbut I will not introduce
her formally, by telling her height, or
describing
her features, or noting the color of her
complexion, eyes, lips and hair. Take a pen,
fair reader, look in the mirror, and then try
the sketch yourself. But be sure and make
Emily as handsome as your
beau ideal
of
female
loveliness, or I shall in future draw my
own heroines. And yet it is a task in which
few succeed. The artist, proud of being
complimented
with possessing the skill of a
Vandike
in delineating the countenances of men,
will find it extremely difficult, if not impossible,
to paint the likeness of a beautiful woman.
To be successful he must embody sense, spirit
and modesty in that just proportion which shall
give the idea of dignity as well as delicacy to
features where passion has left no record; and
he must impart meaning and expression to the
`smoothness and sheen' of a face where
neither
the ambition of pride or energy of thought
have stamped any predominating faculty of
soul. This task can only be accomplished by
one skilled in reading the heart as well as
drawing the head. There are but few
descriptions
of women, even in our best poets and
novelists, that do justice to the female
character
.
The mistake is that mere physical
beauty, harmony of features and a fair
complexion
,
are generally represented as entitling
their possessor to the appellation of amiable,
interesting, elegant, &c.it is the
countenance
which is supposed to give a tone to the
mind, not that the
mind
inspires the
countenance
.
Such a mistake would never be made
by an artist who was painting men. And while
such a mistake is cherished, the portraits of
women will never be well executed. They
will never bear the impress of
mind
.
Milton was a little skeptical on the score of
female understanding, and hardly willing to
allow the sex that equality of reason which is
now pretty generally and generously too,
acknowledged
by all
civilized
men; but he may
be pardoned, considering he lived in an age
so ignorant that even his own peerless genius,
was neglected or contemned, (might it not be
a retribution for the injustice he did the ladies.)
But notwithstanding the prejudice which the
bard of Paradise sometimes displayed, he has
left us the most charming description, of the
effect which a lovely, virtuous and intelligent
woman has over the minds of men, that is to
be found in the English language.
`Yet when I approach
Her loveliness, so absolute she seems
And in herself complete, so well to know
Her own, that what she wills to do or say,
Seems wisest, virtuousest, discreetest, best;
All higher knowledge in her presence falls.
Degraded wisdom in discourse with her
Loses discountenanced, and like folly shows;
Authority and
reason
on her wait,
As one intended first, not after made
Occasionally; and to consummate all,
Greatness
of
mind
, and
nobleness
their seat
Build in her loveliest, and create an awe
About her, as a guard angelic placed.'
What a lovely picture! and
true
but when
was the conception of the poet ever embodied
by the painter? And there is also another
sweet description, in Shakspeare, of a woman,
that I have often wished to see transferred to
canvass
`A maiden never bold,
Of spirit so still and quiet, that her motion
Blushed at herself.'
Who does not recognise in that sketch of
Desdemona, the being of
soul
the beautiful,
modest, intelligent and heroic girlwho
preferred
her lover only for his estimable qualities
of character
`I saw Othello's visage in his mind.'
Emily Woodworth did not exactly resemble
either of these portraits. She had not the
majestic loveliness of Milton's Eve, nor all
that tender yet ardent enthusiasm which we
may imagine characterized the victim bride of
the Moor. She had more vivacity than either.
But there was usually a covert humor in her
glance which checked the freedom her gayety
would otherwise have inspired. A lover would
have been sadly perplexed to decide whether
the sweet smile that so often dimpled her cheek
was
for
him or
at
him. In short I can think
of no heroine that Emily so much resembled
as Ellen Douglas; especially in that scene
where Fitz James so gallantly volunteered to
row her fairy bark, when
`The maid with smile, suppressed and sly,
The task unwonted saw him try.'
But Emily Woodworth had a guardianWas
she rich? No matter. The gentleman who
is prompted to make the inquiry would never
have deserved her, and certainly never have
obtained her.
`We will take lodgings half a mile, at least,
from the Springs,' said Mrs. Chapman to her
husband, as their carriage passed in sight of
the crowd assembled around the Congress
fountain. `I am sure,' she continued as her
eye rested on the castle like fabric of
Congress
Hall, at that time the largest and far the
most splendid building in the village, `I am
sure, the noise and bustle of that house must
be quite shocking to persons who have been
accustomed to the regular, religious and
literary
society of Connecticut.'
`I was intending to board at Union Hall,'
replied Mr. Chapman. `We must not expect
it will seem exactly as quiet and regular as our
own home, but it will be more convenient for
us than remote lodgings. You, Mrs. Chapman,
intend to drink the waters; I came to see the
folks, and Emily the fashions, and I think that
Union house there, will be just the thing for
our accommodation. Congress Hall I should
like, only it looks as if it would draw a little too
largely on my purse.'
`Do you know what kind of company they
have at the Union Hall?' inquired Mrs.
Chapman
,
in a querulous tone. `I should like to
be with civil, well-bred people, not among
the thoughtless and fantastic, who have balls
every other evening. I wish we could go where
our own friends and acquaintances resort.
The Reverend Mr. Briley and his lady you
know started a few days before us; and then
Colonel Eastman and his two daughters are
here, and Squire Ray and his wife, and the
widow Post.'
`Yes, yesthere's fools enough from
Connecticut
16
here as well as we,' interrupted Mr.
Chapman hastilyand then after a short pause,
during which his good natured countenance
exhibited a little embarrassment or vexation,
such as we may suppose would naturally arise
in the mind of a thorough man of business who
felt himself, for the first time in his life, in
pursuit
of that pleasure which has neither definite
name nor aim, but must be found jostling
among a crowd of strangers in a strange place,
he added,`I think, Mrs. Chapman, we have
a pretty good chance of seeing Yankees at
home; certainly we see our friends often
enough there. Now I should like to be
acquainted
with some of the southern people,
and I have been told that Union Hall was
frequented
mostly by gentlemen from that part of
the country. Perhaps I may learn something
about the management of cotton that will be
of advantage to me in the way of my business;
and so, if you please, we will alight here and
stay a few days at least,'and he stepped
from his carriage, while a waiter instantly
attended
to ask his commands. Mrs. Chapman
was really fatigued, they had driven a long
stage that morning, it was almost twelve, and
so she tacitly assented to her husband's
proposition
.
They were soon installed in a pleasant
apartment, the windows commanding a view
of Congress Hall, with its stately pillars and
airy portico, beneath which ladies were
promenading
,
and gentlemen sauntering, both often
pausing in their walk, as if charmed by the
sweet music that came at intervals from the
apartment of some piano-loving votary within.
Those who have visited Saratoga, and who
has not? know that the scenery around the
village makes no part of the attractions to that
celebrated place. It is the Springs, and the
crowd that sip the mineral waters that are the
objects of curiosity. Mrs. Chapman was not
much mistaken when, a few days after her
arrival
,
she declared it was by nature the most
disagreeable spot she ever saw. The street,
she remarked, was always dirt or dust, (this
was ten years since, perhaps she would now
report differently,) and if one wished to walk
out, there was nothing to be seen in any
direction
but a low sunken marsh that appeared as
if it had never been drained since the deluge.
And then for the ornament of the grounds,
there was only stunted firs and other
evergreens
all looking as withered, crooked or
sickly, as if they were languishing under the
curse of some sibyl.
The contrast was indeed very striking
between
Saratoga, and the pleasant walks on the
banks of the Connecticut. There the turf is so
smooth and green, and the flowers woo you at
every step, and the broad beautiful trees throw
their graceful branches abroad as if rejoicing,
like a beauty surveying her image in a mirror,
to see their shadow on the green sward beneath.
And then there is the river, diffusing over the
wide meadows on its banks, a fertility
unsurpassed
in our land; and the fresh invigorating
breezes from the pure waters and green hills,
which, if they cannot restore the invalid to
health, prevent the healthy from becoming
invalid
.
Who that has a taste for the beauties
of a rich landscape, and a heart attuned to the
music breathing from the lovely things of
nature
,
but would prefer a ramble on the banks
of the Connecticut to a promenade beneath the
portico of Congress Hall, where fashion and
frivolity gather their votaries, and more come
to have their dresses admired than to have
their diseases healed?
It must however be acknowledged, that much
of Mrs. Chapman's disgust and
disappointment
arose from the circumstance of finding
herself but an unit among the collection of
human beings assembled around the Springs.
She would have indignantly repelled the idea
that
selfishness
was always her predominating
feeling, yet she never witnessed an exhibition
of any kind, or listened to a conversation,
without
an immediate reference, in her own mind,
to the effect they had, or might have on
herself
her
convenience, happiness or
importance
.
She had, at an expense that her husband,
indulgent
as he was, called highly extravagant,
prepared for her own appearance at the springs
in a manner which she expected would secure
her instant notice. But, alas! she saw bonnets
there vastly richer than hers, and shawls that
made her sick with envy, and gowns with laces,
flounces and trimmings, which she decided
were absolutely wickedonly because they
exceeded
the standard of her own apparel.
`It is an odious place here,' said Mrs.
Chapman
to her husband, as he entered the room
where she and Emily were sitting, and
inquired
if they were ready to accompany him to drink
the waters. `These southern ladies are so
stiff and formal, and as silent as though they
had always been accustomed to have their
talking
as well as work done by the poor slaves.
I shall not join them in the drawing room again,
nor shall I go to the Springs this morning.
There is nothing worth seeing, and I can have
the water brought here to my chamber.'
`But you know, wife, that we came to see
the ways of the world, and at any rate I mean
to look about me while I stay. We might just
as well keep at home as confine ourselves to
our own apartments while here.'
`Do you like the society of these
Southerners
?'
demanded Mrs. Chapman.
`Why, yes, pretty well, only I see the cotton
growers give themselves some important airs;
but that is because they do not yet understand
about cotton manufacturing. I have
endeavoured
to introduce the subject as often as possible,
for I hope the mutual benefit we derive from
each other will be the means of establishing a
confidence between us. However, I confess
they are rather reserved.'
`Reserved, do you call it,' returned Mrs.
Chapman, her countenance glowing with
indignation
.
`I do not pretend to know the
character of the men, but the women are
absolutely
scornful. It was only yesterday I
made some inquiries of a lady respecting her
headdress, and she answered me very rudely.
But I hope I mortified her, for I soon after
remarked
,
when her slave came to wait upon her,
that I would not, for the universe, have a
negro wench tagging after me.'
`What do you think of your southern sisters,
Emily?' inquired Mr. Chapman, turning to his
ward.
`I think, sir,' answered the smiling girl, `that
they exhibit about the same qualities of the
heart and mind our northern ladies would if
placed in a similar situation. The difference
of customs, and customs must vary with
climate
,
and education, has made us to differ.
They complain of their
servants
, and we of our
help
. They talk of selling the
blacks
because
of bad behavior, and we of turning away our
whites
for similar faults. It is true in a circle
of Yankee women, there would be more
attempts
at literary conversation, more books
mentioned and quotationsmisapplied; but
then these ladies here have a kind of quietness
in their manner, a natural dignity that makes the
knowledge they do possess, appear very
graceful
;
and in canvassing fashions, they certainly
have the advantage of us. They do not seem
to feel it necessary to make the expense of a
thing an object of much conversation. Their
remarks are, therefore, more general, and
consequently
do not appear so trifling as when
every yard of ribbon or lace on a dress is
measured, and the exact cost computed, as is
frequently the case among us in discussions on
the reigning modes. Do not think I advocate
thoughtless extravagance; I only believe we
may practice economy at home, without
continually
puffing ourselves for our management
when abroad.'
`Then you do not feel disgusted with the
society
here, nor intend to keep your chamber,'
said Mr. Chapman.
`O, no, sir, no,' replied Emily, eagerly.
`I have been highly amused with the new
scene; and I hope to reap some benefit, some
improvement from the observations I cannot
avoid making. I certainly feel much more
interested
for these southern ladies, more as if
we are indeed of one country, than I should
have done had we never met.'
`That,' replied Mr. Chapman, with such
earnestness, such unaffected sincerity of
manner
,
as almost made his plain, practical remarks
appear like eloquence; `That will, I trust, be
usually the consequence when Americans have
an opportunity of mingling together. And if
these mineral waters are of little benefit in the
restoration of healthI, for one, think their
medicinal virtues are vastly overrated; yet they
are of importance in promoting an intercourse,
and thus strengthening the harmony between
the different sections of our vast country.
People
from every quarter, will here meet and
mingle
,
and become acquainted; prejudices will
be, in part, overcome, and attachments formed,
till we shall feel we have friends, and therefore
a personal interest in the prosperity of every
state in our Union.'
`You and Emily may like the place and the
people too, if you choose, but I detest both;'
said Mrs. Chapman.
`Why should you, my dear, form an opinion
so different from Emily on this subject?'
asked
her husband.
`The ladies are all partial to Emily,' replied
the wife, peevishly. `They converse with her
freely, but they avoid me.'
`You probably treat them coldly, and take
no pains to remove the prejudices they may
have formed against the Yankee women.'
`I care nothing for their prejudices, Mr.
Chapman. I shall take no pains to gain the
favor of those who are guilty of the monstrous
wickedness of holding their fellow creatures in
slavery. It is a sin in which I would not
partake
for all the wealth of the Indies!'
`The slave system is wrong, I feel as well as
you, and an unfortunate thing for the peace and
prosperity of our country,' said Mr. Chapman,
seriously. `Yet we must not imagine, that
because in New England we have no slaves,
we are guilty of no sins. But where are those
lines you showed me the other day, Emily?
in Burns, I think.'
Emily reached the book, and Mr. Chapman
read, in a very exalted tone, to his wife:
`O! wad some Power the giftie gie us,
To see
oursels
as other see us,
It wad frae monie a blunder free us
An' foolish notion;
What airs in gait and dress could lea' us,
And e'en devotion.'
There, that verse contains, in my opinion, a
more excellent lesson on the necessity of
self-examination
and humility than many a labored
sermon. And now, Mrs. Chapman, if you are
not intending to go out this morning, Emily
and I will walk to the Springs.'
Any person of reflection, who watches the
movements of an assembly of Americans,
collected
even on their great festivals of
rejoicing
,
will be convinced that the pursuit of mere
amusements is incompatible with the feelings
and habits of the people. They never appear
to lay aside their cares, or give themselves up
to the enjoyment of the present pleasure.
They are not absorbed by the scene, show,
or pastime; they are remarking, reasoning,
scheming. There is a restlessness in their
movements, (a Yankee rarely sits still in his
chair,) an eagerness in their inquiries after
news, a kind of impatience as if they felt in a
hurry even when they know they have nothing
to do. They are like travellers who are
looking
forward with earnestness to the next stage
in their journey, and feel quite unprepared to
rest or enjoy themselves by the way.
But to see this locomotive trait, in the
American
character, in full activity, go to
Saratoga
.
Those ladies and gentlemen who assemble
there to pass a few weeks in uninterrupted
pleasure, display but little of that contented
satisfaction which betokens happiness. They
manifest more uneasiness than do the
valetudinarians
,
because the latter think there is a
necessity
,
a
reason
for their continuance at the
Springs. But the healthy ones are in a
constant
17
state of excitement to find pleasure which
prevents them from ever enjoying it. They
are therefore restless, and wishing for a change
of weather or a change of company, or to visit
other places, or have the season over that they
may return home.
`I don't think, Emily,' said Mr. Chapman,
as they crossed the street, and jostled their way
amid the throng that were hastening to the
fountain, `though I will not find fault with every
thing I see, as my wife does, yet I don't think
those gentlemen and ladies there are so happy
as the persons I left at work in my factory.
They do not look half as cheerful and gay.
Indeed, the observations I have made, have
convinced me that employment, some kind of
business, is absolutely necessary to make men,
or at least our citizens, happy and respectable.
This trifling away of time when there is so
much to be done, so many improvements
necessary
in our country, is inconsistent with that
principle of being useful, which every
republican
ought to cherish. Now I never pass
through a place without looking out the good
building spots, nor do I see a stream of water
without thinking whether it has a good site
for a mill, or factory, or something of the sort.
But here, bless me, 'tis all hurry scurry round
to gaze at the wonders, without, I fear,
thinking
at all. Away they go to lake George, and
Ticonderoga, and perhaps to Niagara, and
then to their billiard tables, balls and parties;
and after all, they look fatigued and miserably
disappointed. I meet with but few that
pretend
to take much satisfaction in this kind of
life, they only say it is necessary as a relaxation
but I guess they will, the most of them, be
glad when they are safe at home again. I
certainly
shall for one. Have you, Emily, seen an
object here that will make you regret leaving
Saratoga?'
The question was asked at a most unlucky
moment, for Emily, on looking up to answer
her guardian, beheld, standing almost directly
before her, his dark, penetrating eyes fastened
on her face with an expression of admiration
that seemed to send his soul in the glance, a
young man whom she had for several preceding
days perceived paying her the homage of
unceasing
,
yet respectful, attention, whenever
she dared note him at all.
Emily Woodworth had never loved, never
seen the man she thought she could love, and
she did not think of loving the stranger;she
only thought that he resembled her brother
who had died at collegethat dear and only
brother for whom she had shed so many tears
and she wished the stranger was her brother.
There was no harm in such a wish, though it
was a little romantic. But now his presence
joined with her guardian's abrupt question to
embarrass her excessively. She drew her veil
as closely over her face as ever did a Turkish
lady, and declining to taste the waters, stood
with her eyes fixed on the fountain, and
watched
,
with an apparently absorbing interest, the
little boys that then officiated to draw up the
bubbling and airy liquid which was eagerly
drank by the fashionablefor fashion's sake.
She did not turn her head, though she knew
the young stranger was beside her and
expected
he was watching for an opportunity to gain
her attention.
To a novelist the introduction of these young
people would be an easy matter. Emily would
only have to drop her handkerchief, which
the stranger might pick up and present with a
graceful bow, that she must repay with a sweet
smile, and then some tender exclamation, or
abrupt compliment from him, and their destiny
to `live and love forever,' would be at once
palpable to every reader.
But in this matter of fact sketch, no such
lucky accident occurred, and so I shall have
to write another page to tell the story. Emily
did not drop her handkerchief, or meet with
an incident of any kind that required the
interference
of a stranger; but clasping her
guardian's
arm with more than her usual care, she
walked home without betraying any anxiety to
know whether she was followed or observed.
`You look pale and fatigued, Emily,' said
Mrs. Chapman, as the former threw aside her
bonnet. `Do my love sit down here by the
window.'
Emily took the seat, but a deep flush
instantly
passed over her cheek as her eye
caught some object in the street before her,
and she retired to her own apartment saying
she was quite well, while Mr. Chapman
observed
he never saw her look better. On
descending
to dinner, which Mrs. Chapman
declined
joining, Emily again saw standing in a
position that commanded a view of the door at
which the ladies entered, the same young,
dark-eyed stranger. He did not, however,
offer to approach her; and whether he dined
there or not, it was impossible for her to say
she never once looked towards the place he
must have occupied.
She was apparently engrossed in listening
to the conversation of two gentlemen who sat
opposite to her. Their whole discourse might
be comprised in this sentiment,`that
rice
was excellent foodthat
rice
was healthy
foodthat
rice
ought to be a constant dish at
every man's table,' and `that it was wonderful
the northern people did not make more account
of
rice
.'
`I have made a very valuable acquaintance,
I guess,' said Mr. Chapman, as he entered, at
a late hour, his wife's apartment. `Judge
Daggett, with whose character you know I am
acquainted, asked leave to introduce a
gentleman
who, he said, wished to be acquainted
with me. It was Mr. Henry Sinclair, from
North Carolina; he is rather young, but the
most sensible and intelligent man I have met
at Saratoga. I have been conversing with
him all the afternoon, and he has told me the
whole method of cultivating cotton, and many
other things that the planters have not been
very free to talk about. I find too, that he
thinks very highly of our northern country, and
would like to see Connecticut. Indeed, he
says he intends visiting that State before
returning
home; and so I have invited him to
come to our village and see my cotton factory.
I should like, Mrs. Chapman, to introduce him
to you and Emily while we are here, and that
may induce him more willingly to call on us
should he go to Connecticut.'
Mrs. Chapman eagerly assented. She
fancied
she should appear to excellent advantage
when there was not a crowd of ladies around;
and she never once dreamed that the gay, and,
as she thought her, the childish Emily, would
attract the notice of a man who conversed so
sensibly and seriously with her husband about
plantations and manufactories, &c.
During Mr. Chapman's absence in quest of
his new friend, Emily Woodworth changed
her seat more than onceeven Mrs.
Chapman
,
occupied as she was with the idea of her
own importance, observed that something
agitated
the girl, and carelessly inquired what
disturbed her. But Emily, with her usual
arch smile, assured her she was not disturbed
and it is not known to this day whether a
suspicion
,
that the dark-eyed cavalier was the
person her guardian would introduce, ever
entered
her mind.
Mrs. Chapman was much pleased with Mr.
Sinclair, and remarked several times after he
had gone, that he was the handsomest and
most accomplished southern man she had
seen. `I think him,' said she, `a perfect
gentleman
,
and really hope he will come to our
village and visit us.'
`I presume he will come to our village,' said
Mr. Chapman, looking at Emily with a most
provoking glance of intelligence; `but
whether
,
Mrs. Chapman, he will visit you and I, is,
I think, very doubtful.'
`Pray, who will he visit then? He said he
had no acquaintances there,' exclaimed Mrs.
Chapman. `Perhaps Emily can guess,' said
Mr. Chapman. But Emily left the room
immediately
without attempting to guess.
Henry Sinclair made, as he said, the tour
of Connecticut. Certainly he tarried in that
state several weeks, and was so delighted with
the climate, scenery, society, &c. that he
returned
the next year, and the nextand then
persuaded Emily to accompany him to North
Carolina, where he introduced her to his friends
as Mrs. Sinclair.
The domestic happiness of this amiable
couple is often mentioned by Mr. Chapman,
and he declares that, in his opinion, the best
method of promoting harmony between, the
different sections of our Union would be to
promote intermarriages among the inhabitants.
`There is,' he remarks in his humorous
manner
,
`there is, I find, more affinity between
the youths and maidens of the North and
South, than between cotton growers and
cotton
manufacturers.'
PREJUDICES.
`What hath come to thee? in thy hollow eye
And hueless cheek, and thine unquiet motions,
Anger, and grief, and conscience seem at war
To waste thee?'
Byron
.
On
one of those small level spots, that may
be found as you toil up the steep road which,
running from Brattleboro' to Bennington,
crosses
the Green Mountain, there stood, in 1820,
a little lone tenement inhabited by a woman
whose name was Ranson.
Mrs. Ranson had endured strange
vicissitudes
of fortune, and it was reported her
troubles had entirely changed her character
certain it was that she had for several years
pursued a course of conduct so extraordinary
as to excite either the wonder, pity, or censure
of all her acquaintance. Many declared her
singularities were affected to gain notoriety
these were womenothers thought her
deranged
these
were mostly menand a few
benevolent people of both sexes urged the
sorrows
of a broken and contrite spirit had induced
her to relinquish the flattering but false world,
and seek a refuge from its vexations in her
solitary
abode on the Hills.
I can only give an abstract of Mrs. Ranson's
story; those who regret its brevity, (if such old
fashioned readers exist in this age of literary
`shreds and patches,') may easily, by the aid
of a little imagination, invest these simple facts
with all the complex circumstances, enchanting
descriptions and interesting colloquies, of a
long romance. I am half inclined to attempt
the exploit myself. This short hand mode of
authorship is but a poor way of managing, if
one wishes to secure either profit or fame.
To manufacture a two volumed novel, hardly
requires more exertion of
mind
, than to write a
good sketch.
Isabelle Carrick was a native of the West
Indies. Her mother died a few days after the
girl's birth, and her father when she was twelve
years old; but in the interim he had married a
second wife, who bore him a boy. With that
ill-judging partiality which may be termed
injustice
of the most cruel kind, because it
completely
baffles the law and often shrouds itself
under pretexts that prevent the sufferer from
receiving even sympathy, Mr. Carrick gave his
whole property, which was very large, to his
son; only stipulating that Isabelle should be
educated and supported by her brother till
her marriage, and should she ever become a
widow, she was entitled to an annuity of one
hundred pounds a year.
When the contents of the will became known,
the maternal relations of Isabelle were highly
incensed, and they demanded she should be
given up to them. Her stepmother, who, it
was believed, had influenced her husband's
will, very readily consented to relinquish all
right over the portionless orphan; by that
means she was freed from the necessity of
educating her. Isabelle, accordingly, passed
into the family of her uncle Tolbert. Some
disturbances
soon after occurring among the slave
population, rendered Mr. Tolbert's situation at
Jamaica unpleasant, and he determined to leave
the Island. His wife was an American, and
that was probably the reason that induced him
to remove to New York rather than return to
England. Isabelle, now at the interesting age
of sixteen, was such a beautiful girl that her
uncle had no doubt of establishing her
advantageously
in a country where marriage was an
affair of the heart and not merely a calculation
of pecuniary advantages, even though it were
known she was portionless. Yet Mr. Tolbert
did not intend thus to test the sincerity of those
who professed to admire his niece. He had no
children; he had adopted the orphan and
declared
her his heir, and it is no wonder she
was soon the star of the city. Many
connoisseurs
in female charms pronounced Isabelle
Carrick to be perfect in loveliness. There is
no standard, there can be none of personal
beauty; the feelings of the heart have more
influence
than rules of taste in our estimation of
the human face; yet there are countenances so
peculiarly fascinating, that criticism and
comparison
are out of the question. If the
beholder
has a soul susceptible of those divine
impressions
of the beautiful which are among the
distinguishing characteristics that prove man
superior to his `brothers of the clod,' he
acknowledges
at once the interest of such a
countenance
.
No human eye ever regarded a rose,
rainbow or star, and turned away disgusted;
and seldom do we find a person that can gaze
on either with perfect indifference. Such
apathy would argue a man's mind more
disagreeable
,
if not as dangerous, as to have `no
music in his soul'which, according to
Shakspeare
,
is one of the seven deadly sins.
But Isabelle Carrick was never regarded
with indifference. The men praised and
admired
;
the women praised too, as loudly as the
men, but I fear there was a little envy, or at
least, a little repining mingled in their feelings
of admiration. What makes this suspicion
probable
,
I have been told that they always
concluded
their eulogy on her beauty by saying it
was perfect, considered as a specimen of the
West Indian stylethe men never made a
qualification in their panegyrics.
`I think,' said Miss Dutton, `that Isabelle's
cheek wants bloom. She has a fine, delicate
complexion, and it contrasts sweetly with her
profusion of curls,
Whose glossy black to shame might bring
The plumage of the raven's wing.
Now tinge her cheek with a little celestial
rosy red, and she would be in appearance,
what you gentlemen esteem her, an angel.'
`But you probably recollect,' replied Edwin
Cone, `that the rosy red to which you allude,
was imparted by a blush, and Isabelle's cheek
wears that tinge at the least compliment or
emotiona tinge that may be considered
celestial
,
as it proceeds from delicacy of mind,
from sentiment, and is not dependent on jocund
health, and never needs the repairs of art.'
`But then her eyes, Edwin.Do you really
admire such black eyes? They seem too
spirited
to please me. I know the Mahometans
celebrate their dark eyed Houris, but I believe
Christians usually connect the beautiful
sky-color
with the idea of angels' eyes.'
Edwin Cone was very polite. He saw the
blue eyes of the fair speaker beam with the
expectation of a compliment. Could a gallant
man refuse it? With a bow and smile he
declared
it would be profane to compare angels'
eyes to aught save stars, and those were
always
set in
blue;
and that the most charming
description of woman's orb of vision he ever
saw, was
`She had an eye,
As when the blue sky trembles through a cloud
Of purest white.'
The very next day, Isabelle Carrick learned
that Edwin Cone disliked black eyes. But
happily her heart was not at all interested in
his decision. Had John Ranson made such a
declaration, she would probably have felt very
wretched.
There is no subject on which the old and
young differ in opinion so materially as on the
qualities most likely to ensure happiness in the
married state. The aged are swayed by
interest
,
the youthful guided by feeling. Perhaps
it would be difficult to decide which party are
oftenest disappointed. Those matches are
undoubtedly
the happiest, which have been
contracted
equally from affection and prudence;
but heroines are not very apt to consider
prudence necessary. At least, when Isabelle
Carrick married John Ranson, in opposition to
the wishes of her uncle, she did not consult her
interest
and that is to be imprudentis it not?
An answer to that question, properly
discussed
,
in all its bearings, would fill a volume. I
wish some rationally moral philosopher, who
has made that wayward thing, the human
heart, his particular study, would write a
treatise
on the subject.
Mr. Tolbert held true English aristocratic
ideas of love and marriage. `The faith of
true lovers,' he observed, `was of no
consequence
,
except to adorn a tale. It was
amusing to read of love in a novel, but to
believe
in its reality, or that a particular fancy
for the person was necessary to make men and
women happy in marriage, was as absurd as
to credit the stories of dragons and demons,
knights and necromancers, exalted characters,
and enchanted castles, and all the
materiel
of
the romances of chivalry, from which the
unreasonable
ideas of love had been imbibed.
The marriage most likely to ensure happiness
to the contracting parties, must be founded, like
any other bargain, on mutual interest; some
substantial benefit must be conferred on each,
by the union; and then, the knowledge that
their partnership was indissoluble, would
induce
them, if they had common sense, to treat
each other with complaisance, which was all
the felicity that ought to be expected.'
Isabelle Carrick had heard these sentiments
of her uncle expressed a thousand times, and
illustrated by many anecdotes of contented
couples, who married for interest, and
wretched
pairs, who wedded for fancy; but she did
not, it seems, profit much by such wise
lessons
and lectures. She loved John Ranson,
although her uncle charged the said John with
being a poor man's son, and, moreover, guilty
of being obliged to earn his own livelihood,
though he had, by his industry, and
application
,
raised himself to the station of junior
partner in a respectable mercantile
establishment
.
Should such a plebeian be preferred
before Edwin Cone, whose father, descended
from a respectable English family, was
possessed
of a large fortune, and gave the most
splendid dinner parties in the city?
Mr. Tolbert thought it but of small
consequence
that Edward Cone was a licentious
profligate, and had broken, at least, one
engagement
to marry. However, he did not
command
his niece to accept of Edwin; he only
said, `you may take your choice, Isabelle. If
you marry Mr. Cone, I will give you ten
thousand pounds on the wedding day, and the
remainder of my estate at my deceasebut
should you wed John Ranson, I will never give
you a shilling, though you were starving at my
gate.'
Isabelle preferred John; and her uncle soon
after left America, in high dudgeon, railing at
the manners and customs of the people, and
declaring that his niece would never have been
guilty of such folly, in a country where a
proper
respect was paid to rank; that the levelling
principles of republicanism were subversive of
all gentility, and must, while they governed
the people, effectually prevent the regulations
of good society from being understood and
adopted.
`They are all,' said he, `so perfectly
canaille
in their sentiments, that Isabelle's choice
was commended in some of their highest
circles
,
because, forsooth, John Ranson was
industrious
,
enterprising, and clever;I can
say as much of my footman.'
Fourteen years passedIsabelle had
counted
the lapse of time, only by the recurrence of
new blessings and pleasures, and to her, life
still looked bright; or, if a cloud appeared, it
was always spanned with the rainbow. She
was still lovely, and beloved; the tender, tried,
and trusted
friend
of her excellent husband, and
the mother of one beautiful boy. What more
can earth offer of happiness! But why dwell
on the picture?
A day of bliss is quickly told,
A thousand would not make us old
As one of sorrow doth
It is by cares, by woes and tears,
We round the sum of human years
The embargo that preceded the last
American
war, occasioned the first reverse of fortune.
Mr. Ranson struggled manfully to support his
credit, for he knew that the weal and wo of
those dearer than himself, were involved in his
fate. His friends, for a time, buoyed him up;
but the struggle between the nations
commenced
,
and then who sympathised much for
individual
,
and pecuniary suffering, while the fate
of armies, and the fame of the Republic were
at hazard? But Mr. Ranson was soon
released
from all inquietudes. Journeying from
Albany to Boston, the carriage in which he
travelled, was, by the horses taking fright,
precipitated down a deep chasm, where he was
instantly killed.
Hitherto, Mrs. Ranson, though she had lost,
or been abandoned by all her own relations,
and had, by injustice and prejudice, been
deprived
of the fortunes to which she had been
apparently destined, yet it could hardly be
said she had endured a reverse. Can that be
termed a reverse which is not felt as a
misfortune
?
Even her husband's embarrassments
had not been realized by her, as he had
sedulously
labored to prevent his family from
suffering
privations. But she was now widowed
and destitute of property; and the friends of
her prosperity were so shocked at her
misfortunes
,
and the consequent change in her
appearance
and behavior, that they unanimously
concluded that she did not wish for society;
and they were too well bred to intrude on her
sorrows.
The sufferings of Mrs. Ranson, and the
neglect
of her city friends, induced her to apply
to the relations of her husband, and this finally
led to an arrangement, by which she
consented
to remove, with her child, to a small town in
the western part of Massachusetts, and reside
with his aged parents.
Mrs. Ranson was now placed in a situation,
perhaps the most difficult and trying of any in
the world, for one of her character, and
education
.
She was placed in a little tattling
country
village, where the system of
espionage
was
as perfect, and far more harassing, to those
unaccustomed
to its operations, than it ever was
in Paris, when Fouche regulated the police,
under the orders of Bonaparte.
It is not in cities, or among the educated and
fashionable of a community, that national
peculiarities
can be well, or truly discovered.
We must go into the remote villages, and
among the scattered settlements of the interior
of New-England, if we would discover the
effect
,
either for good, or for evil, which the
condition
,
principles, practices, and institutions of
the Puritans, have had on the Yankee
character
.
It has not all been for good; but our enemies
have never discovered the greatest fault. It
is not inquisitiveness, or egotism, or
selfishness
.
It is
calculation
,a close, cold, careful
calculation. A Yankee, (I speak of the
common
minded,) calculates his generosity and
sympathy, as methodically as his income; and
to waste either, on an unprofitable, or
undeserving
18
object, would be foolish, if not wicked.
He is charitable; but it is from principle, not
feeling. Yet he is not deficient in warmth of
heart; but
duty
, his
duty
is always paramount
to his impulses. This is a good principlethe
mischief is, that `good things spoiled, corrupt
to worst.' Thus his rigid performance of duty
is made, and often conscientiously, the plea of
withholding assistance from the necessitous,
for fear of encouraging idleness; of prying
into
the most secret actions and sacred griefs of
the afflicted, before pitying their sorrows, least
they should be deserved or self-incurred.
Then the Yankee, in his calculations,
generally
makes his own situation, conduct, and
principles, the model for others. Accustomed
to labor himself, he calculates that every
person
ought to be as constantly employed; and
compelled by his narrow income to practice
rigid prudence, he deems a more liberal
expenditure
,
wasteful profusion.
It was among such a scrupulously
calculating
people, that Mrs. Ranson was fated to
dwell; and she fixed the attention of the whole
community. Her appearance, dress,
conversation
,
manners, and principles, were all in
turn, scrutinized; even her thoughts and
feelings
were guessed at, and her plans and future
prospects, made the frequent subject of that
kind of commiseration, which seems to proceed
from a hope, that the evils thus conjured up,
like Banquo's shadowy kings, to frown in
review
,
will be fully realized.
`O la!' said Mrs. Pratt, as she took her
seat at the table of her neighbour Dustin, where
she regularly drank her tea every week;`O
la! I declare I never was so shocked in my
life. Mrs. Cutter heard her say so.'
`Who? what?' inquired Mr. Dustin.
`Gracious! Mr. Dustin, have you not heard
it?' said Mrs. Pratt. `Well, I declare, I
never meant to mention the thing; I would
not have it get about among the people for all
the world, for I really believe the woman does
as well as she knows how. Only think! she
could not be brought up like a Christian, away
there in the West Indies. We must have
charity for such folks.'
`Oh, you are talking of Mrs. Ranson, I
see,' said Mr. Dustin.
`Yes, I have just been telling your wife;
but pray never mention it,or if you do,
never
say I told you,that Mrs. Ranson says she
thinks our meetings are very dull, and she had
rather read prayers at home, than hear our
minister preach. And then she always wants
a parade for dinner, because they used to have
great dinners in the city. I wonder if she
thinks that is the way to keep the Sabbath day
holy?'
`Does she do anything, I wonder?' said
Mrs. Dustin.
`No, indeednot she,' replied Mrs. Pratt.
`Why, she has her black woman, to wait upon
her; and there's her child, brought up in
idleness
;
that great boy, nearly fifteen, who wears
his ruffles every day, and they say, never did
any work in his life.'
`I wonder how she thinks they are to be
maintained,' said Mr. Dustin. `Old Mr.
Ranson
has but little property, and his wife is
very unwell. They cannot support such an
idle, expensive family.'
`Oh, she doesn't think about it,' replied
Mrs. Pratt.
`Such grand folks never seem to think about
expenses. They have never calculated how
to get a living. But I fear she will have to
put out her boy, and work herself, before she
dies.'
`I suppose she expects people will assist
her,' said Mr. Dustin. `And the widow and
fatherless should always be remembered.'
`I suppose she does; but I am afraid the
poor woman will be disappointed,' said Mrs.
Pratt. `People that work as hard as we do,
cannot feel it our duty to support a family in
idleness. She ought to put out that great boy,
and have him taught to work, and then he
might help maintain her.'
`They say she married against her uncle's
consent,' said Mrs. Dustin. `It is no wonder
she does not prosper.She might have had all
his estate, if she had only tried to please him.'
`She looks to me like a woman who is very
set in her own way, and very haughty,' said
Mrs. Pratt. `I called to see her the day after
she arrived, for I thought it my duty to visit the
unfortunate, and the stranger, and I meant to
like her, if I could, for I really pitied her; but
she took no notice of me, and hardly spoke
while I was there. I cannot waste my time
to visit such proud folks.'
Mrs. Ranson had a kind and generous
disposition
,
but she was very sensitive, and her
refined and delicate mind, though bowed with
affliction, was not, in the least, divested of
those feelings of independence, and
superiority
,
which persons always accustomed to
affluence
,
and to the humble attendance of slaves,
must necessarily imbibe. She was shocked at
the grossness of the villagers, and irritated at
what she thought their unfeeling interference
in her private concerns; but, especially, the
idea that her son ought to be confined to labor,
was an indignity, an outrage, on all propriety,
that she never could pardon.
The two parties were soon completely at
variance, and the villagers, by dint of clamors,
if not reasons, were, as is usual, victorious.
They convinced old Mr. Ranson, that his
grandson John would certainly be ruined, if
he was not taught to work. But the lad was
as tenacious of his patrician privileges as his
mother, and rather than don the `every-day
clothes' of a plough boy, he besought her to
allow him to enlist as a soldier.
He was nearly fifteen, and tall of his age,
and soldiers were, at that time, so much
needed
,
that officers could not be very particular in
the qualifications of recruits. It was a trying
scene for Mrs. Ranson; but finally, the pride
and prejudices of the woman prevailed over
the tenderness and apprehensions of the
mother
.
She knew her son would be more
exposed
to danger with the musket; but then he
would escape the contamination of the spade.
The field of glory, or the corn field! Could
one of her education and feelings prefer the
latter? She would let him go and serve his
country, and leave his fate with that Power
who watches the orphan. She could humble
herself before God, and intercede for her child,
but she could not endure to see him degraded
before men, as in her estimation he would be,
if he labored.
The lad departed, and but a few weeks
elapsed
before a stranger came to the village and
inquired for Mrs. Ranson. He was a
messenger
from the executors of her uncle Tolbert.
That gentleman had on his death bed,
bequeathed
his immense property to the son of
Mrs. Ranson; but still wishing to manifest
some displeasure against his niece, he
ordained
that if the boy died before he attained the
age of eighteen, the estate should all go to a
distant relative in England. After that period,
should he die without heirs, the personal
property
,
which was very considerable, was to be
his mother's. The messenger hastened with
all possible speed to Buffalo, where the troops,
in which young John Ranson served, were
stationed
;
but before he arrived, the battle of
Chippewa had been fought, and the brave boy,
who signalized himself more than once during
the action, was numbered with the dead!
Who shall picture the mother's grief! It
excited for a short time, the concern and
consternation
of the villagers! They knew it
was their clamors which induced Mrs. Ranson
to send her son from herthey felt condemned;
yet still, most of them pertinaciously
maintained
that not withstanding the wealth which the
boy would have inherited had he lived, it would
nevertheless have been an excellent thing for
him, had he learned to work.
It is painful to dwell on the sorrows of the
desolate hearted, but it is more painful still to
witness the cold, unfeeling manner with which
those sorrows are ofttimes treated by the
ignorant
and prejudiced. The regret of the
villagers
was of short continuance. Mrs. Pratt
began
her round of visiting, and by the time she
had drank tea with all the principal families
in the neighbourhood, which was about three
weeks, she had convinced them that Mrs.
Ranson
was not at all to be pitied; that her
troubles
were but a just chastisement for her pride
and obstinacy; and that it was doubtless a
mercy that her son was taken away, as she
would now have no earthly dependence, and
would probably soon be brought to a proper
sense of her follies, and then she would see that
everything had been ordered for the best.
But there was one benevolent family in the
village. One man and woman who pitied and
assisted Mrs. Ranson, without censuring her.
There were doubtless others of similar
generosity
;
but these persons were the only ones
she would acknowledge as benefactors. That
inflexible perseverance in a favorite point when
persuaded that duty sanctions the course
pursued
,
which is so characteristic of the Yankees,
and which Mrs. Ranson thought so inhuman
while employed to convince her that her son
ought to work, she found, when displayed in
her service, was equally zealous. Mr.
Lawrence
was a merchant, but he did not square
his humanity by the rule of `loss and gain.'
He learned from the tenor of Mrs. Ranson's
father's will, that, as a widow, she was entitled
to an hundred pounds per annum, and he
never
ceased his inquiries, and exertions, till he
had succeeded in establishing her claim, and
providing for the regular payment of her
annuity
.
He delivered into her hands the
documents
,
and told her the only reward for his
trouble which he desired was to see her
restored
to tranquillity. But though she did justice
to the nobleness and humanity of Mr.
Lawrence
,
and loved his wife like a sister, she
could not be persuaded to return to society:
The fate of her husband and son, but
especially
the latter, preyed on her heart, and almost
overwhelmed her reason. She felt that she
had yielded to her own prejudices when she
consented he should go to the battle.
Self-accusation
made her wretched. She blamed
the people, it is true, but that did not atone or
justify her own error. Had there been a
convent
in the country, she would undoubtedly
have devoted herself to the penance of a
monastic
life. She finally had a small house
prepared
as near as possible to the spot where
her husband perished; and there, accompanied
only by her faithful negro woman who had
attended
her from infancy, she resided in 1820.
Pale and wasted, but still beautiful, she
seemed
,
as she was described by the traveller,
arrayed
in her mourning habiliments, wandering
among the lonely hills, or seated on the
overhanging
cliffs, like a spirit sent to warn him of
some danger in the path before him. She was
the victim of prejudices. But let it be
remembered
,
that though we may be excessively
annoyed by the prejudices of others, we shall
never be quite wretched if we do not yield
ourselves to the guidance of our own.
19
THE APPARITION.
I say the
pulpit
, in the sober use
Of its legitimate, peculiar powers,
Must stand acknowledged, while the world shall stand,
The most important and effectual guard,
Support and ornament of virtue's cause.
Cowper
.
About
fifty miles from Albany, in the proud
state of New-York, there is a pleasantly
situated
little village, which we call Harmony.
Some events which occurred there a few years
since, may perhaps interest those readers who
have the good taste to prefer exhibitions of our
national and republican peculiarities of
character
to descriptions of European manners, and
the good nature to concede, that the efforts of
those American writers who are attempting to
awaken the love and the pride of national
literature
among their countrymen, deserve, at
least, to be tolerated. The southeastern line
of Harmony is bounded by a high, rugged
mountain, that seems to look frowningly down
on the neat, thriving farms stretching along the
borders of a small river, which winds silently
through copse and plain at its base. The
meanderings of this quiet stream are marked
on the western border by a narrow strip of rich
meadow land, displaying alternately patches of
mowing, fields of corn, or of that vegetable
which an European might with propriety term
a
republican root
, as its discovery and use
have more perhaps than any other resource,
contributed to support an increase of
population
among the laboring classes in the old
world. The broad harvest moon had just risen
above the rugged mountain, and there trembled
over the landscape that soft silvery lustre which
so frequently tempts the poet to write and the
maniac to rove. But neither poet or maniac
had ever been known to exist within the
precincts
of Harmony, and it seemed quite
improbable
Luna should there find a worshipper. Yet
one
there was, and a
fair
one too, regarding that
bright moon with an attention as absorbing, if
not a devotion as sincere, as ever a devotee of
Ephesus paid at the shrine of Diana. Lois
Lawton
was the last surviving child of the
clergyman
who presided over the only church which
had then been organized in Harmony. He
was a Presbyterian, a good preacher and a
strictly conscientious man, and but for two
reasons might have been very popular among
his parishioners. In the first place he did not
sufficiently regard the feelings of the minority
who were from principle or prejudice (it is
sometimes very difficult to determine which
predominates in the human mind) opposed
to his settlement; and in the second place he
strenuously insisted on the fulfilment of a
promise
which the majority had made him, namely,
that at the expiration of five years from the
time of his installation, there should be a
convenient
and handsome house for divine worship
erected in the town. No one disputed the need
of such a building, as the congregation were
obliged to assemble alternately at a
school-house
and a hall. The unchurchlike
character
of the hall, where the Fourth-of-July revels,
and New Year balls, were held as regularly as
the summer and winter came round, was, in the
opinion of all the good women, quite a scandal
to their religious services. The men were not
quite so scrupulous. They wisely considered
that the building of a church would involve the
payment of taxes, and that inconvenience came
more home to the sensibilities of many rich men
than the recollection that where the fiddle had
resounded, prayers and holy hymns were to be
fervently breathed, or devoutly sung. But
finally Mr. Lawton, by dint of private
expostulations
with his church members, and public
reproofs from the pulpit, succeeded so far that
a town meeting was warned to be held, to see
what steps should be taken to provide ways
and means for building a meeting-house.
There is no record of a nation on earth
whose origin, progress, character and
institutions
were, or are, in their predominating
features
,
similar to ours. Democracies have
been, and governments called,
free
; but the
spirit of independence and the consciousness
of unalienable rights, were never before
transfused
into the minds of a whole people. The
trammels of rank have always been, since the
days of Nimrod, worn in the old world; and
there men, even when attempting to throw off
the yoke of despotism, will be found stooping
to established customs, and wearing the `
fardels'
of fashion as if still in the harness. But
in these United States no idol of nobility was
ever set up; and consequently, the people
have never been degraded by cringing at the
nod of a fellow mortal. Our citizens walk the
earth with a consciousness of moral dignity
which places them on a level with the king
upon his throne. The feeling of equality
which they proudly cherish does not proceed
from an ignorance of their station, but from the
knowledge of their rights; and it is this
knowledge
which will render it so exceedingly
difficult
for any tyrant ever to triumph over the
liberties of our country. However, to know
the rights of man is but half the benefit
imparted
by our free institutionsthey teach also
to know his duties. Persons accustomed only
to those establishments where the interests of
church and state are inseparably blended, and
where some particular form of devotion is
enforced
and supported by authority, can hardly
believe that were religious worship left wholly
to the free choice and voluntary support of the
people, it would be adequately maintained.
Yet our history will conclusively prove that
piety of heart and freedom of mind are not
only perfectly compatible, but that the
exercise
of the understanding in the examination
of creeds, and the volition of the will in the
admission of truth, are favorable to the cause
of religion and the Bible. Is this doubted?
then let the caviller point to the christian
nation
in which are so few infidels as
here
; here,
where freedom of inquiry, and conscience,
and belief, and worship, are not only enjoyed,
but exercised without the least shadow of civil
control.
These remarks are not foreign to my
subject
,
though they may
seem
misplaced, and
actually
be uninteresting or dull. It was only the
conscientious feeling of duty, which freedom
of inquiry and conduct brings home with a
sense of awful responsibility to those who
profess
to be Christians and know themselves
free, that would have induced the frugal,
painstaking
,
unostentatious citizens of Harmony to
tax themselves with the expense of erecting a
handsome house for religious worship, when
they were many of them still dwelling in their
small, inconvenient log tenements. The town
patent had been originally granted to a
Dutchman
belonging to Albany, and the first settlers
were descendants from the Dutch colonists;
but about the year 1790 the unoccupied parts
of the patent were purchased by a Yankee
speculator, and most of the later emigrants had
been from New-England. The inhabitants,
however, lived harmoniously together. Not
that they agreed exactly in sentiment on every
subject, but they seemed for some time to
cherish a spirit of mutual forbearance. The
Dutchman suffered his Yankee visiter to talk
without interruption and argue without
contradiction
,
and in return for this politeness the
latter saw his phlegmatic neighbour still adhere
to those old customs, which he had been
striving
to convince him were not only extremely
absurd, but very expensive and inconvenient,
without exhibiting much disgust.
The settlement of Mr. Lawton was the first
occurrence that threatened to make a deadly
breach between the parties. The Yankees
were nearly all Congregationaliststhe Dutch,
Presbyterians;the former made the most
bustle, but the latter polled the most votes, and
the settlement of their favorite was
accordingly
effected. The Congregationalists were at
perfect liberty to seek a pastor after their own
faith, but as the town did not contain more
people than might conveniently be
accommodated
at one meeting, and Mr. Lawton was
respected
by all and acknowledged to be a good
man, the Yankees finally concluded to attend
on his ministry, and pay their proportion of
his salary. Had Mr. Lawton been what, in
worldly language, is termed a managing man,
he might doubtless have satisfied both parties.
But he had fixed rules of action, from which
he would not swerve, and settled principles
which he would not soften, even though he
might by that means have gained the
popularity
of a Chalmers. And then he had a serious
dislike to the Puritan mode of church
government
,
which he took no pains to conceal or
qualify. In short, though, as I have said, he
was a good man, he was not sufficiently
careful
to prevent `his good from being evil spoken
of.' The consequence was, that his
Congregational
hearers soon took mortal offence and
withdrew from his society. Had they stopped
there, perhaps their conduct might not have
deserved much blame, as it was evident to all
that Mr. Lawton's sermons were oftener
calculated
to rouse their sectarian prejudices than
awaken their religious feelings. But they
were not satisfied with acting merely on the
defensive, for when was a Yankee ever known
to underrate his own importance, or quietly
submit to have his religious faith and mode of
worship censured as unsound and unscriptural?
Meekness and forbearance was not
certainly
the spirit evinced by the Congregationalists
of Harmony; and from protesting against the
presbyterian
forms
, they soon came to detest
and vilify the man, who so strenuously
supported
them, and the people who were his
adherents
.
Matters were in this state between the
parties
,
when the meeting-house was voted to be
erected. This vote was conscientiously
given
,
for when roused to reflection by the
arguments
and expostulations of their pastor, the
Presbyterians knew it to be their duty to build
the house, and yet, so wayward is the heart,
so deeply rooted is selfishness, that many
were dissatisfied, almost angry, because Mr.
Lawton thus urged upon them the
performance
of an inconvenient duty.
Some Europeans have suggested that while
depending entirely upon the people for their
support, our clergy must be timid and
time-serving
,
and while their own interest is
involved
in pleasing their hearers, that there is cause
to fear they will often make a sacrifice of
conscience
to convenience. This might be the
case, were not the clergy sensible that they
are themselves a part of the sovereign people,
and that to bow, cringe and fawn, would be a
renunciation of the dignity which here entitles
a man to respect from his fellow men. It is
the great merit of our free institutions that
they accustom those who enjoy them, to
reflection
and reasoning. It is not that our
citizens
may choose their own governors, and
enact the laws by which such governors must
be guided, that makes the privileges of which
Americans should be most proud. It is, that,
with the knowledge of his own personal
independence
,
which is as familiar to the
republican
child as `household words,' there is also
inculcated a conviction of man's responsibility,
not only to his God, but his country, posterity,
the whole world. And so far as the human
mind can shake off selfishness and act from a
sacred regard to truth, justice and duty, so far
will men not only be virtuous, but fearless in
virtue. And will not a clergyman be more
likely thus to feel and act, in a situation where
he is placed and retained by the sober
approval
of a majority of his free parishioners, than
when he owes his station to caprice, or
favoritism
,
or stipulation with an individual? There
needs no proof, but to attend our churches or
read the sermons of our divines, to convince
the most skeptical that our clergy are faithful
in the cause of religion, and that their flocks
esteem them higher for such plain dealing.
But everything excellent is liable to be
abused
or perverted; and this plain dealing may
be rendered ungracious by a disagreeable
manner. It is the manner which offends; and
it was the manner of Mr. Lawton which made
his people complain. No one thought of
blaming
him for supporting freely his own opinions,
or insisting that the promise concerning the
meeting-house should be fulfilled, but it was
said he was too dictatorial, and that he
hurried
on the workmen without reference to the
extra expense which it made the people, to
move faster than the usual considerate motion
of a Dutchman would allow.
But what has this long explanation to do
with Lois Lawton, the clergyman's daughter?
Muchit will enable you, reader, if you have
read it, which I somewhat doubt, to judge of
the perplexities which surrounded that young,
fair girl who is my heroine, and I hope will be
yours, while she was earnestly seeking to heal
those divisions which had unhappily, for some
time, rendered the inhabitants of Harmony as
unharmonious a set as can well be imagined.
To soothe suffering and calm the turbulent
passions of men, is so naturally the office of
woman
,
that Lois Lawton need not be
considered
a heroine merely because she was a
peace-maker
;
but it really must be placed among
extraordinary
achievements, that she, by her
prudent
and conciliating conduct, so ingratiated
herself with the good
vrows
, that they actually
came to the resolution to abstain from the use
of tea and sugar for a given period, till they
had saved a sum sufficient to pay for painting
the church, which expense, by the way, was
the one of which the Dutchmen most loudly
complained; and it was likewise an item on
which Mr. Lawton had strenuously insisted.
But to appease and please the Yankees,
required
more address, and yet their good will
was very necessary to the happiness of the
clergyman's daughter.
She thought as she gazed on the bright moon,
of the bitter prejudices that existed between her
father and Captain Isaiah Warren, the chief
leader of the Yankee faction; and then she
thought of his son, the young Isaiah, between
whom and her father's daughter, prejudices,
but not bitter ones, also existed.
`He said he had a plan which he hoped
would heal these differences, and make my
father look with approbation on our love,' said
the fair girl, softly yet audibly, a blush
crimsoning
her cheek, even though alone, and veiled
around by the shades of night, at the thought
of marrying Isaiah.
`And you consent I shall pursue my plan,'
said Isaiah, who had advanced, unperceived,
and then stood close beside her.
Lois had not expected him so soon, but she
was not easily flurried, or at least, she never
affected more fright than she really felt, and
though somewhat confused that he had
over-heard
her soliloquy, she neither screamed nor
fainted; but, after a moment's silence, turned
calmly towards him, and begged he would
explain
why he had so anxiously urged this
interview
.
`I wish to return home before prayers,'
said she`or my father will be uneasy,
perhaps
offended, at my absence.'
The lovers were standing partly in the
shadow of a broad sycamore that threw its
branches over the little stream at their feet.
The water there looked dark and deep, but
further
on, it was sparkling in the moonbeams,
that came down with that glistening power
which so sweetly invites `lovers to breathe their
vows,' and disposes `ladies to listen.' I wish
I had time to describe these two young
persons
,
just as they looked while they glanced
their eyes alternately at the charming prospect
around them, and then turned, by stealth, their
gaze on each other.
A genuine descendant of the pilgrims, has
usually, a high, bold forehead, and a firm
expression
around the chin and mouth, which
gives a decided, and generally a grave cast to
the countenance. This gravity, however, is,
in a degree, more or less, according to the age
and character of the person, counteracted by
the expression in the deep-set eyekeen,
lively
,
penetrating; it announces quickness of
thought and humor, which is always allowed
to the Yankees, both by friends and foesthe
one terming the quickness wit, the other
wickedness
.
When I say that Isaiah Warren had
a fine complexion, good features, and real
roguish-looking
,
Yankee eyes, that would flash
with thought or merriment till the blue iris
appeared
nearly black as the pupil dilated, I
mean to be understood that he was very
handsome
,
or, to use a more indefinite, and
therefore
,
more polite phrase, that he had a very
fascinating
expression of countenance. And he
thought Lois Lawton was beautiful as an
angel
.
It is therefore of little consequence what
others would think, should she be portrayed.
A woman should never sigh for personal
admiration
,
except from the man she loves.
`You have heard, I presume,' said Isaiah,
the blood flushing over his cheeks and temple
as he spoke, `that my mother is firmly
persuaded
that I am to become a clergyman?'
Lois half smiled, as she answered in the
affirmative.
`It is a foolish whim,' he continued, `and yet
my mother is a worthy woman, and a sensible
one, in all, except what relates to me.
Somehow
my parents, from my being the first born,
I presume, always appeared to expect I should
do marvels. I am sorry they indulge such hopes,
and yet the knowledge of their expectations,
has, I confess, spurred me on to attempt
being
the first, both at school and college. At
school my superiority was never denied, and
at college, though I labored under the
disadvantage
of being poorly fitted, and having to
be a teacher every winter, in order to earn
money to support myself, my father being, with
his large family, unable to furnish sufficient
funds; yet I know I maintained a respectable
standing in my class. But I have now
graduated
,
and my parents are urging me to
commence
the study of divinity. Could I study
with your father, Lois, I would willingly obey
them.'
Lois looked astonished, and yet gratified,
for her father was, in her opinion, the best
man, and best minister, in the whole world.
But how could the matter be brought about?
Captain Warren would never suffer his son to
study with a Presbyterian clergyman.
`My mother,' resumed Isaiah, `is confident
she once saw a vision; though, I presume, it
was nothing but a dream. When I was an
infant
,
she says, that one night a figure, clothed
in the costume of spirits, which is, I believe,
always white, approached her bed, and told her
that I would be a marvellous boy, and that I
must have a good education, and then it would
be again revealed what I must do. Since that
time, my mother has watched every incident
which has occurred to me, and tortured them
all into omens, which she constantly interprets
in my favor, till she has worked herself into the
belief, that I am to be a great man; and, as
greatness and goodness are, in her pure mind,
inseparably connected, she is convinced I am
to be a
great, good
man, which must mean a
minister
. It is in vain for me to combat these
imaginings. Indeed, I do not wish to disprove
her fancies, but to fulfil them; still I should
like, I own, to make this romance,
superstition
,
or prophecy, whichever it may be,
somewhat
subservient to my own happiness.'
`But how has this any reference to my
father
?'
inquired Lois, timidly.
`I have thought,' and he hesitated, as
if afraid or ashamed to say what he was
intending
`I
have thought, if the apparition would
again inform my mother that it was necessary
for me to study with Mr. Lawton, that all
objections
,
on the part of my family, would be
removed
at once.'
`You would not, surely, deceive your mother,
Isaiah?' said Lois, turning on him her dark,
expressive eyes, with a look of reproachful
tenderness.
`She has deceived herself, Lois. You are
not more credulous than I; nor do you
imagine
,
that, like Glendoweryou remember it in
Shakspeare
These signs have marked me extraordinary,
And all the courses of my life do show
I am not in the roll of common men.
Yet my mother firmly believes it. The
Yankees
are not credulous, or easily imposed
upon; but, when once they have imbibed a
superstition, it is difficult to eradicate the
prejudice
;
because they are constantly reasoning
themselves more and more into the belief of
the reality of their fancies. Thus, everything,
even the most common incidents, concerning
me, are marked, and noted, and made, in
some sense or other, to refer to the destiny for
which my mother thinks me born. Where can
be the harm in taking advantage of this
superstition
,
which I cannot remove, to heal the
prejudices that, at present, unhappily divide
our families; and thus overcome the only
obstacles
that exist to our union?' He then went
on to state, that what he proposed was, to
envelope
himself in a white sheet, appear in his
mother's room, and say, in a hoarse,
sepulchral
voice, that `Isaiah must study divinity
with Mr. Lawton.' And he wished Lois to
aid in disposing her father to credit the story
and receive the student. The families would
then be necessitated to hold some intercourse,
which, the sanguine lover was confident, would
ripen into fellowship and friendship.
`But we must not do evil, that good may
follow,' said Lois, with that solemnity of
manner
so peculiarly affecting when assumed by
the young and lovely. `This deception on your
good and kind parents, though not intended
for evil purposes, is still a deception. It will
be derogatory to the sacred character you are
intending to assume. It is wrongI cannot
tell you all the evil consequences that may
followbut my conscience tells me it is wrong.
You must not, Isaiah, you must not do it.'
It was all in vain, that he represented he
should otherwise be sent to Connecticut, to
study there with the favorite clergyman of his
mother; and that, in the interim, the jealousies
and divisions in the town would probably
increase
;
and, perhaps, his father and hers,
become
so exasperated with each other, as to
forbid their children to marry together. It
was all in vain. Lois would not be convinced
that expediency was any excuse for practising
deception; and though Isaiah's passion had,
in a measure, stifled his conscientious
scruples
,
his sophistry could not stifle hers. So
they separatedshe, with a sad face and slow
step, proceeded homewardsand he, with a
sadder face and slower movement, wended his
way towards a neighbouring house, where he
had promised to assist as a watcher with an
old man, who was dangerously sick. The man
died that night, and Isaiah gazed on a scene
he had never before witnessedthe last scene
of all. It struck him most painfully; because
the old man frequently adverted to, and
lamented
,
the follies of his youth,while it was
continually occurring to Isaiah, that he had
been guilty of a great sin, even to plan a
deception
upon his kind parents.
When the youth entered his father's house,
the next morning, he found the whole family in
commotion; and he learned, to his
astonishment
,
almost horror, that his mother had seen
the white apparition again, and it had told her
that if Isaiah would prosper in this world, and
be saved in the next, he must study with Mr.
Lawton.
Isaiah was thunderstruck,and, in the
consternation
of the moment, he acknowledged
what had been his own intentions respecting
the personating of the apparition. The
matter
grew more solemn, and Mr. Lawton and
Lois were summoned; when the clergyman
was, for the first time, apprised, that his
daughter
and the young student were looking to each
other for their earthly happiness. As nothing,
to clear up the mystery of the apparition,
appeared
,
it was believed, by all the women in
the town, to be an awful warning, a solemn call
to the two religious parties, to lay aside their
20
prejudices against each other; and as the
meeting-house
was now completed, and the people
were curious to attend in the new building, Mr.
Lawton had the satisfaction, and a heart-felt
satisfaction it is to a good man, of seeing a full
audience listening to his sermon on the first
Sabbath he performed divine service in the
new church.
From that time, there was more unanimity
among the inhabitants, than had been since
Mr. Lawton began his ministry. This change
was universally ascribed to the priest, who, his
hearers observed, preached fewer doctrinal
sermons
,
and insisted less on the doctrinal points
than used to be his wont. Undoubtedly there
was a change. Mr. Lawton as firmly believed
in the apparition as any of his people. Neither
was this strange, as he was descended, by the
father's side, from a Scotch emigrant, who
fancied himself gifted with the second sight,
and his mother was a German, fully believing
in all the wild and awful legends of German
superstition. And, notwithstanding Mr.
Lawton
was a man of sound sense and fervent piety,
it is not strange he should be a little infected
with superstitious or imaginative notions. But
these had, in this instance, a salutary effect;
because, as the apparition had, as it were,
borne witness to the saving creed of the
minister
,
he did not think it necessary to argue
continually to prove his creed the saving one.
And so the town of Harmony seemed soon
more deserving of its name.
There was a marked change of manner in
Isaiah Warren, from the time he commenced
his religious studies; and when he was licensed
and entered on the duties of his sacred office,
no young clergyman could be more devout and
devoted. Fourteen years passed awayThe
Rev. David Lawton and Captain Isaiah
Warren
were both gathered to their fathers. They
had died in full charity with each other, and in
the assured belief, that Presbyterians and
Congregationalists
were to inherit the same
heaven
.
But Mrs. Warren still livedlived, to
enjoy the pious triumph of seeing her favorite
son installed as pastor over the destitute church
of Harmony. And all this, she firmly believed
was foretold her by the apparition. She was
never undeceivedbut the reader must be.
Isaiah Warren had a brother Benjamin, a
wild, roguish, adventurous fellow, who finally
went to sea, and was absent many years.
After
his return, as he was sitting one evening in
his brother's study, telling such tales of his
wondrous chances as sailors will tell, he
remarked
an air of incredulity on Isaiah's
countenance
,
and instantly paused.
`Why do you not proceed?' inquired Isaiah.
`You do not credit me,' returned Benjamin;
`and yet it does not require a greater degree
of faith than you once exercised about an
apparition
.'
Isaiah saw the keen eye of his brother
sparkle
with mirth, and something that announced
a triumph. In a moment the truth flashed on
his mind. He started up, and striking the
table
with a volume of Baxter's Saint's Rest,
(the favorite book, next to the Bible, of his
father-in-law, the late Mr. Lawton,) as if the
said book had been a batten, he exclaimed
`Ben, I know you were that apparition!'
After a hearty laugh, Ben confessed the
whole. `I was,' said he, `down close by the
river, among some bushes at your feet, where
I had crept to fix a trap for a mink, and there
I lay and heard all your conversation with
Lois. After you had gone, thinks I to
myself
,
I will even play the trick on mother, and
it will be no sin, for I am not intending to be
a minister. So I wrapped up myself, and
stole into mother's room, on tiptoe, and I said
Isaiah must study with Mr. Lawton, and
then was out again in the twinkling of an eye.
That was all I did say, and that about your
being saved, was no words of mine. When I
found how seriously the affair was taken, I did
not dare to own what I had done. But, on the
whole, I think it was a good thing. You
obtained
your wife, and the people were all made
more peaceable and christianlike, and no bad
effect has followed. This, I guess, happened,
because I was not influenced by any bad or
selfish motives, for our chaplain always said,
that it was only the indulgence of selfishness
that caused us to sin.'
WILLIAM FORBES.
O! wherefore with a rash impetuous aim
Seek ye those flowery joys with which the hand
Of lavish Fancy paints each flattering scene
Where Beauty seems to dwell, nor once inquire
Where is the sanction of eternal Truth,
Or where the seal of undeceitful Good
To save your search from folly! Wanting these,
Lo, Beauty withers in your void embrace.
Akenside
`
What answer did Elizabeth give
?'
Those
readers, who have been sufficiently
interested in the work, to retain a recollection
of the contents of the fifth Sketch, may
remember
,
that `The Village Schoolmistress' was
left undecided respecting the answer she should
make to the matrimonial suggestion of her
recreant
but repentant lover, William Forbes.
We have given her six months to consider
the matter, and in this steam age of the world,
no woman ought to require a longer time to
make up her mind. What enviable
advantages
the antediluvian ladies enjoyed! They
might reflect and reject, doubt and delay,
consider
and coquet, for at least three hundred
years, without any risk of incurring that
appalling
epithet, which now, in the brief period of
thirty, is sure to be bestowed on the fair one
who dares to remain in `single blessedness.'
Yet I never envied that longlived race. I am
inclined to believe, the movement of the spirit
was then as sluggish as the course of time.
It must have been so, or the body could not
for so long a season have resisted the efforts
of the soul to escape from its prison house.
And this sluggishness must have infected their
literature. What interminable, prosing
articles
,
many of our writers are even now
inclined
to perpetrate, and if their hours might be
lengthened to years, would infallibly inflict
upon the public! Nothing but the necessity
of accommodating himself to the proverbial
speed of time, will induce your thorough
quillloving
author, to come to the conclusion of his
favorite argument or article. And from this
mania of `long talks,' which seems inherent
in most writers, we may safely conclude, that
those men of a thousand years, would not
neglect
their mighty privilege of making folios.
To be sure, in the dullest of all dull
matter-of-fact
knowledge, chronology and genealogy,
they had the means of excelling. But romance
dear, delightful romancewhat chance for
a romance writer, when every event that had
occurred since creation was within the memory
of man! And how could they write poetry,
among such an unchanging and deathless
generation? It would not certainly be the
poetry of feelingmelting, moving,
melancholy
poetry; for instance, like that most
beautiful of all Burns's beautiful productions,
`Highland Mary.' And where did they find
metaphors to express the long unfading
duration
of the youth they must have enjoyed?
Not in those bright, beautiful, but
evanescent
,
or shifting thingsbuds and flowersthe
morning and the moon. Only think of
comparing
the charms of a lovely girl, to the
firmness
of the mountain oak, or the unwasting,
unvarying appearance of the solid rock! Then
they had no rainbow. Ah, they never wrote
poetrythat's certain!
Other reasons, quite as pertinent and
conclusive
,
might easily be offered, to prove what
a dull, cold, formal, changeless and charmless
race they must have been,but of all kinds
of knowledge, I consider antiquarian lore as
the most unwomanly. It must be gained by
so much research, and explained by such
learned
terms, and defended by so many arguments,
in the Sir Pertinax style of obstinacy, that,
heaven defend me from ever meeting with that
anomaly in our speciesan antiquarian
without
a beard. Leaving it therefore, to some
future Jonathan Oldbuck, as curious and
communicative
as he of Monkbarns, to pursue the
inquiry respecting the precise age at which we
may conclude a belle of the Nimrodian era,
became an old maid, I will return to the
explanation
of those modern causes which gave
to Elizabeth Brooks that uncoveted title.
I have said, or ought to have said, that
William
Forbes was an excellent scholar, the very
first in his class, and, undoubtedly indebted
for much of his mental superiority, to that
circumstance
,
which is so often, and truly too,
considered a serious obstacle to the literary
career of a collegiannamely, his love
engagement
.
This unusual result, must be attributed to
the fact, that Elizabeth Brooks had the good
sense, to use rightly and rationally, the
influence
she possessed over the heart and soul of
the young student. Instead of wishing to
engross
his mind and time, with the trifles which
must occupy much of the life of a young girl,
she admired, and sought to imitate him in his
studies. And that simple circumstance,
contributed
more to animate him in his exertion,
than all the lectures of his tutors, or the
prospect
of obtaining triumphs over his class-mates.
How eagerly he read, and how early he
answered
all her long epistles with letters still
longer;and yet their correspondence was
like that of literary friends. To a stranger,
their letters would scarcely have betrayed that
they were lovers. His were filled with
translations
from the classics, beautiful sentiments
that enchanted him, and must therefore
enchant
Elizabethexplanations of ancient
customs
and costumes, which threw light on some
otherwise obscure passages he had read to
Elizabeth,solutions of problems, or
explanations
of questions that had been proposed by
Elizabeth. Her answers were more sprightly
than his, (a woman who can write at all,
seldom
writes a dull letter,) but nevertheless, were
sufficiently learned to have entitled her, had
they been seen by a literary coxcomb, to that
frightful appellation, a
bas bleu
. I say
frightful
,
because the terror of that name, has
prevented
,
and still prevents more women from
cultivating their minds, than would the fear
of the dungeon or the rack. It is the
intellectual
Blue Beard, threatening an awful and
unknown
punishment to those women, who dare
a single peep into the secret chambers of
knowledgeand where is the learned lady,
who can ever hope for a generous Selim to
rescue her from the keen, uplifted edge of the
sword of sarcasm?
Elizabeth Brooks, however, was wiser than
most wise ladies,that is, she did not assume
those airs, which some learned women think
so indispensable to distinguish their important
selves from the crowd. She might be a little
proud of her learning, she was certainly proud
of William's learning, but the pride of teaching
himthat pride which makes men so
thoroughly
dread, detest, and ridicule a learned woman,
she never displayed. Even when, as was
frequently
the case, he acknowledged, the
superior
justness of her remarks, or submitted to
the justness of her criticisms, she did not
express
any triumphbut modestly ascribed her
discernment to some hint or information he
had before given her; thus making his
self-love
aid in the influence she possessed over
him. And for many years, the attachment
fostered between these young persons,
appeared
,
and indeed was of that pure, refined,
intellectual
and exalted character, which poets
would tell us, was `half divine' and would be
quite eternal. It was that kind of affection
21
which, if aught dependent on human passion
were changeless, might hope to be so. But,
alas! the heartWho can answer for the
wayward heart, or more wayward fancy?
The parting, and as affecting one as a novel
writer ever witnessed, maugre all their
sentimental
descriptions,the parting of William
and Elizabeth has been already recorded, and
it irks me quite as much to tell a story twice,
as to listen to a twice told tale. So we will
without further ceremony, accompany my
hero
to Albany, and consider him entered as a
student-at-law, in the office of Judge Morse.
(Note. Almost every lawyer in New-York,
has, or might have, the title of Judge.) Mr.
Morse was a good, that is, a true, specimen of
the professional, political, popular men in
New-York. He was social and hospitable,
frank, cheerful, and fond of humor, if not
himself
a wit. He was also rich and respected,
had a gay, agreeable wife, and several children,
and his house was one of the most fashionable
in the city, and the resort of all the
fashionables
.
Here was a marvellous change to William.
He was transferred at once from the formal
routine and rigid rules of a college life, where
no flirting with the ladies was permitted to be
thought of, except the ethereal flirtation of
wooing those shy lasses, the `sweet and sacred
Nine,' and where nothing in this round world
was considered so important, as to have the
first appointment in the class, or be able to
write the best `ode to Hope, or sonnet to
Despair
,'
and introduced into the society of
elegant
and, as he thought, the most enchanting
people on earth, and to the bustle and business
of a large city.
Judge Morse had been long and intimately
acquainted with the father of William Forbes,
and to that circumstance, the young student
was indebted for the enviable privileges he
enjoyed
of being admitted to the family parties
of the distinguished lawyer. Indeed, William
was soon considered and treated as one of the
family. (What an excellent passport to really
good society those young people enjoy who
have good parents.) William Forbes had
promised to write particularly of all that befell
himall his adventures, and all his reflections
were to be communicated to Elizabeth. But
he soon found it very perplexing and
disagreeable
,
if not impossible, to keep his word. He
could describe the country tolerably well, and
the people
en masse
but to tell Elizabeth of
all the parties, balls, &c., he attended would, he
feared, make her unhappy in her retirement;
to tell her of the pretty and fascinating girls he
met, might make her jealous. His
amusements
,
therefore, could not be described to
Elizabeth. Neither would his employments
figure much better in an epistolary display.
In all his studies at college she had
participated
in
inclination
, if not in
understanding
but
Lawdry, musty, unintelligible, inexplicable
Lawhow could he make her comprehend
what was to himself incomprehensible. He
knew indeed, that she was so devoted to him
and his pursuits, that had she been near him
she would, for his sake, have looked on the
volumes of Blackstone without shuddering;
perhaps have looked
into
them sufficiently to
have learned the difference between
lex non
scripta
, and
lex scripta
. At any rate she would
have been interested, and listened delightedly
to the history of her lover's progress in that
study so exclusively masculine. But this
sympathy
could not be excited by a written
correspondence
;
so William relinquished the idea
of describing his studies to Elizabeth.
Most of our scholars pass their three years
of preparation and four years at college, solely
with the view of being better qualified for
active
life. Few, if any, are intending to devote
themselves to science or the cultivation of
elegant
literature. The necessary details of
business
,
and the feverish anxiety of politics, in a
few years wholly engross their minds, and
unless
the memory be exceedingly tenacious, of
all the rich hoards of Greek and Roman lore
they had once boasted, only a few sparkling
gems, kept for display, remain. This does not
happen because Americans are incapable of
comprehending the profound depths of science,
or of appreciating and admiring the sublimities
of geniusit is purely the effect of our
situation
.
With such a vast country to cultivate
and control, unceasing activity is demanded,
and there are, at present, no supernumeraries.
Then the chance of success in public life is so
tempting to the ambitious,and who will not
be ambitious, when there is a chance of
success
?
that almost all our men of talents are, at
least once in their lives, members of Congress
in expectation, I mean. William Forbes
had thus visited the Capitol, and been installed
in the speaker's chair before he had spent six
months with Judge Morse. And that was a
Quixotic speculation which he would by no
means have been willing to communicate to
Elizabeth.
Thus the sources of confidence and
sympathy
seemed, on his part, constantly contracting,
and he grew formal without intending it. If
Elizabeth noticed this change she did not note
it. She had much of that kind of good sense,
commonly called sagacity, which means, the
faculty of foreseeing consequences; and she
must have reflected that reproaches never have
the effect of enkindling the passion of a
lover
,
however they may operate on that of a
husband
.
So she did not complain that William's letters
were cold, formal, short; but she wrote often
and affectionately, and described her business
and her pleasures, her school and the
neighbours
,
just as if she felt confident he would be
interested in everything that concerned her.
It was the best plan she could have adopted,
to maintain her sway over the heart of William;
and it served, not withstanding the temptations
by which he was surrounded, to keep him for
more than two years, constant to the idea of
making Elizabeth his wife. And though he
might sometimes show a little more gallantry,
than is usually displayed by an
engaged
man,
towards the fair and fascinating ladies with
whom he associated, and about whom he was
often rallied, yet he never regretted his
engagement
,
never, in his secret soul, meditated
proving, what he did prove,a traitor to his
love;never till the fair Clarinda appeared.
I must describe her. Clarinda Curtis was the
daughter of a New-York merchant, a
successful
merchant, for at the age of twenty, he left
the vicinity of the Green Mountain, with only
two changes of apparel and two dollars in cash,
and in thirty years, passed in the `Commercial
Emporium,' he had acquired a princely
fortune
.
Clarinda was the only child by his first
wife, and from her mother inherited a large
estate. She was also rich, in expectations,
from her maternal grandmother, by whom she
had been brought up. Then she was
beautiful
,
splendidly beautiful: tall, even to the
majestic
,
as Vermont beauties usually are, and so
finely formed! Her height she inherited from
her father; but the symmetry, so gracefully
elegant, the rounded arm, taper fingers and
slender foot, were not quite so strictly
Vermontese
;
though these perfections are much
oftener possessed by your rural lasses, than the
city belle, or the more fastidious city beau,
who is usually a perfect Chinese in his
admiration
of small feet, imagines possible.
Clarinda's
features, with one exception, were perfect
as statuary could be moulded. Her forehead
was too narrow and receding, but examined by
the rules of art, no other fault could have been
discovered. Arched eyebrows, Grecian nose,
the rose-bud mouth, with the sweet curl on the
upper lip that so easily and advantageously
displays the white teeththe round dimpled
cheek, and exquisite chin, defying all
adjective
descriptions of round or square, or long or
short,all we can say of it is, that it was
shaped precisely as a beautiful chin should be.
And these features were harmonized by a
brilliant
complexion; pure red and white, and both
in their proper places; and enlivened by a pair
of blue eyes, of a softness that would have
looked
almost sleepy in a small girl, but belonging
as they did, to a majestic beauty, seemed to
throw an additional grace, the grace of repose
over her loveliness. Fine, glossy, `nut brown'
hair, which she wore in a peculiarly becoming
style, completed all we shall describe of her
outward form of beauty. Alas, that this should
be a show merely, not the index of inward
excellence
,
that this comeliness should not extend
to mind! Who can imagine such a lovely
looking being as I have described and believe
her a simpleton! Yet Clarinda Curtis with all
her charms, was a dunce; that thing which
sensible
and educated young men often admire for
a mistress; but which sensible and educated
married men will always find exceedingly
disagreeable
for a wifean accomplished dunce!
Nature was not wholly in fault. The original
constitution of her mind was undoubtedly dull,
she was slow to comprehendbut then she was
brought up by a doting grandmamma, and
never, till she was full twelve years old,
suffered
to do anything save to grow. Could her
tender relative have spared her that trouble,
she would, as she used often to express her
fears that the poor child would weary herself
with so much stretching and yawning. At
length Mr. Curtis interfered, and threatened to
take his daughter home if she was not better
instructed; and frightened at the prospect of
losing her darling, grandmamma resolved the
child should learn everything. Masters of all
kinds and professions were engaged, and
poured
their lessons like a mingled flood over the
unprepared mind of their pupil, till the few
ideas, that had, by the kindly influence of
nature
,
began to shoot, were deluged or uprooted,
and no other ever had time to fix. All her
knowledge seemed floating, unsystematized,
and unconnected as the sentiments in a
scrapbook
,
where, although you may have collected
something on every subject, you can never be
sure of finding that which is needed, or
appropriate
to the subject under discussion. Not
one of her numerous masters but was ashamed
of their pupil, except the dancing master.
Strange as it may seem, with her indolent
habits
,
she did love to dance. The excitement of
motion was so novel, she was in perfect
ecstasies
with dancing, and she soon danced
gracefully
.
For the rest, she could play a little,
sing a little, draw a little, and speak a few
French phrases; but she could not have told
whether Mexico was in North or South
America
;
nor have subtracted 7 from 15;nor wrote
a letter of a dozen lines without mispelling as
many words; nor read a paragraph in a
newspaper
intelligibly. She was a dunce; and yet
William Forbes, with all his learning and
penetration
,
his taste and talent, did not discover
it. She passed a fortnight with her aunt,
(Mrs. Morse was her aunt,) and William saw
her every day, and conversed with her every
day, and fell in love with her, and never
discovered
she was a dunce. It was strange, he
afterwards acknowledged, but then she was so
beautiful it would have seemed profane to have
doubted the elegance of her mind, the propriety
and beauty of her thoughts.
But though William was enchanted with her
appearance, and actually in that most woful of
all lover-like predicaments, engrossed with the
charms of one fair maid, while he was
engaged
to marry another not so fair, he might, and
I am inclined to believe he would have acted
the honorable part, and been true to Elizabeth,
had he not discovered that Clarinda was in love
with him. How the discovery was made I do
not know, but made it was, and William must
have been a hero indeed if, besides subduing
his own inclination, he could have rejected the
beauty and fortune that seemed, as Judge
Morse remarked, designed by Heaven to make
him blest, and insure his success in the world.
N. B. Judge Morse was not aware of the
ignorance and indolence of his niece; he had
seen her but seldom, and
heard
her less; for
she had the good luck to be naturally taciturn,
and real good luck it was, since her
appearance
was so much in her favor, that her silence
was called eloquent. Had she spokebut
she rarely did, except in monosyllables. She
was too indolent to converse. William Forbes
married her, as all my readers know, but they
do not know what mortifying disappointment
he endured, when he found with what a `
soulless'
being he was destined to pass those hours
of domestic intercourse his fancy had always
painted as the most enviable privilege the
married
state afforded. Had she been, as many
superficial ladies are, sprightly and amusing, he
might have thought, as many men do, that
learning was quite unnecessary for the sex;
but such indifference and inanity displayed
her ignorance in the most glaring and
disagreeable
point of view. She seemed unfeeling,
because she could not enter into any of his
ideas, or respond to his sentiments. With
Elizabeth his intercourse had been so truly
and purely that of intellect, their affection had
been so founded on mutual esteem for each
other's capacity, that nothing but experience
would have convinced him, that the love of
rational and intelligent beings could be
maintained
without some sympathy of mind. But he
knew his wife loved him, and wished to please
him, and that knowledge made him feel
indulgent
towards her ignorance, which he pitied
more than he despised. So passed the time
for a few months, and though not happy, yet
he might have enjoyed the pride of being
thought happy, as the having a handsome wife
and rich wife, is pretty generally considered a
passport to happiness, had he not unwisely
taken
it into his head, that it was possible to
make his bride wise. He thought she could
improve
,
and that she would improve if she only
knew how much his felicity depended on finding
a companion in his wife; and so he took a whole
evening for the purpose, and gravely as a
teacher, told her what he wished her to study
and read, and how he expected she would join
in the conversation with him and his friends,
&c., sketching precisely, though he might not
be aware of it, the intellectual character of
Elizabeth as a model for his Clarinda. He
might with just as much reason have drawn
the portrait of Clarinda's beautiful features,
and expected Elizabeth to mould hers by the
picture. There is an old and quaint verse that
I recollect reading when a child, which now
frequently recurs to my mind when I witness
some ridiculous displays of those who attempt
to fill a niche for which nature never designed
them.
The man of wisdom may disguise
His knowledge, and not seem too wise;
But take it for a constant rule
There's no disguising of a fool.
There is no disguise for such an one but in
silence; and thrice blest are those simpletons
who have the gift of silence. Clarinda
possessed
it, but love, what will not the magical
power of love effect? loosened her tongue.
Her husband requested she would read, and
she determined to read; her husband wished
her to talk, and she resolved to talk. But
unfortunately
,
the jumble of ideas that had
pervaded
her head, ever since she underwent the
penalty of listening to the lectures of six
different
masters in the course of the twenty-four
hours, besides her grandmamma's advice to
remember
all she heard, had so confounded her
memory and understanding, originally weak,
that though she read, she could neither
compare
,
reflect or generalize; and when she
attempted
to introduce in her conversation, any
thought she had gathered from books, it was
done with such an effort, and her quotations
were so inappropriate, that her ignorance was
never so apparent as in her learned phrases.
Then she had the habit into which your poor
conversationalists usually fall, namely, asking
questions. I know nothing more disagreeable
that does not absolutely shock one's
principles
,
than to be subjected to the society of a
questioner. And William Forbes disliked it
exceedingly, but nevertheless, he bore with his
wife's questions for a long time
magnanimously
,
hoping she would, as she gained
information
,
become capable of maintaining a
conversation
without such `questionable' aid. He
hoped in vain. She never, in society, could
speak upon any subject but by a question, and
the more confidence she gained in her own
powers
,
and the more she conversed, the more
ridiculously her questions were distributed
among her acquaintance. How often did her
husband wish, while his cheeks were glowing
with shame at some blunder she had
committed
,
that he had never urged her to talk. And
she did it to please himwhat could he say?
No matter what the subject of conversation
was, she would question. To give a few
instances
.
One day when an eminent counsellor
dined with Mr. Forbes, they happened, in their
legal disquisitions to allude to a writ of fi. fa.
and Mrs. Forbes eagerly demanded if that
writ was not made against a singing master?
At another time, she asked a lawyer, with a
real compassionate voice, if John Doe and
Richard Roe, could not take advantage of the
insolvent act?Those blunders to be sure,
related to matters which a lady is not obliged
to understand, yet she should understand
enough to say nothing when they are
introduced
;
but another blunder she made, could not
be so easily excused. Her husband was
appointed
to deliver the address before an
Agricultural
Society, and proud enough she was
of the honor conferred upon him. She could
talk of nothing else, and among her host of
questions on the occasion, she asked a
celebrated
rearer of merinos, why he did not
obtain
some cotton-wool-sheep and exhibit at the
show?
I mention these circumstances that young
men, intelligent and educated young men, may
be warned against marrying a dunce, though
she may be beautiful and rich, and affectionate,
yet if she be a dunce`she must, she will bring
shame and sorrow' on her husband. And young
ladiesis there not a lesson to them in this
exhibition
?
Do they not feel that though they
may be beautiful and rich, and married to the
man they love, and who returns their affections,
yet, unless they have cultivated and improved
their minds, they cannot make their husband
happy or respectable.
Mrs. Forbes suddenly died during the tenth
year of her marriage, and those who think her
husband rejoiced, will do him foul wrong. He
shed tears of unaffected sorrow over her pale
corpse, for he felt she loved him, and that the
pang of death to her was separation from him.
But then his grief was not of that deep,
enduring
kind which is cherished by the survivor
when kindred minds are torn asunder. He
grieved that his wife should die more for her
sake than his own, or that of his two little
daughters, to whom he knew she never could
have been a competent instructress or mother.
And we may conclude that he did not think
riches and beauty were the most important
qualifications a wife could possess, because, as
soon as decency would permit, he wrote to
ascertain
if Elizabeth Brooks was still at liberty.
`
What answer did Elizabeth give?
'
She said no! unhesitatingly, as any woman
of refinement and delicacy treated as she had
been, would say.
But Mr. Bennett would not send her answer
to his nephew, would not allow that she could
decide on so important a point without first
seeing
William Forbes. `I wish my nephew to
visit me,' continued Mr. Bennett, `and if I send
him your rejection he will not come to New
Hampshire. No, no, Elizabeth, we will give
him a hearing before we pronounce his doom.'
William accordingly came. A noble looking
man he was; it seemed that his manly beauty
had improved by years. There was a
striking
contrast between his appearance and that
of Elizabeth. He had a fine commanding
figure
,
his black eyes were still as bright, and
black hair as glossy as ever, only around his
temples it had grown thinner, and gave to his
ample forehead a more judicial dignity. She
was slender and pale, or rather inclining to
yellow; our villainous climate, cold winters
and rough winds, soon tarnish a fair
complexion
.
But then Elizabeth's countenance looked
so animated and intelligent, that I really
believe
William Forbes thought her comely, for
he gazed on her with the look of a lover
regarding
a beautiful girl.
That appealing look, or his eloquence, he
was said to be a very eloquent pleader, and
doubtless taxed his persuasive powers in the
suit he was urging, finally obtained him the
victory
.
Elizabeth, however, told Mr. Bennett,
the day before she was married, that she should
not have consented to wed Mr. Forbes but for
the sake of his children, his little girls who, he
said, so much needed her care and
instructions
.
Thus by appealing a little to her
professional
pride, for all successful instructers are
somewhat proud of their vocation, the lawyer
succeeded, and carried home a sensible and
intelligent woman, and was never afterwards
ashamed to invite his friends to a dinner party
lest they should discover his wife was a dunce.
Reader, the `Sketch' is finished; and I think
it proper to announce it, lest those who read to
the end of the article should pronouce it dull;
merely because it is long. What follows is
intended
entirely for the ladies;
gentlemen
,
therefore
,
will please to pass it over. Gentlemen
never indulge their curiosity about the
forbidden
,
so I feel perfectly secure they will not read
the next two pages. But the ladies
must
read
them.
In the preface to the Village Schoolmistress
were some remarks which, either from their
novelty or the ambiguous manner in which
they were expressed, will not, I fear, be
understood
in the sense intended. I did not mean
that there was no
difference
in the minds of
women. I believe, in the original
conformation
of soul, there exists as much dissimilarity
among women as menand the reason that the
original capacity is not more distinctly
developed
and displayed, is wholly to be
attributed
to the situation of the female sex. There
is for them but
one
pursuit. Of what use is it
for us to deny the fact, that it is in the marriage
establishment only, that woman seeks her
happiness
and expects her importance, when all
history and our own observation, confirm it to be
the truth. It is not so with men,they have
more than
one
medium through which to seek
for fortune, fame and happiness, and that is, in
my opinion, the sole reason of their superiority
of mind over us. How I do wish women would
be sensible of this, and endeavour to find or
make an employment, consistent with
propriety
that
must never be relinquished;which
would give to their minds strength and dignity,
the strength and dignity which is acquired from
exertion and self-dependence. But while
women
imagine they are gaining importance, and
are flattered with those compliments on their
intellectual
progress, which the gentlemen
sometimes
deign to bestow, they seem perfectly
unconscious
that they have not made one step of
advancement in the scale of society, or at least,
they are only engaged in the same occupations,
namely, that of canvassing fashions and
super-intending
household affairs, which occupied the
sex a thousand years ago. I do not say women
have not more learning, that they do not
read
more, but pray tell me what difference this has
created in their
pursuits?
except to make them
less usefulbecause they now, many of them,
think that to `work with their hands' is
disgraceful
for ladies, and yet there is no employment
provided, in which they can exercise their
talents
and learning advantageouslyor indeed,
at all. I would rouse them from this
supineness
,I
would have them seek some
employment
,
have some
aim
that will, by giving
energy
to their minds, and the prospect of an
honorable independence, should they choose
to continue single, make them less dependent
on
marriage
as the means of
support
.
They will then
really
improve, because their
minds will have a wider circle in which to move
and act. Women might succeed in many of
the fine arts; but still, I think the business of
instruction, the one best fitted to their
character
,
22
to the situation, which they must, indeed,
ought
to hold in society, because it was
evidently
assigned them by their Creator. It was for
these reasons I urged upon their consideration
the importance of
schoolkeeping
.
I seek to promote the happiness and the best
interest of my sex; but I do not think that
happiness
,
or those interests will be advanced by
flattering women that they are
angels
, or that
they have, as yet, much claim to a mental
equality with men, if
equality
consist in the
exertion
of
mind
. We have reason, but we
seldom
use it; we might about as well be guided
by instinct. We proceed day after day, and
year after year in the same routine, without
exhibiting one
original
idea. All new
discoveries
and inventions are made by the men;
even the chemical combinations in cookery,
and their causes, are unknown to almost every
female, to those who have cooked all their days.
We do not
think
there is the fault of our
education
we
are not taught by necessity,the
necessity that arises to men in their
diversified
pursuits,to
reflect
.'
A WINTER IN THE COUNTRY.
`My country, thou art
free
the orient wave,
Albeit perfumed by India's spicy gales,
Floats round the land where dwells the crouching slave,
Where rapine prowls, and tyranny prevails
But here, in Freedom's green and peaceful vales,
Man with his fellow mortal proudly copes;
No despot's will the peasant's home assails,
Nor stalks th' oppressor o'er its pastoral slopes,
Nor reaps the stranger's hand the harvest of his hopes.'
Did
you ever live in the country? I don't
mean a residence of some six or seven weeks,
just to escape the burning, boiling, stifling
atmosphere
of the crowded city, when the
thermometer
stands at 93 in the shade, and clouds
of dust render promenading through
Washington
Street almost as dangerous as would be a
march through the desert, to explore the ruins
of Palmyra. But there is the Mall. Oh! the
Mall is unfashionable;and what lady, having
a proper sense of her own dignity and delicacy,
but would prefer suffocating at home, to the
horror of a refreshing walk in an
unfashionable
place? They must resort to the country.
But never should those ladies imagine their
experience of pastoral life, makes them
competent
to decide on rural pleasures and rural
characters; or gives them the right to bestow
those convenient epithets, dull, ignorant,
plodding
,
on our country farmers, or uneducated,
unfashionable, dowdyish, on their wives and
daughters.
Summer and autumn are the seasons, during
which our city people visit the country. In
summer all who feel a sensibility for the
beautiful
,
are charmed. The green woods, the
flowery
fields, the soft lulling waters and calm bright
skies, are successively admired and eulogized.
The sweet scenery is extolled, be-rhymed,
sketchedleft and forgotten. Autumn
scenery
makes a far deeper impression on the
feelings
.
There is something in the decay of
nature
that awakens thought, even in the most
trifling mind. The person who can regard the
changes in the forest foliage,that can watch
the slow circles of the dead leaf, as it falls from
the bough of some lofty tree, till it mingles with
the thousands already covering the ground
beneath
,
and not moralize isnot a person that
I would advise to retire to the country, in
search of happiness. He or she had better stay
in the city and be amused. Those who cannot
think
, have, in my opinion, a necessity (which
goes very far towards creating a right) for
amusement.
But the season when the scenery of the
country
makes the most delightful impression on the
traveller's senses, or awakens his mind to
reflection
,
is not the time to form a correct
estimate
of the social pleasures and mental
advantages
,
which the inhabitants in our interior
towns enjoy. Labor, unceasing labor is,
during
summer and autumn, the lot of the farmer,
and usually of all his family. The city lady or
gentleman, who visits in the country, regards
this industry as oppressive, almost slavish.
And truly it is sometimes so;but still there
is a satisfaction to those industrious people, in
seeing how much their hands have
accomplished
;
and there is a positive pleasure in the rest
that night allows, and above all, which the
Sabbath
brings, that persons ever occupied in
amusements or busy about trifles, cannot
comprehend
,
any better than a blind man could the
effect of colors on the eye. I may be told,
that such happiness only refers to animal
sensations
,
that mind has no part in the bliss which
mere respite from the plough allows the farmer,
any more than to the repose it brings the
cattle
that assisted his labors. If mind had no
influence
to prompt his industry, this might be
true; but our American yeomanry are lords of
the soil they till,they `call no man master on
earth,'they are in fact, the acknowledged
sovereigns of this vast country,they are, in
our republic, entitled to respect, from their
station; and those who affect to look down
upon
the farmer and his family, to despise and
ridicule
the country people, exhibit a spirit which,
if it be refined and delicate, is neither
enlightened
,
liberal or patriotic. The truth is, such
fastidious persons know little, if anything, about
the country; not much more than did Owen
Ashley, when he first entered as a partner in
the store of Mr. Silsby, merchant in the village
of, situated about thirty miles west
of the Green Mountains. Owen Ashley was
Boston born and educated; and was in truth, as
fine a gentleman as could be found in the city.
He was also endowed with very good abilities,
and had he not indulged an over-weaning
conceit of the privilege he enjoyed, in being a
native of the metropolis of New England, he
would have been a very sensible young man.
His father had been reputed very rich, and
his failure in 1813, was wholly ascribed to the
pressure of the times. A time of calamity it
undoubtedly was, to many of our citizens, but
none seemed more conspicuously marked by
misfortune, than the elder Mr. Ashley. His
real losses were not so great as was reported.
He had for many years lived beyond his
income
,
and it therefore required but a slight
shock of his mercantile credit to embarrass
him; and when the downward course was once
begun, he had no means of retarding the
catastrophe
.
But I am not intending to sketch
the old gentleman; only as his failure was the
cause of inducing his son Owen, to emigrate
to that `unknown bourne' to most of the native
Bostonians, the land of the Green Mountains,
it was necessary to mention it. Such an
unprecedented
adventure required a reasonable
motive for its justification, or I might be
accused
of giving the creations of fancy, rather
than sketches of real characters.
`Is it true, Ashley, that you are intending
to leave the city?' inquired Edward Paine, as
he took the arm of the former on quitting the
theatre.
`Yes, such is my intention,' replied Owen, in
a low tone.
`When do you go?'
`To-morrow.'
`To-morrow,' ejaculated Edward in
astonishment
.
`Why, Ashley, you cannot be serious.
Have you forgotten the party at Mrs.
Drayton's
to-morrow evening? Maria said she was
particularly anxious to see you, and she has
been arranging to have some delightful music;
those songs and airs you so much admire,
to charm you if possible, from this preposterous
plan of self-banishment.'
`My dear friend, what else can I do?' sighed
the discontented Owen. `I have no funds to
support me in the city. My father is a
bankrupt
by thousands. At his age, it will not be
expected he should enter into new
speculations
,
and his friends are prepared to assist
him. He must, for the present, accept their
aid. But what is excusable for him, would be
a disgrace to me. I must engage in business;
but I can do nothing here. Neither is the
encouragement
for honest adventurers in any of
our cities, at all more flattering. The Vermont
merchant, has made me a very generous offer,
and I must either accept it, or enlist for a
soldier, I see no other alternative.'
`I think, to shoulder the musket would be to
me the least horrible of the two,' replied Paine,
as they entered his lodgings together. `I
declare,' continued the little beau, as he
arranged
his hair at the mirror, with a very
self-satisfied
expression of face. `I declare it is
abominable, Ashley, that such a fine fellow as
you are, should be driven from all good society,
and sent among the bears of Vermont. If I
only thought the war was a just one, I would
urge you to enlist as a soldier.'
`I have similar feelings of disgust, when
thinking of my destination,' said Owen. `And
yet I fear it is wrong, even absurd to indulge
in them. This Mr. Silsby, is a noble-minded
fellow, and a noble looking one too. Indeed,
quite the gentleman in his manners; and it
cannot be, that he lives among savages. Have
I ever told you the reason of his kindness
towards
me?'
`Not as I recollect.'
`There is an air of romance about the
business
,'
replied Owen, smiling, `that promises
well for me; because I never read any similar
preface, without a fortunate denouement. You
must know, that some twenty years since, this
same Mr. Silsby, who had been in trade but a
short time, came here to sell a drove of cattle,
and purchase a stock of goods. He had traded
with my father from the first, and was then
considerably in his debt. The day after he
arrived in the city with his cattle, there came
a sheriff with demands from people in
Vermont
,
and attached the whole drove. Mr.
Silsby applied to my father, and stated, that the
proceeding was the work of an enemy who
was seeking to ruin him and supplant him in
his business. This man, Silsby said, had been
circulating false reports against him, affecting
his credit, and by that means had frightened
those men from whom he had purchased cattle,
and who were to wait his return, and had
induced
them to send on their demands after
him. He said, if his property was thus
attached
,
and sold at auction, it would ruin him, but
that if he had the money to satisfy those
demands
,
the market was good, and he should be
able to pay the loan before he left the city.
My father was a generous spirited man, and
he had moreover, a most thorough detestation
of all mean, paltry, villainous tricks; and he
advanced the money without hesitation. I
have since heard him remark, that had Silsby
shown the agitation when he came to borrow
the money, which he did when he came to pay
it, he should have thought him a weak, timid
man, and though he might not have doubted
his honesty, he should most probably have
refused
to assist him. When he appeared to
solicit the favor, he was to be sure very pale;
but his air was perfectly collected and his
countenance firm. But when, after a very
successful speculation in the sale of his cattle,
he entered, and taking out his pocket-book
filled
with bank notes, he asked my father to pay
himself, and added, you sir, have saved me
from a failure, from disgrace, perhaps from a
gaol; he burst into tears. He appeared so
overcome by his feelings, that my father in a
lively tone attempted to reassure him, by
saying
,
that what he had done had been no
inconvenience
,
that it did not deserve even a single
23
thank yebut added he, if you think it
has been of so much benefit to you, why I am
the person who should feel obliged, because,
through your means I have performed a good
action so very cheaply. This reasoning,
however
,
did not seem to soothe the feelings of the
Vermont merchant,he appeared distressed
with his gratitude, till at last, my father said,
Mr. Silsby, we will think no more of this
matter
now,I may hereafter want your assistance,
or my boy may. It is to me a sufficient reward,
that I have obliged an honest man, and gained
a good friend. Mr. Silsby looked up at these
words and called me to him. I was then but
four years old, but I remember it as though it
were but yesterday. He called me to him,
took me on his knee, and bent his face down to
mine. I remember hearing him whisper, but
what he said I did not understand. He then
kissed my cheekand so ended the
tragicomedy
.'
`You think,' said Edward Paine, attempting
to smile, while something like moisture
conglobed
in his eye, `you think that this
good-hearted
Yankee then, made a vow to assist you
if ever his kindness was necessary?'
`I have no doubt of it. And though he has
never mentioned the circumstance of the loan,
he never forgot while my mother lived, to make
her an annual present. One year he would
bring a fat turkey so large, that we were
sometimes inclined to call it a different species
from those to be found in the marketthen
would come a firkin of most excellent butter,
the balls all made up in a particular form, with
a very curious stamp on each ball, and
sometimes
he would send a cheese, which I used to
believe when a child, was precisely the size of
the moon; and so indelibly has that idea fixed
itself in my mind, that I now never see the
fullorbed
luminary of night, without thinking of a
Vermont cheese.'
`What does he propose to do for you?'
inquired
Edward. `I should say, from what you
have related, that he was a very good sort of a
man, but whether you would like a residence
with him, is another affair. I suppose he has
a wife, and at least a dozen children of his
own?'
`No, he is so singular as still to be a single
man. He met with a disappointment of the
heart, I have heard my mother say, soon after
she became acquainted with him. The young
lady to whom he was engaged, died of a
consumption
.
He brought her to Boston, during
her illness, and she spent several weeks with
my mother. I remember seeing the young
lady; and I remember well how my mother
wept, when Mr. Silsby came and carried her
away; and that she told my father she wept
for the sorrow the young man would soon
endure, because, though he flattered himself
with hopes, the young lady would never live to
reach home. And she did not. Mr. Silsby
has never married, and so we have reason to
think he still remembers his first love,and I
am so romantic, that I confess I respect him
for his constancy.'
`He probably intends to make you his heir,
if he has no family. Is he rich?' asked
Edward
with an expression of interest in the
inquiry
,
his face had not before exhibited.
`Yes, he is rich for the country; but I am
not intending to play the part of heir
expectant
.
The fawning smile, the equivocal speech
of such a parasite, is to me, most
contemptible
.
Mr. Silsby merits my gratitude much
more, than if he had promised to give me his
fortune, because he seems anxious to
encourage
,
and enable me to earn a fortune for
myself. He offers to take me as a partner,
and allow me one half the profits of his
business
simply for my assistance. And he seems
eager too, to save me from all mortification of
wanting a capital, by repeating how much he
needs my help as an accountant,that he is
tired of being always harassed, &c.; and that
is what I call perfect charity. 'Tis a virtue
rarely practised. Most people seem to think
that if they aid you in an enterprise, your
feelings
are of no consequence. But I esteem
that delicate kindness which spares me the
consciousness of my present dependence as the
greatest favor I can receive. Yes, Silsby is a
noble-hearted man, and I only wish he lived
among civilized beings.'
`O! 'tis abominable to think you must go
to Vermont,' said Edward Paine, buttoning
his coat up closely as though the blast from the
Green Mountain even in thought, had power
to freeze his spirit. `Why, my dear fellow,
do you not postpone your travels till next
spring?'
`Because I am impatient to know the worst.
I hate this procrastination of fate. It is to my
feelings more insupportable than actual
misery
.
I shall go to-morrow.'
`O! not to-morrowAllow one more
evening
to your friendsto pleasureto life.
Consider that you will not soon have another
opportunity of listening to the concord of
sweet sounds. You will hear no music beyond
those rude hills, except the piping of the wintry
winds, or a serenade of wild cats.'
Owen shook his head, and attempted to
speak gaily while he replied`Thank you,
Edward, for your solicitude. It speaks well
for your heart; but my judgment must not
yield, even to your affection. If I have any
merit, entitling me to the confidence of my
friends, it is, that when I have taken a
resolution
on conviction of its fitness, I will adhere
to it. So farewell. And when you and my
young companions meet, pray remember, that
in spirit I am with you.'
`Letters, we shall expect,letters
containing
all your adventures and discoveries in that
terra incognita,' said Edward, pressing his
friend's hand as they parted, `or we shall
conclude
you have positively given up the ghost,
actually died of the
maladie du pays
.'
`Yes, you shall have letters,' was the reply;
and how well the promise was fulfilled, the
extracts with which I shall conclude the sketch,
will prove. The whole correspondence ought
to be given, butthat may be done hereafter,
if this sample proves acceptable to public taste.
At present, I shall only select such letters and
passages as will mark most distinctly, the effect
which country scenes and characters, had
upon
the mind and feelings of my hero.
Vermont, Dec. 23.`I am here you see
my dear Edward,and alive and well, and in
no danger of dying from disgust, or ennui, or
even the
maladie du pays
. To account for
such a phenomenon, I will just tell you truly
of my tour, and describe my present
residence
.
I started, as you well know in company with
Mr. Silsby, in his sleigh. Well, we travelled
silently on, he immersed in his mercantile
speculations I suppose, and I deeply engaged
in planning letters, in which I intended to
exert
all my fancy, to portray the savage and
wild scenes I should traverse, and the uncouth
beings I should meet, in a style of elegant
pleasantry, that would divert my friends. I
remember now nothing of those fancies, except
that I intended to introduce the witticism, that
the farther I travelled
west
, the more I became
convinced the wise men must have come from
the
east
,and another one, in which I was to
represent the immense benefit my journey
would be to science, as the elevation of the
country where I resided, had actually permitted
me to discover five new stars, one of which, I
was convinced must be the lost Pleiad.
During these thoughts, if such reveries
deserve
the name of thought, I examined
coolly
you must allow, for I was half frozen, the
country through which I was travelling. I
was never before in the interior of the country.
Never before at a greater distance than thirty
miles from Boston, except when I went by
water to visit our Atlantic cities. I expected
that the farther I receded from the sea shore,
the more rude and uncultivated the land and
the people would be. Edward, I was never
so disappointed in my life. And I would with
pleasure describe some of the beautiful
villages
,
beautiful even in winter, and country
seats I passed on my route hither,but your
city prejudices would discredit me. Come
and see the country for yourself. Come in
the summer, if to
see
is all you are anxious
about; but Mr. Silsby says, that if you wish
to partake the social enjoyments of the country
in their perfection, winter is the season. But
come. Do not permit even the terror of
journeying over the Green Mountains to deter
you. I had pictured the passage as an exploit
similar to that of Hannibal's famous march
over the Alps,with this trifling difference,
that the destiny of nations was involved in his
experiment of forcing his array of men and
elephants over those frozen heights, while I,
riding at my ease, wrapped in a trio of buffalo
skins, had nothing, but the vulgar business of
studying my own comfort and preserving my
own life and limbs, to attend to. Still I thought
the adventure must be of some consequence.
There must be, said I to myself, rugged
precipices and narrow defiles, and yawning
chasms, and perhaps a
glacier
or two. I had
never heard the latter particularly named as
being among the terrors of the Green
Mountain
;
the epithet
Green
, did not seem
applicable
to a mountain of ice,but yet I might
discover a glacier. Edward, I was never so
disappointed in my life, indeed I was really
angry, when, after reaching that stupendous
scene of `mountains piled on mountains,' a
few hours driving, up hill and down to be sure,
and through a cold, dismal looking fir region,
but on a good turnpike road, and without a
single
accident of any kind, Mr. Silsby
announced
,
that we had crossed the Green Mountains.
Here was a finale to all my hopes of being
immortalized by escaping an avalanche. All's
well, thought I, what an ignoble catastrophe,
that I should pass that barrier of civilisation
and have no report to make but that all's
well!
I might mention some peculiarities of the
scenery, that would interest you by contrast,
at least, for it is very different in character to
that by which you are surrounded. But the
impression it has made on my mind, is favorable
to the country through which I have passed,
very favorable in comparison with the images
of savageness, desolation, rudeness and
poverty
,
which I had always drawn of this part of
New England; and which I know your fancy
will still conjure up whenever Vermont is
named. So we will let the country pass, and
turn to the people.
My Mentor was not at all communicative on
our journey. He seemed, as I thought, to be
rather averse to answering my inquiries
respecting
the inhabitants of the good town,
where I was to make my debut. I imputed
this reserve, to his admiration of my knowledge
and accomplishments. He has, thought I,
already
discovered that the society of his
villagers
,
will be to my refined taste, flat and
unprofitable
,he
is ashamed of the people to
whom he is about to introduce me;for his
sake, for he is really a good-hearted man, I
will try and be civil to his friends; but I will
not permit those bumpkins to treat me with
familiarity. Such were my reflections when,
just as the sun was setting, on the fourth day
of our journey, Mr. Silsby aroused me from my
self-complacent mood, by saying we were
within
six miles of his home.
Have you a good hotel or boarding-house
in your town? said I.
We have a tavern, he replied,but I
have engaged your board in a private family,
where I lodge myselfwith Colonel Gage. He
is one of our best mena real Yankee farmer.
Good heavens! thought I,am I to
board in a farmer's family?
I believe the nervousness of my mind, was
apparent in my countenance, for Mr. Silsby,
after regarding me a minute or two, said very
calmlyIf you should not be satisfied with
your lodgings, Mr. Ashley, you can easily
change. But I wish you to spend a week with
me.
The day had been cold and gloomy, and
soon after sunset, the whole horizon was
overcast
,
and a thick darkness coming on, it
became
necessary to drive slowly, and the miles
seemed to me as long as they say Scotch ones
are. We occasionally passed very
comfortable
looking houses, the bright windows,
promising
warmth and gladness within,but I had
no interest in their joysI felt chilled even to
the heart, I felt like a strangerwhere were
my friends, my home, my own bustling city?
Could I, at that time, have had the power,
which I have often coveted, of transporting
myself by a wish, to whatever place I desired,
very certain I am, that I should have been in
Boston with the speed of Clavileno, and with a
resolution never again to venture beyond the
Green Mountains. When the sleigh stopped
at the door of Colonel Gage, I was just in that
peevish mood engendered by hunger, cold,
fatigue
and discontent, which makes a man the
most unreasonable creature on earth. I
determined
to hate my host and all his family,
and find fault with everything. There was a
secret pleasure in thinking I should have cause
to find fault,and that was all I expected to
enjoy.
We were met at the door by the Colonel
himself. He gave Mr. Silsby a very
brotherly
greeting, and when I was named, grasped
my hand with such warmth, such kindness, that
the pressure actually sent a glow through my
shivering frame,Edward, it reached my soul
in spite of my prejudices, I do believe our
spirits
know their friends. He never relinquished
my hand till we had entered the room, where
he introduced me to his wife, his daughter,
and five sons, of all ages from sixteen down
to six.
Well, Edward, you expect a description of
the family. Wait a month, and then I can
judge more accurately. I have been here now
but four days; perhaps I shall reverse my
present
opinion. I do not care to be called an
enthusiastor a lover. I never will be
convinced
of an error by my feelings only. I
must have a reason to render for every change
in my judgment of men and things. But thus
much I will say, and it is what I should once
have thought impossible,I am in a country
village in Vermont, living in a farmer's family,
and yetI am very happy.'
January 23d.
Convince a man against his will,
He's of the same opinion still.
`There is truth in that couplet, my dear
Edward
,more
than is always contained in wise
proverbs. It is a very difficult affair to
convince
a person who has not only made up his
mind on a subject, but defended his position
with all the strength of his logic, that he has
mistaken the causes or consequences of his
system. Were it not for this tenaciousness of
the human mind to maintain and uphold what
it has received as truth, and defended as truth,
even after convinced that it is not true, there
might be reasonable grounds to hope that men
would, in time, reach that perfection which is
now considered possible, only by the visionary
philosopher, or the credulous philanthropist.
But I mean to prove, that it is practicable to
overcome the prejudices of education, or
situation
rather. I will cite my own change of
opinion, as proof that we may, if we will be
open to conviction, correct our errors of
sentiment
.
The person who believes he has no
errors of opinion, must be a fool,and he
who will not correct them, when discovered,
will never be wise.
When I was a tiny boy I thought, as our city
children do, that the country was a place of
woods, filled with bears and other wild animals,
and I regarded the country people as objects
of compassion, because they were obliged to
live in such a place. This, you will say, was
a childish notion, but I always retained the
idea, that the advantages of a polite education
were, in New England, confined to Boston and
its vicinity. A few weeks' residence here
has convinced me, and therefore I acknowledge
it, that a young lady may possess a refined
taste, and cultivated mind and manners, may
be
accomplished
in your sense of that
fashionable
word, without even having been beyond
the atmosphere of Vermont; and that country
farmers may be men of intelligence and
literature
,
may be well-bred and agreeable, in short,
gentlemen
in manners and conversation. You
recollect saying that I should hear no music
in this region, save the piping of the winds, or
the shrieks of wild cats. Why, Edward,I
listen to the notes of a piano-forte every day;
and the sweet girl who plays it with a taste and
skill I scarce ever heard exceeded, never was
out of Vermont in her life! You may stare,
you must not disbelieve. When I first saw
the instrument, the evening of my arrival, I
thought Mr. Silsby must have purchased it at
some auction in Boston, and removed it to
the country to astonish the natives. I have
since been told, and am convinced, that there
are but very few villages in this state or in
New Hampshire, but what have at least one
family, often several, whose daughters are
instructed
to play the piano-forte. I do not
mention
this as redounding vastly to their praise,
because I think the accomplishment, delightful
as it is, is often too dearly purchased; but I
wish you to know, that the city belles do not
monopolize all the
advantages
of such
accomplishments
.
And I wish also to correct your
ideas respecting the wealth and intelligence,
the manners and refinement of this portion of
our Union.
In the dwelling of Colonel Gage, large,
thoroughly finished, and furnished, even filled
full
from garret to cellar, I see nothing that
would shock your taste save the large
fire-places
,
and an old-fashioned, armed chair in the
sitting room. The latter, Colonel Gage would
tell you he prized, because it was his father's
before him, and the former he would say, were
necessary for the climate. But I confess they
alarmed me a little, especially the first time I
saw the kitchen fire. I was passing the door,
when hearing a roaring like that of flame, I
stepped inand such a blaze I never saw on
any hearth before. I hastily demanded of the
housemaid, if there was an engine at hand.
She understood me to say
Indian
and replied,
that there had never been an Indian in town
since she could remember. After I made her
comprehend my meaning, the matter was no
better, for neither had she even seen an engine.
In the theory of extinguishing fires, therefore,
I found I was vastly superior to the
Vermonters
,
but in the skill of kindling (or
building
as
they term it, and truly, the pile of maple wood
looks like a building,) one I was quite as
inferior
so
on the whole I had nothing to boast.
But now I have become accustomed to these
bright, blazing hearths, I do admire them.
There is a generous hospitality in their light,
and they inspire a cheerfulness of feeling, which
is, as I think, the chief reason why the country
people are never troubled with ennui or
dispepsia
.
`Sin and sea-coal' you know, are
proverbially united; and according to the poet,
Melancholy dwells only
`Where brooding darkness spreads his jealous wings.'
Which never happens, I assure you, in a
Yankee
farmer's house, except when the inmates
are asleep.
I am convinced that winter is the season
to visit the country, if you wish to become
acquainted with the true character of the
inhabitants
.
They are then freed in a great
measure
,
from that hurry and care which, often in
the seasons of flowers, clouds their faces with
anxiety, and amid the profusion of the harvest,
which they must toil and sweat to gather, makes
them look sad and weary. These labors are
closed when the winter commences,their
garners are filledit is a season of leisure,
especially
the winter evenings, and then is the
time for their balls, parties, sleigh-rides and
social visits. Never did I see more unaffected
hospitality displayed, more real pleasure
enjoyed
than at these merry parties. They have
earned the right to be happy, and right well do
they improve it. But though I enjoy
exceedingly
these frank, social visits, yet I own it
pleases me best to pass my evenings at home,
in our domestic circle. Edward, I see the
contemptuous curl on your lip while you ask,
what charm there can possibly be in the
humdrum
circle of a farmer's family that so enchants
me? You must not think of Colonel Gage as
a farmer and nothing else. It is the boast of
our free institutions, that talents, and worth,
and energy, may claim their reward, let the
station of their possessor be what it may.
Colonel Gage was an officer in the
revolutionary
war, and he has held civil offices of all
grades from that of town clerk to senator in the
State Legislature. But all these honors have
never tempted him to relinquish the plough.
A man he is, representing the New England
character of industry, enterprise, intelligence
and perseverance in its best light, because his
course has always been marked by that
high-minded
integrity, which will command respect.
(How I wish
all
our Yankees deserved such a
report.) Then he is so generous, so truly
hospitable
and
so uniformly piousEdward. I
would take his chance of gaining heaven before
that of any person I know. But our domestic
circle. Allow me to describe one evening.
I have passed many such, and instead of
finding
them grow dull by repetition, like a third
representation of a barren play, I look forward
to each succeeding evening, with that
expectation
of entertainment we cherish, when a
favorite actor is announced, from whose
versatile
powers we always expect new delight.
But perhaps I ought first to mention our daily
fare, which, by the way, is daily feasting. Such
breakfasts and suppers! The profusion of
good things then set forth, would absolutely
astound you, and be called quite vulgar in
your city, where all the dainties are displayed
at dinner. But I have the authority of Dr.
Johnson for liking a good breakfast; and for
their supperswhy, on my own authority, I
pronounce them in
good taste
. It is the `land
of cakes' herethat's certain. To describe
all the different kinds I have eaten, would
require half a volume at least.
But the eveningYou must know Mr. Silsby
always dispenses with my presence in the store
after eight o'clock. He stays till nine. When
I enter the sitting room the family are arranged
in the following order. Colonel Gage in his
armed chair, occupies the right hand corner
beyond
the fire-place, his dignified countenance
looking peculiarly benign and holy, as the
brightening or falling blaze alternately reveals
or shades his gray hairs, and his calm,
thoughtful
features. Nestling in his bosom, or
playing
at his knees, may be seen his youngest
boy, the loved Benjamin of his old age, and
close beside him sits his wife with her knitting
work. She is many years younger than her
husband, and still a beautiful woman; but her
greatest charm is, that constancy, that
devotedness
of affection, that charity, with which
she seems to be always waiting to promote her
husband's comfort, the improvement of her
children, and the happiness of all around her.
In the centre of the room, stands an
old-fashioned
,
round table, covered with books,
newspapers
,
a board exhibiting the royal game of
24
fox and geese, and all the feminine
apparatus
of needle-work. On the side of the table,
(if
side
can be predicated of a round form,)
next his mother, is the place of Master Robert
Gage, the eldest hope, a scholar, fitting for
college, already ambitious of being a great
man. Near to him usually stand or sit his two
brothers, frolicksome fellows, whose glee over
their game or their books, frequently awakens
their mother's reproofs. The rogues, however,
pay little attention to her soft-spoken
remonstrances
;
but if they meet their father's eye
frowning disprovingly, or hear the slight tap
of his foot on the floor, they are hushed as
sleep. Opposite master Robert, sits the only
daughter of my host, the sweet Catharine
positively, Edward, the loveliest girl I ever
beheld. There she sits, looking so meek and
innocent as she bends her head closer to her
work, whenever I too earnestly regard her,
but sometimesusually when I enter the room,
she looks up in my face with such a smile! O!
when I can flatter myselfas I try to do, that
it welcomes me to the family circle, you cannot
know how happy I feel. I am prevented from
taking a seat beside her, because that is always
occupied by her brother John, the youngest
child but one. He loves Catharine so well
that I cannot help loving the little urchin on
her account, or otherwise, I fear I should
really
hate him. For there he will sit a full hour
after I am at home, and he will engross all the
attention Catharine can spare from her work.
He it is, that helps her wind her thread, and
he holds her work-basket, and picks up her
scissors, or handkerchiefand often, claims a
kiss for his reward. I have really wanted to
strike that boy! There are always two
vacant
chairs, left for Mr. Silsby and your
humble
servant, and as I have my first choice, I
take the one nearest to Catharine, but that
is of little consequence while John remains.
Colonel Gage converses with the ease of one
accustomed to society, and he has moreover, all
the fund of anecdote, which a revolutionary
soldier and a pioneer in our new settlements,
might be expected to possess. I have learned
more from him of the early history of my
country, more of the peculiar spirit of the early
settlers, of their character, their labors and
resources, than I ever learned before in my
whole life. At nine o'clock, or a little before,
Mr. Silsby makes his appearance, and then the
four younger boys are dismissed to bed. I
always rejoice when John goes, but the
manner
in which their father takes leave of them
for the night, has a solemnity that awes, and
prevents me from taking any advantage of my
proximity to address Catharine. The boys in
leaving the room, pass directly by their
father
.
They pause before him, while he, in a
tone of tender and touching pathos, dispenses a
few sentences of reproof, advice, or
commendation
,
to each individual. I never witnessed
such a scene. I should think it would have a
powerful effect on their tender hearts; for
when, as he receives their bow or kiss, he
adds, God bless you my children! I often
find it difficult to breathe freely. After a short
pause, however, we begin to converse, and all
join in the discourse more cheerfully, if
possible
,
than before. News, politics, literature
and anecdote, with an occasional tune on the
piano-forte; the Colonel is quite an enthusiast
in his love of music; and the hour of ten comes
ere we are aware. I should remark, that we
always have apples and cider, and frequently
nuts of some kind, during the evening, and
furthermore, I confess, that during the last
hour, as the fire is gradually suffered to decay,
we as gradually draw nearer to the hearth,
and our circle contracting, I am at last usually
quite near Catharine. I say usually, because
whenever Catharine leaves her chair to play
a tune, she seldom returns to itshe contrives
to steal round to her father's side, and seats
herself on a low chair close by his knee; a
seat claimed by the little boy when he is there.
I wish from my soul he would take that small
chair with him when he goes to bed.
I expect you will smile at what I am now
going to confessyou will wish you were here
to quiz me. So do not I. Though conscious
I am acting rightly, I have hardly sufficient
courage yet to stand the test of ridicule; but as
one conquest over my own weakness, I confess
that I attend the family devotions from choice;
that I kneel at prayers; that Colonel Gage is
a Methodist, and that Catharine says amen!
in a tone so soft, sweet and angelic, that it
causes me to feel my own unworthiness more
poignantly than would the severest reproofs.
I never before comprehended what the
distress
of Macbeth was, when he could not say
amen. Yes, Edwardwhen I can kneel
beside that innocent girl, and catch her soft
whispered amen,as her saint-like father
pauses in the aspirations he has been pouring
forth, perhaps for my salvationI fancy she
always responds the sweetest then, though in
the lowest tone,my heart throbs and swells
tillI believetears have relieved me from
the agitation of my feelings. But this
agitation
is not care, or pain, or discontent. NoI
lay my head on my pillow in peace, everything
around me is peaceful,my reflections are
all tinged with the Eden-like love and
happiness
that pervade this good family. O,
evenings
worthy of the Gods! you may exclaim,
while revelling in your round of amusements;
my apostrophe to evening would be
I crown thee king of intimate delights,
Fire-side enjoymentsheartfelt happiness,
And all the comforts of this dear, dear home.'
March 30.`You say I am in
love
, and that
it is the deluding passion which imparts the
Eden-like tinge, I rave about. True,
Edward
,
I confess you are rightI am in love;
but it is a patriotic, not a personal passion that
engrosses me. I am in love with my country.
I was always proud of being a Bostonian
Boston was the cradle of liberty, the literary
emporium, the seat of arts, eloquence and
fashion. Europeans were pleased with
Boston
,
and allowed that we there possessed the
advantages of good society. But still they
ridicule America and Americans, and Ifool
that I washave acknowledged while
conversing
with them, that the interior of our country
was yet ruderude in its appearance, and
rude in the character of its inhabitants.
Vermont
,
especially, I considered, and reported
as the Thule of our population, where
civilisation
ought not to be expected. Edward, I am
ashamed of my ignorance, and I declare to you,
that those dwellers in your proud city, who
have seen little beyond it, are hardly better
qualified to judge of the benefits of our free
institutions and the peculiar character of our
country people, than are those who have always
lived beneath a royal government. All large
cities must of necessity be similar in one
striking featurethe disparity in the condition
of the citizens. Riches, in the city, give the
possessor a distinction, as surely as the
priviledge
of wearing a star and garter, and poverty
is there degraded, and submits to a servile
dependency
,
perhaps even to beggary; though
begging in our cities is usually practised by
few but foreign mendicants, yet still it looks
exceedingly preposterous to see such misery
among a people boasting so much of their
liberty, and equality, and prosperity, and
happiness
.
But the country, the country has none
of this. Here is no ignorance, or want, or
poverty, such as you have seen exhibited.
Plenty of work there is to be sure, and the
people work hard, but then it is
fashionable
to
work, they do not feel degraded, and they are
not degraded
by it. They labor for themselves;
there is no landlord or tenant; no hired
dwellings
;
no rent to press like an incubus, and
destroy
the sleep of the weary. They reside in
their own houses, on their own farms; they
have enough, and to spare; they are lords of
the soil and the laws; yet living in simplicity,
and submitting quietly to all the necessary
civil restrictions; but well acquainted with
their own rights, and watching the conduct of
their rulers with a strict and scrutinizing eye
providing liberally for public education, and
eager to give their children its advantages
and you will find well-educated, even highly
cultivated and refined people; those who would
do credit to your good society; in every little
town or village scattered through thisas you
think, wild and rude State. Give me neither
poverty nor riches, said the wise man; and I
now see the wisdom of his wish. The country
is the strength of our Republic. Luxury may
enervate our cities, but through our wide
spread country, the healthful tide of liberty
will still flow uncorrupted. There is no other
land where the people are so free, so virtuous,
so intelligent, so happy. I no longer connect
the idea of American greatness, with the
greatness
of our cities. Should a foreigner ask me
to show him the great blessings of our boasted
freedom, I would send him on a six months'
tour among the independent yeomanry of our
land,the
peasantry
, as he would call them
Edward, I am a patriot; I love my country,
andwhy should I deny to you?
I love
Catharine
.'